A SAINT

In general conference of October 2016, I told the
story of my friends Troy and Deedra Russell of
the Dutchman Pass Ward in Henderson, Nevada.
No one will remember the talk, but it dealt with
their experience when Troy pulled his pickup
truck out of the garage on his way to donate goods
to the local Deseret Industries. As he did so, he felt
his back tire roll over a bump. Thinking some item
had fallen off the truck, he got out only to find
his precious nine-year-old son, Austen, lying face
down on the pavement. The screams, the priesthood blessing, the paramedic crew, the hospital
staff—all, in due course, were engaged in trying
to save this beautiful boy’s life, but to no avail.
Austen was gone.
Over time, Troy and Deedra found peace in
their faith in the Lord Jesus Christ, in the comforting presence of the Holy Ghost, and in the
scores of loving friends and neighbors who
helped them, especially their then “home teacher”
John Manning.
My purpose today is not to repeat that message
but to tell you in your university years that some
of life’s lessons will be difficult, and you may be
asked to face more than you think you can—and
certainly more than you want.
In Brother and Sister Russell’s case, one might
think that losing a child in the nightmarish
way that they lost Austen would be enough of
a parental test for any young couple to face. But
there is language in the very heart of one of the
greatest of all Book of Mormon sermons that
implies trials and tests may come to us often
in life. In his farewell address, King Benjamin
taught that a fundamental purpose of mortal
life—perhaps the fundamental purpose—is to
become “a saint through the atonement of Christ
the Lord,” which will require us to become “as
a child, submissive, meek, humble, patient, full
of love, willing to submit to all things which the Lord
seeth fit to inflict upon him, even as a child doth
submit to his father."
What does that mean for us? It means that
struggle and strife, heartbreak and loss, are not
experiences that come only somewhere else to
someone else. It means that moments in which
faith feels frightfully difficult to hold on to are not
reserved for our bygone days of persecution and
martyrdom. No, the times when becoming a saint
through Christ the Lord seems almost—almost—
too much to achieve are still with us. And so it
will be until God has proven His people for their
eternal reward. We will be asked to submit, to
obey, and to be childlike. For some of us that is
difficult now, and it will be difficult then.
My plea today, in this university that I love
with all my heart, is that we practice now and be
strong now for those times of affliction and refinement that surely will come. For some of us they
come now, in university years. That is when faith
in God, faith in Christ, and faith in The Church of
Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints will really count.
That is when faith must be unwavering, because
it will be examined in the refiner’s fire to see if
it is more than “sounding brass, or a tinkling
cymbal.” For some, the severity of the test might
seem like a marathon-length final exam in Mortal
Life 101. It is then, sailing in what Hamlet called
“a sea of troubles,” that it may take all the faith
you have just to keep your little craft afloat.
But you can sail on, King Benjamin said, if you
will be childlike, “submissive, meek, humble, full of love.” I think the only commentary
needed for this verse might be regarding the line
suggesting God “inflicts” trials and burdens upon
us. In English, the word inflict, which comes from
the Latin infligere, has at least two meanings. One
is “to strike or dash against” and another is “to
beat down,” but those definitions are not applicable to God or His angels. No, the proper definition of the word as King Benjamin used it is to
allow “something that must be borne or suffered.”
Now allowing something is a different matter! God
can and will do that if it is ultimately for our good.
I am going to say it again: God does not now nor
will He ever do to you a destructive, malicious,
unfair thing—ever. It is not in what Peter called
“the divine nature” to even be able to do so. By
definition and in fact, God is perfectly and thoroughly, always and forever good, and everything He
does is for our good. I promise you that God does
not lie awake nights trying to figure out ways to
disappoint us or harm us or crush our dreams or
our faith.
Now, with that long introduction, let’s return
to Troy and Deedra Russell just four months ago.
Early in the morning hours of September 8, having
spent much of the night getting her second son
ready for his beginnings at BYU–Idaho, Deedra
Russell was traveling northbound on Interstate 15.
Near mile marker number 14, where the highway
is tightly cut into the sides of the Virgin River
Gorge, Deedra saw a pickup truck traveling at
freeway speed. Unfortunately, it was traveling
right at her, coming south in her northbound lane.
At the wheel was an inebriated male driver, age
thirty-nine.
This is a photo taken by emergency personnel
at about 5:30 in the morning, so forgive the dark
lighting. It is what was left of Deedra’s charcoalcolored Honda after the head-on collision. [A
photo of the wrecked car was shown.]
In spite of what that wreckage would seem to
indicate, Sister Russell, though pinned immovably
inside the car, was not killed in this accident. With
remarkable assistance from emergency personnel,
she was extricated from the wreckage and lifeflighted to the St. George Regional Medical Center,
where—after 132 days of hospitalization, some
forty of them in intensive care—she is still waging
the fight of her life.
Fortunately, she is alive.
Here is the best she could do to say goodbye to
her oldest son, Collin, who left two months after
the accident to serve in the Canada Edmonton
Mission, Tagalog speaking. Her dreams of helping him get ready and
seeing him off to serve were left somewhere near
mile marker number 14 on Interstate 15.
I need to move past the details of Deedra’s
medical condition, but, as I do, let me say that her
lacerations, fractures, and surgical needs almost
defied description. She has been in the operating
room for eighteen surgeries, with more to come.
Her kidneys have been damaged, and at least two
of her external wounds have to remain open with
wound VAC assistance until they can be closed.
Indescribable pain, interrelated injuries, recurring nightmares, and, most recently, a sequence of
paralytic seizures have been her lot day and night.
But every indication is that she is going to make it,
for which we are grateful.
Here is a photo of Deedra with Troy on the
right and Area Seventy Jonathan S. Schmitt on
the left, to whom I am indebted for many of the
photos.
Heaven’s Grace Exceeds Our Merit
Now let me share a few gospel-related thoughts
I have had as these reports have come in.
First of all, public condemnation of the driver—
who miraculously survived this incident and is
with his parents and some of the Russell family
in the audience today as our special guests—is
not the purpose of this message. Our purpose is
to learn. And that is why we come to a university.
And one thing this brother and his family have
taught us is that when we have made a mistake,
serious or otherwise, we should feel genuine
remorse and sorrow, and we should take responsibility for damage done and suffering caused.
In the process, we should demand of ourselves a
change in the habits and behaviors that brought
on these harmful events. But even when we have
done what we can, it often won’t amount to much,
so we will have to ask God to carry all the parts
we can’t repair or repay. To deserve such help, we
surely ought to seek to live a life that would warrant it, always remembering that heaven’s grace
exceeds our merit. I am touched that the brother
who caused this accident is trying to do all that I
have just said in every way he knows how.
For example, I was touched to learn that in
addition to his writing to, praying for, and visiting Deedra and Troy, he and his extended family
spent not a penny on Christmas gifts this year in
order to give that sizeable cash equivalent to the
Russells to help defray some of the horrendous
financial costs that will most assuredly bankrupt
them before this is all over.
An equally poignant example of true remorse is
this handwritten eight-page letter, a copy of which
I hold in my hand. It is too long to read here in its
entirety, but I give you just a sample line or two:
Deedra, I feel so horrible [about what] I [have
done] to you. My heart is [broken]. My lungs can’t
breathe. I am so sorry for the pain you are in. . . .
Troy, you are an angel [to forgive me]. . . . I am
so sorry you had to go through so much in your lives
already, and now this, all because of me. . . . [But] I
am going to church again. I am reading my scriptures
every night.
And please tell the kids I am so sorry I hurt their
mother. I know I nearly took your life, but if
it matters, you have saved mine.
Sincerely, . . .
Behind what we want to be a hopeful and
constructive ending to this story is the constant
reminder, the drumbeat in our brain—rain or
shine, night or day, spring, summer, winter, and
fall—that says there is a loving reason to obey
gospel laws and a worthy reason to follow gospel
principles, that the keeping of God’s commandments really is important, and that revealed do’s
and don’ts are for a purpose.
Without needing another photo of that Honda
to prompt us, we all ought to recognize the wisdom of a loving God who—decades before cars
and freeways and life flights were ever imagined—
revealed the destructive possibilities of alcohol
consumption. Without listing again the crushing
costs borne by the victim and the perpetrator of
this accident, we ought to acknowledge the tears of
a Heavenly Father who simply asks us to take care
of one another, to be careful rather than reckless
with the well-being of our sisters and our brothers.
Childlike obedience to His parental calls and His
divine warnings will spare us and others agony in
the end. Thus the cry of His Only Begotten Son: “If
ye love me, keep my commandments.” It is part of
the apostolic burden for us to stand with the Savior
with that plea, in that request. We always extend
our love—always—but we are morally obligated
to ask for obedience to the commandments as evidence of that affection.
Now, please, please, as I have tried to speak
of childlike, Christlike, saintly submission to
the trials and tribulations of life and to divine
commandments, however tried and tested you
may already feel, please do not walk out of here
today eager to tell your absentee roommate that
Elder Holland gave a devotional today on the
Word of Wisdom. If you want to see an old man
cry, do that! I pray you will find my message
larger and more significant than the sorrow of
drunk driving.
After understanding the reason for commandments and the need to seek forgiveness when we
break them, I offer a second lesson. It is the other
side of the forgiveness coin: Just as the transgressor seeks forgiveness as part of the quest for relief
and peace, we need to forgive at least in part
for the relief and peace it brings us. As angry as
Troy and Deedra might justifiably have been over
this terrible experience, they have felt that they
should not withhold forgiveness for him who
gave offense. At least part of that motivation was
because Troy has spent these last five years of his
life struggling with his role, accidental as it was, in
the loss of nine-year-old Austen.
To carry that into this setting, there is not
one of us anywhere on this campus who has not
needed forgiveness for some mistake made. Our
deed may not have been as severe as the kind
we are recounting today, but we have all made
mistakes, and some of them were very serious mistakes. Whatever the event, we all thank God for
being the Father of forgiveness and for the gifts of
mercy and relief He offers us—all of it ultimately
coming to us through the majestic Atonement
of His Only Begotten Son, the Lord Jesus Christ.
We are to join in and participate in that offering.
The Russells have done that. They have looked
up to their God and, even in their anguish, have
humbly but resolutely joined the Savior in extending forgiveness to one in need. Surely they have
been “submissive, meek, humble, patient, full of
love.” Without embarrassing them, surely they
are becoming “saint[s] through the atonement of
Christ the Lord.”
Now, a third lesson from this incident. I have
never heard them say it, but like all of us in
moments of suffering and pain, the Russells may
have sometimes shouted, “Why me? Why again?”
or “How much do we have to face in life?” or
“Does God really care about me?”
If they have asked those questions, they would
have been in good company. The Psalmist asked,
“How long wilt thou forget me, O Lord?” and
the Prophet Joseph Smith asked, “O God, where
art thou?” Even the Savior Himself, in the
excruciating ordeal of the Atonement, wondered if
He too had been forsaken. But the divine answer
to these faithful souls, to questions uttered in the
darkness of despair, is always and ever the same:
“Be still and know that I am God.” He has not
left us; we are not cast off; His promises are sure;
sanctified love is a constant: “The Lord of hosts is
with us; the God of Jacob is our refuge.”
So, when you are being hammered on the anvil
of adversity, when your soul is being refined with
severe lessons that perhaps cannot be learned in
any other way, don’t cut and run. Don’t jump ship.
Don’t shake your fist at your bishop or your mission president or God. Please stay with the only
help and strength that can aid you in that painful
time. When you stumble in the race of life, don’t
crawl away from the very Physician who is unfailingly there to treat your injuries, lift you to your
feet, and help you finish the course.
We don’t know why all of the things that
happen to us in life happen, why sometimes
we are spared a tragedy and sometimes we are
not. But that is where faith must truly mean
something, or it is not faith at all. In such severe
circumstances, rare as we hope they are, we can
fall back on Alma’s reminder that faith and knowledge are related, but they are not synonymous.
In some matters you can have knowledge, even
perfect knowledge, but in some things, faith will
have to do until knowledge comes. And, as sweet
Sister Holland always tells the missionaries, faith
isn’t really faith if you have anything else to hold
on to.
What we need from everyone, from those of
you solidly in the Church as well as those struggling to hold on, is always the same: powerful
faith, faith that sustains us here and now, not just
on the day of judgment or somewhere in celestial glory. Most of us have faith in the ultimate,
long-term issues such as the truthfulness of The
Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints or
Christ’s Atonement and Resurrection. But sometimes we are less secure in pulling that faith
down to today, to this morning, to help with challenges in the near-term, such as Austen’s death
or Deedra’s automobile accident or your financial
troubles or disappointment in dating or asking
for a much-needed blessing regarding marriage
or health or some other personal need—prayers
that seem to go unanswered and unanswered and
unanswered. In these matters, too, you need faith,
as well as in ultimate things such as the truthfulness of this Church and the reality of Christ’s
Resurrection.
With this latter call for submissive and childlike faith in the near-term coming virtually every
day of our lives, my young friends, I welcome you
to the life that King Benjamin described and that
Jesus perfectly exemplified. Welcome to concepts
such as patience and long-suffering, which take
on meaning you never knew they had. Welcome
to not knowing but still believing. Welcome to
trusting in your Father in Heaven and believing
that all His promises, near-term or long-, will all
yet be kept in full. But beware, there can be some
anguish in this journey. That is because the road
from faith to pure knowledge, from mortal trials to celestial rewards, always somehow winds
through Gethsemane. And when we are invited
to join the Savior of the world in that place, we
should be prepared to answer the demanding
question He put to Peter, James, and John: “Could
ye not watch with me one hour?” Figuratively
speaking, our entire cycle of searching and waiting, of repentance and forgiveness, adds up to
much less than an hour compared to His bloodproducing purge of all the sorrows and all the sins
and all the mistakes made by all humankind from
Adam and Eve to the end of the world.
Please, you beautiful young colleagues in this
work: When your life seems to be one tear and
tragedy and heartache after another, the meaning
of which and the answers to which you cannot understand, I ask you as Alma did to “hope
for things which are not seen [but] which are
true.” As sure as you live, all of the blessings of
Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob, of Sarah, Rebekah, and
Rachel, are waiting for you, short-term, long-term,
and forever.
“A Refuge in Times of Trouble”
Well! Tragedies and submission. Heartache and
belief. Repentance and rainbows. Love and headon collisions. These are big boy and girl issues,
even seemingly contradictory issues at times. But I
promise you in the name of the Lord that help will
come and resolve those contradictions through
the cohesive power of the gospel of Jesus Christ—
what President John Taylor called the “cementing
and harmonizing influences" of eternal truth.
So, the Troy and Deedra Russells submit like
the young saints that they are. And they watch
the miracle of love and faith ripple out in everwidening circles to touch literally hundreds of
people—for example, the groups and groups of
people who have done the Russells’ laundry, those
who have brought in meals every day, those who
have taken the children to school, and those who
have stayed by Deedra’s bedside every day and
night that she has been in the St. George hospital. And remember that her family and friends
live in Henderson, Nevada. Love and faith have
helped Troy drive those miles and stay with his
bride fully one-half of those 132 days and nights.
His colleagues have doubled up at work to free
him for such attention. Meanwhile, two of his
patients have begun reading the Book of Mormon.
A close friend who over the years had refused
invitations to five different baptisms and a baby
blessing—vowing never to set foot in a Latter-day
Saint chapel—came to the sacrament meeting in
which Collin Russell spoke prior to leaving on his
mission. This friend thought that was the least he
could do for an absent mother lying in an intensive care unit miles away. And so, miracles flow
even from the mangled wreckage of a charcoalgray Honda and a white Silverado pickup—all in
response to childlike submission and meekness
when dealing with what the Father allows.
We appreciate Elder Holland letting us share our
testimonies with you all today. I know that we wish trials weren’t a part of our life, but one thing I’ve learned
these past few months, which have been really, really
hard for me, is that we have a very loving Heavenly
Father, and the reason He lets us go through these trials
is so that we can learn things about ourselves. We
can learn to have faith, and we can learn to be strong.
And especially we can learn to rely on our Savior.
Heavenly Father definitely sends us angels. He sent us
so many people to help us! He lets other people help us
during our lowest moments. I don’t think that I would
have had such a strong testimony of just how much
Heavenly Father really loves us if I hadn’t gone through
these things.
A few weeks after Austen passed away, a friend came
up to me and said that I had gone through the worst
thing that anyone could ever go through. I thought
about it for a minute, and I said, “I don’t agree with
you. I think the worst thing that any of us could ever
go through is to not be with our family for eternity.”
In these past four months there have been three or four
times when I didn’t know if she was going to make
it, but in the back of my mind I knew that even if she
didn’t, we had been sealed in the temple for time and all
eternity. And that was what really mattered. The only
thing I believe that we truly own is our ability to make
choices. Our bodies are a gift from God. The air we
breathe is a gift from God. All the material things can be
taken away at any time, but the one thing we have is our
agency. And what is so beautiful about the struggles and
trials and difficulties that we have is that they allow us
to use our agency: whether we can forgive or not forgive,
whether we can show love or kindness, or whether we
can help people. We hope you all know that we love our
Savior. We know that He died for us, and because of
Him we can be together as a family. We just hope that
we always use our agency to forgive others who have
wronged us, that we always show love and kindness, and
that we always are there for other people. And we leave
this with you in the name of Jesus Christ, amen.
My beloved young friends, I too leave my witness with you. I testify that when life brings you
disappointment or sorrow—and on occasion it
will—the gospel of Jesus Christ and the Church
that espouses the fullness of it are true and strong.
They are what the Psalmist called “a refuge for
the oppressed, a refuge in times of trouble.” I
bear witness of love and faith, of repentance and
perseverance, of long-suffering and the merciful grace of God. I particularly bear witness of
joy at the end of the quest, some of which comes
from the hard things we are called to do on that
quest. I testify that we are in the process of rebirth
and refinement, of becoming “a saint through
the atonement of Christ the Lord.” And we will
be reduced to childlike faith and humility in the
course of that experience. I testify of these truths
and leave an apostolic blessing on each of you for
the realization of every righteous desire of your
heart as you search for the God of heaven and
earth to be in your life. I willingly and lovingly
share with you my own faith in you and with you
and for you, lifting from you every burden that
you feel—the ones you can carry and the ones you
cannot—and healing every wound you fear now
is fatal. I do so with love in the name of Him who
gives the power to do such things, who Himself
was lifted up on a cross so we could be lifted up to
eternal life. In the name of Jesus Christ, amen.

SECOND HALF

Someone once told me that the young speak of
the future because they have no past, while
the elderly speak of the past because they have no
future. Although it damages that little aphorism,
I who have no future have come to you as the
veritable Ancient of Days to speak of the future of
BYU, but a future anchored in our distinctive past.
If I have worded that just right, it means I can talk
about anything I want.
I am grateful that the full university family is
gathered today—faculty, staff, and administration. Regardless of your job description, I am
going to speak to all of you as teachers, because
at BYU that is what all of us are. Thank you for
being faithful role models in that regard. We teach
at BYU.
I can’t be certain, but I think that it was in the
summer of 1948 when I had my first BYU experience. I would have been seven years old. We were
driving back to St. George in a 1941 Plymouth
from one of our rare trips to Salt Lake City. As we
came down old highway 91, I saw high on the side
of one of the hills a huge block Y—white and bold
and beautiful.
I don’t know how to explain that moment, but
it was a true epiphany for a seven-year-old, if a
seven-year-old can have an epiphany. If I had
already seen that Y on the drive up or at any other
time, I couldn’t remember it. That day I probably was seeing it for the first time. I believe I
was receiving a revelation from God. I somehow
knew that bold letter meant something special—
something special to me—and that it would one
day play a significant role in my life. When I asked
my mother what it meant, she said it was the
emblem of a university. I thought about that for
a moment, still watching that letter on the side of
the hill, and then said quietly to her, “Well, it must
be the greatest university in the world.”
My chance to actually get on campus came in
June 1952, four years after that first sighting. That
summer I accompanied my parents to one of the
early leadership weeks—a precursor to what is
now the immensely popular BYU Education Week
held on campus. That means I came here for my
first BYU experience sixty-nine years ago, with a
preview of that four years earlier. If anyone in this
audience has been coming to this campus longer
than that, please come forward and give this talk.
Otherwise, sit still and be patient. As Elizabeth
Taylor said to her eight husbands, “I won’t be
keeping you long.”
My point, dear friends, is simply this: I have
loved BYU for nearly three-fourths of a century.
Only my service in and testimony of The Church
of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints—which
includes and features foremost my marriage
and the beautiful children it has given us—have
affected me as profoundly as has my decision to
attend Brigham Young University. No one in my
family had. In so testifying, I represent literally
hundreds of thousands of other students who
made that decision and say that same thing.
So, for the legions of us over the years, I say:
Thank you. Thank you for what you do. Thank
you for classes taught and meals served and
grounds so well kept. Thank you for office hours
and lab experiments and testimonies shared—
gifts given to little people like me so we could
grow up to be big people like you. Thank you
for choosing to be at BYU, because your choice
affected our choice, and, like Mr. Frost’s poetic
path, “that has made all the difference.”
“A Trowel in One Hand and a Musket in
the Other”
I asked President Kevin J Worthen for a sample
of the good things that have been happening of
late, and I was delighted at the sheaf of items he
gave me—small type, single-spaced lines, reams,
it looked like—everything from academic recognitions and scholarly rankings to athletic successes
and the reach of BYUtv. Karl G. Maeser would be
as proud as I was.
But President Worthen and I both know those
aren’t the real success stories of BYU. These are
rather, as some say of ordinances in the Church,
“outward signs of an inward grace.” The real
successes at BYU are the personal experiences that thousands here have had—personal
experiences difficult to document or categorize or
list. Nevertheless, these are so powerful in their
impact on the heart and mind that they have
changed us forever.
I run a risk in citing any examples beyond my
own, but let me mention just one or two.
One of our colleagues seated here this morning
wrote of his first-semester, pre-mission enrollment in my friend C. Wilfred Griggs’s History of
Civilization class. But this was going to be civilization seen through a BYU lens. So, as preambles
to the course, Wilf had the students read President
Spencer W. Kimball’s talk “The Second Century of
Brigham Young University” and the first chapter
of Hugh Nibley’s book Approaching Zion.
Taken together, our very literate friend said
these two readings “forged an indestructible
union in my mind and heart between two soaring
ideals—that of a consecrated university with that
of a holy city. Zion, I came to believe, would be
a city with a school [and, I would add, a temple,
creating] something of a celestial college town, or
perhaps a college kingdom.”
After his mission, our faculty friend returned
to Provo, where he fell under the soul-expanding
spell of John S. Tanner, “the platonic ideal of a
BYU professor—superbly qualified in every secular sense, totally committed to the kingdom, and
absolutely effervescing with love for the Savior,
his students, and his subject. He moved seamlessly from careful teacher analysis to powerful
personal testimony. He knew scores of passages
from Milton and other poets by heart, [yet] verses
of scripture flowed, if anything, even more freely
from the abundance of his consecrated heart:
I was unfailingly edified by the passion of his
teaching and the eloquence of his example.”
Why would such a one come back to teach at
BYU after a truly distinguished postgraduate experience that might well have taken him to virtually
any university in America? Because, our colleague
said, “in a coming day the citizens of Zion ‘shall
come forth with songs of everlasting joy’.
I hope,” he wrote, “to help my students hear
that chorus in the distance and to lend their own
voices, in time, to its swelling refrain.”
Such are the experiences we hope to provide
our students at BYU, though probably not always
so poetically expressed. But imagine then the pain
that comes with a memo like this one I recently
received. These are just a half-dozen lines from a
two-page document:
“You should know,” the writer said, “that some
people in the extended community are feeling
abandoned and betrayed by BYU. It seems that
some professors (at least the vocal ones in the
media) are supporting ideas that many of us feel
are contradictory to gospel principles, making it
appear to be about like any other university our
sons and daughters could have attended. Several
parents have said they no longer want to send
their children here or donate to the school.
“Please don’t think I’m opposed to people
thinking differently about policies and ideas,” the
writer continued. “I’m not. But I would hope that
BYU professors would be bridging those gaps
between faith and intellect and would be sending
out students who are ready to do the same in loving, intelligent, and articulate ways. Yet I fear that
some faculty are not supportive of the Church’s
doctrines and policies and choose to criticize them
publicly. There are consequences to this. After having served a full-time mission and marrying her
husband in the temple, a friend of mine recently
left the Church. In her graduation statement on a
social media post, she credited [such and such a
BYU program and its faculty] with the radicalizing
of her attitudes and the destruction of her faith.”
Fortunately we don’t get too many of those
letters, but this one isn’t unique. Several of my colleagues get the same kind, with almost all of them
ultimately being forwarded to poor President
Worthen. Now, most of what happens on this campus is absolutely wonderful. That is why I began
as I did, with my own undying love of this place.
But every so often we need a reminder of the challenge we constantly face here. Maybe it is in this
meeting. I certainly remember my own experiences in these wonderful beginning-of-the-schoolyear meetings and how much it meant to me to be
with you then. Well, it means that again today.
Here is something I said on this subject fortyone years ago, almost to the day. I was young. I
was unprepared. I had been president for all of
three weeks.
I said then and I say now that if we are an
extension of The Church of Jesus Christ of Latterday Saints, taking a significant amount of sacred
tithes and other precious human resources, all of
which might well be expended in other worthy
causes, surely our integrity demands that our
lives “be absolutely consistent with and characteristic of the restored gospel of Jesus Christ.” At
a university there will always be healthy debate
regarding a whole syllabus full of issues. But until
“we all come [to] the unity of the faith, and . . .
[have grown to] the measure of the stature of the
fulness of Christ,” our next best achievement will
be to stay in harmony with the Lord’s anointed,
those whom He has designated to declare Church
doctrine and to guide Brigham Young University
as its trustees.
In 2014, seven years ago, then Elder Russell M.
Nelson came to campus for a BYU leadership
meeting. His remarks were relatively brief, but,
tellingly, he said:
With the Church growing more rapidly in the less
prosperous countries, we . . . must conserve sacred
funds more carefully than ever before.
At BYU we must ally ourselves even more closely
with the work of our Heavenly Father. . . .
A college education for our people is a sacred responsibility, [but] it is not essential for eternal life.
A statement like that gets my attention, particularly because just a short time later President
Nelson started to chair our board of trustees, hold
our purse strings, and have the final “yea” or
“nay” on every proposal we might make—from
a new research lab to more undergraduate study
space to approving a new pickup truck for the
physical facilities staff! Russell M. Nelson is very,
very good at listening to us. We who sit with him
every day have learned the value of listening carefully to him.
Three years later, in 2017, Elder Dallin H.
Oaks, not then but soon to be in the First
Presidency, where he would sit only one chair—
one heartbeat—away from the same position
President Nelson now has, quoted our colleague
Elder Neal A. Maxwell, who had said:
In a way [Church of Jesus Christ] scholars at
BYU and elsewhere are a little bit like the builders of
the temple in Nauvoo, who worked with a trowel in one
hand and a musket in the other. Today scholars building
the temple of learning must also pause on occasion to
defend the kingdom. I personally think this is one of the
reasons the Lord established and maintains this university. The dual role of builder and defender is unique and
ongoing. I am grateful we have scholars today who can
handle, as it were, both trowels and muskets.
To this, Elder Oaks then challengingly
responded, “I would like to hear a little more
musket fire from this temple of learning.” He
said this in a way that could have applied to a
host of topics in various departments, but the one
he specifically mentioned was the doctrine of the
family and defending marriage as the union of a
man and a woman. Little did he know that while
many would hear his appeal, especially the School
of Family Life, which moved quickly and visibly
to assist, some others fired their muskets all right,
but unfortunately they didn’t always aim at those
hostile to the Church. We thought a couple of
stray rounds even went north of the Point of the
Mountain!
My beloved brothers and sisters, “a house . . .
divided against itself . . . cannot stand,” and I
will go to my grave pleading that this institution not only stands but stands unquestionably
committed to its unique academic mission and
to the Church that sponsors it. We hope it isn’t a
surprise to you that your trustees are not deaf or
blind to the feelings that swirl around marriage
and the whole same-sex topic on campus—and
a lot of other topics. I and many of my Brethren
have spent more time and shed more tears on this
subject than we could ever adequately convey to
you this morning or any morning. We have spent
hours discussing what the doctrine of the Church
can and cannot provide the individuals and families struggling over this difficult issue. So it is with
a little scar tissue of our own that we are trying to
avoid—and hope all will try to avoid—language,
symbols, and situations that are more divisive
than unifying at the very time we want to show
love for all of God’s children.
If a student commandeers a graduation podium
intended to represent everyone getting diplomas
that day in order to announce his personal sexual
orientation, what might another speaker feel
free to announce the next year, until eventually
anything goes? What might commencement come
to mean—or not mean—if we push individual
license over institutional dignity for very long? Do
we simply end up with more divisiveness in our
culture than we already have? And we already
have far too much everywhere.
In that spirit, let me go no farther before
declaring unequivocally my love and that of my
Brethren for those who live with this same-sex
challenge and so much complexity that goes
with it. Too often the world has been unkind—in
many instances crushingly cruel—to these, our
brothers and sisters. Like many of you, we have
spent hours with them, and we have wept and
prayed and wept again in an effort to offer love
and hope while keeping the gospel strong and
the obedience to commandments evident in every
individual life.
But it will assist all of us—it will assist
everyone—trying to provide help in this matter
if things can be kept in some proportion and balance in the process. For example, we have to be
careful that love and empathy do not get interpreted as condoning and advocacy or that orthodoxy and loyalty to principle not be interpreted as
unkindness or disloyalty to people. As near as I
can tell, Christ never once withheld His love from
anyone, but He also never once said to anyone,
“Because I love you, you are exempt from keeping
my commandments.” We are tasked with trying to
strike that same sensitive, demanding balance in
our lives.
Musket fire? Yes, we will always need defenders of the faith, but “friendly fire” is a tragedy—
and from time to time the Church, its leaders,
and some of our colleagues within the university
community have taken such fire on this campus.
And sometimes it isn’t friendly, wounding students and the parents of students—so many who
are confused about what so much recent flagwaving and parade-holding on this issue means.
My beloved friends, this kind of confusion and
conflict ought not to be. Not here. There are better
ways to move toward crucially important goals
in these very difficult matters—ways that show
empathy and understanding for everyone while
maintaining loyalty to prophetic leadership and
devotion to revealed doctrine.
My Brethren have made the case for the metaphor of musket fire, which I have endorsed yet
again today. There will continue to be those who
oppose our teachings—and with that will continue the need to define, document, and defend
the faith. But we all look forward to the day when
we can “beat [our] swords into plowshares, and
[our] spears into pruninghooks” and, at least on
this subject, “learn war [no] more.” And while I
have focused on this same-sex topic this morning
more than I would have liked, I pray you will see
it as emblematic of a lot of issues our students, our
communities, and our Church face in this complex, contemporary world of ours.
The Unfolding Dream of BYU
But I digress! Back to the blessings of a school
in Zion! Do you see the beautiful parallel between
the unfolding of the Restoration and the prophetic
development of BYU, notwithstanding that both
will have their critics along the way? Just as has
the Church itself, BYU has grown in spiritual
strength, in the number of people it reaches
and serves, and in its unique place among other
institutions of higher education. It has grown in
national and international reputation. More and
more of its faculty are distinguishing themselves,
and, even more important, so are more and more
of its students.
Reinforcing the fact that so many do understand exactly what that unfolding dream of BYU
is that President Worthen spoke about, not long
ago one of your number wrote to me this marvelous description of what he thought was the “call”
to those who serve at BYU: “The Lord’s call [to
those of us who serve at BYU] is a . . . call to create
learning experiences of unprecedented depth,
quality, and impact. . . . As good as BYU is and has
been, this is a call to do [better]. It is . . . a call to
educate many more students, to more . . . effectively help them become true disciples of Jesus
Christ, [and] to prepare them to . . . lead in their
families, in the Church, [and] in their [professions]
in a world filled with commotion. . . . But [answering this call] . . . cannot be [done successfully]
without His . . . help.” The writer, one of you, concluded, “I believe that help will come according to
the faith and obedience of the tremendously good
people of BYU.”
I agree wholeheartedly and enthusiastically
with such a sense of calling here and with that
reference to and confidence in “the tremendously
good people of BYU.” Let me underscore that idea
of such a call by returning to President Kimball’s
second-century address focused on by President
Worthen.
Our bright, budding new commissioner of
education, Elder Clark G. Gilbert, is one of my
traveling companions today. You may be certain
that Elder Gilbert loves this institution—his alma
mater—deeply and brings to his assignment a reverence for its mission and its message. As part of
his introduction to you, I am asking Elder Gilbert
to come on campus on any calendar date he and
President Worthen can work out, and whether
those visits are formal or casual or both, I hope
they can accomplish at least two things:
First of all, I hope you will come to see quickly
the remarkable strengths Elder Gilbert brings to
his calling, even as he learns more about the flagship of his fleet and why our effort at the Church
Educational System would be a failure without the
health, success, and participation of BYU.
Second, noting that we are just a few years
short of halfway through those second hundred
years of which President Kimball spoke, I think
it would be fascinating to know if we are, in fact,
making any headway on the challenges he laid
before us and of which Elder David A. Bednar
reminded the BYU leadership team just a few
weeks ago.
When you look at President Kimball’s talk
again, may I ask you to pay particular attention
to that sweet prophet’s effort to ask that we be
unique? In his discourse, President Kimball used
the word unique eight times and the word special
eight times. It seems clear to me in my seventythree years of loving it that BYU will become an
“educational Mt. Everest” only to the degree it
embraces its uniqueness, its singularity. We could
mimic every other university in the world until
we got a bloody nose in the effort, and the world
would still say, “BYU who?” No, we must have the
will to be different and to stand alone, if necessary, being a university second to none in its role
primarily as an undergraduate teaching institution that is unequivocally true to the gospel of the
Lord Jesus Christ. If at a future time that mission
means foregoing some professional affiliations
and certifications, then so be it. There may come a
day when the price we are asked to pay for such
association is simply too high and too inconsistent with who we are. No one wants it to come to
that, least of all me, but if it does, we will pursue
our own destiny, a “destiny [that] is not a matter
of chance; [but largely] . . . a matter of choice; . . .
not a thing to be waited for, [but] . . . a thing to be
[envisioned and] achieved.”
“Mom, what is that big Y on that mountain?”
“Jeff, it stands for the university here in Provo:
Brigham Young University.”
“Well, it must be the greatest university in the
world.”
And so, for me, it is. To help you pursue that
destiny in the only real way I know how to help,
I leave an apostolic blessing on every one of you
this morning as you start another school year.
In the name of the Lord Jesus Christ, and with
gratitude for His holy priesthood and as if hands
were on your head—had we time to do that, we
surely would—I bless you personally, each one
of you personally. I bless the students who will
come under your influence, and I bless the university, including its marvelous president, in its
campus-wide endeavor. I bless you that profound
personal faith will be your watchword and that
unending blessings of personal rectitude will be
your eternal reward. I bless your professional
work that it will be admired by your peers, and
I bless your devotion to gospel truths that it will
be the saving grace in some student’s life. I bless
your families that those you hope will be faithful
in keeping their covenants will be saved at least
in part because you have been faithful in keeping
yours. Light conquers darkness. Truth triumphs
over error. Goodness is victorious over evil in the
end, every time.
I bless each one of you with every righteous
desire of your heart, and I thank you for giving
your love and loyalty to BYU, to students like me
and my beloved wife. Please, from one who owes
so much to this school and who has loved her so
deeply for so long, keep her not only standing but
standing for what she uniquely and prophetically
was meant to be. And may the rest of higher education “see your good works, and glorify [our] Father
which is in heaven,” I pray, in the name of Jesus
Christ, amen.

BANISHING ALL SHADOWS

A funny thing happened to me on the way to
these services. Just to make sure I wasn’t
late, I started out for Provo more than two weeks
ago. And boy, is it a good thing I did. I am not
sure where I made the wrong turn, but the next
thing I knew I was seeing road signs that said
Jerusalem, Nairobi, Bangalore, and Hong Kong!
My goodness, it has taken me all I could do to
finally get here.
And the unusual thing about this is that it was
President Russell M. Nelson who was giving me
advice on the route I should take. I wonder if that
is the way he always gets people from Salt Lake
to Provo!
Sister Holland and I come to you newly
returned from one of the most remarkable experiences of our lives. Can you imagine circling the
globe on a worldwide ministering assignment
with the Lord’s prophet and his wonderful wife?
It was an experience of a lifetime. In those oftquoted words of Oliver Cowdery, these past two
weeks with President and Sister Nelson were truly
“days never to be forgotten.”
This is not the time nor the place to regale you
with stories of our experience, but I bear witness to
you that President Russell M. Nelson is a prophet
ordained of God from before the foundation of
the world and that he is exercising that calling in
a most magnificent way in public and in private.
I bring you his love as chairman of the BYU Board
of Trustees and the love of all those who serve
with him, including Presidents Dallin H. Oaks and
Henry B. Eyring. It is no small matter, my beloved
friends, that those giving oversight to your alma
mater are prophets, seers, and revelators. That is
just one more very special blessing you can count
on this happy graduation day.
On behalf of all of you and our governing
board, I thank President Kevin J Worthen, his
associates in the administration, those on this
marvelous faculty, and all of the efficient staff at
this university. I am grateful for the effort they
have all put into making this day what it is for
6,300 graduates and degree recipients. Gaining
an education is hard work, but providing that
opportunity also is hard work.
For nine wonderful years I had the pleasant
opportunity to say to students and their families
that such a thrilling day of academic triumph was
more than worth the difficult days it took to get
here—on everyone’s part. I know firsthand what
BYU does in providing an unequaled university
experience, but I know equally well and even
more tenderly the scrimping, saving, sacrifice,
and hard work that many students and their
parents have experienced in order to arrive at
this moment. Mindful of that sacrifice in a grand
cause—and education is a truly grand cause—I
want this to be a terrifically happy day for every
one of you. You have earned it. I pray that all your
days may be so.
I was told I am to say something wise and
original to you, but, being incapable of that, let me
just remind you of one or two things you already
know. You will think that there was some collusion among the speakers today. There hasn’t been,
except as orchestrated in heaven.
I want you to realize that the sources I am
going to quote are drawn from my undergraduate
days at BYU. Oh, I can hear you groan now! A
lesson in ancient history, you say. Lessons drawn
from back before the earth’s geologic clock even
started to tick. Yes, I am old, but indulge me. I do
this in part just to prove to the faculty that sometimes students actually do remember some things
they were taught here.
Thomas Wolsey—Bridling Ambition
My first reminder is a cautionary one. It comes
from the man who rose in his time to become
the most powerful layman in the entire British
kingdom of his day, the masterful Thomas Wolsey,
second only to the legendary Henry VIII himself
in his influence over the king’s realm. His story
is a warning—unneeded by you, I hope—against
maneuvering the ladder of success so wantonly
that you discover in the end you had it leaning
against the wrong wall.
Wolsey was the son of an uneducated Suffolk
butcher, but his driving ambition and immense
talent brought him on a rapid rise through Oxford
University and into the Catholic Church, where he
quickly became chaplain to Henry VII.
But Wolsey’s fortunes prospered even more
dramatically when Henry VIII ascended to the
throne. Under him, Wolsey served as Archbishop
of York and finally cardinal, becoming probably
the most influential member ever of a king’s Privy
Council before or since that time. Quickly enough
he was the controlling figure in all matters of state
and every political move made by his monarch.
He loved display and wealth. He lived in royal
splendor and reveled in his power.
Then Anne Boleyn came onto the scene. Young
King Henry was determined to move heaven;
earth; his wife, Catherine; and the Roman Catholic
Church to have her, but the obstacles were nearly
insurmountable. Henry told Wolsey to surmount
them. Wolsey did not, because he could not, and
the failure proved to be fatal.
Despite such a remarkable and virtually
unprecedented rise to political power, Wolsey’s
fall was sudden and complete. Unable to get
Rome’s approval for a divorce, Wolsey was
stripped by King Henry of every office and all
his property, was accused of treason, and was
ordered to appear in London for a trial that very
likely would have carried an order of execution. In
great distress, he set out for the capital to face his
monarch. On the way he fell ill and died.
With the help of William Shakespeare, who
sends his congratulations to you and asked to be
remembered, I invite you to think on Cardinal
Wolsey’s “farewell” lament. To BYU graduates
today, he says:
Farewell! a long farewell, to all my greatness!
This is the state of man: to-day he puts forth
The tender leaves of hopes; to-morrow blossoms,
And bears his blushing honours thick upon him;
The third day comes a frost, a killing frost,
And . . . nips his root,
And then he falls, as I do. . . .
. . . My high-blown pride
At length broke under me and now has left me,
Weary and old with service. . . .
. . . I charge thee, fling away ambition:
By that sin fell the angels; how can man, then,
The image of his Maker, hope to win by it?
Love thyself last: cherish those hearts that hate thee;
Corruption wins not more than honesty. . . .
Had I but served my God with half the zeal
I served my king, he would not in mine age
Have left me naked to mine enemies.
What a tragic end to such a gifted beginning!
What a pathetic farewell to a life that held such
promise! And where did it go wrong? It went
wrong when Wolsey’s public ambition became
more important than his personal integrity, when
cutting moral corners was more advantageous than
maintaining moral rectitude, when political power
and unseemly wealth created a thirst for more and
more of the same until honest living and responsible behavior could not quench that thirst and were
jettisoned along the way, never to be regained.
If he could, I wonder if Cardinal Wolsey might
raise his voice from the grave today, nearly five
centuries after his precipitous fall, to quote to you
a simple scripture he probably read more than
once in his clerical duties: “For what is a man [or a
woman] profited, if he shall gain the whole world,
and lose his own soul? or what shall a man give in
exchange for his soul?”
You leave BYU to enter a political, social, and
economic world your parents never knew and
your grandparents could never have dreamed of.
Perhaps that is true of each succeeding generation
in history, but in my old age, I, for one, could not
have imagined as a BYU student more than half a
century ago the world you now go forth to experience. So much of that world is stunningly beautiful and rewarding.
Do you realize that when I was a BYU student,
my colleagues had to wait for perhaps a 3:00 a.m.
opportunity to use for a few minutes the university’s one mainframe IBM computer on projects
you can now almost literally—not quite—pursue
on your laptop? (I was going to say on your cell
phone.) Almost nothing seems impossible now
in the world of science, technology, and biomedicine, including such things as genetic engineering, artificial intelligence, and fetal surgery. And
now you have cars that drive themselves and little
cannisters that play your favorite music, answer
your math problems, tell you what time it is in
Uzbekistan, and butter your toast—all before you
get out of bed!
But not everything is so rosy everywhere
for everyone. In so many nations of the world,
including parts of our own, it can be a time prophesied by my favorite Irish poet, who warned:
The falcon cannot hear the falconer;
. . . the centre cannot hold; . . .
. . . everywhere
The ceremony of innocence is drowned;
The best lack all conviction, while the worst
Are full of passionate intensity.
I do not agree that “the best lack all conviction”
because you, seated before me robed and hooded,
and a host of good people across the earth like
you prove otherwise. I believe you to be the very
best, and I am counting on you to be consumed
with conviction.
But alas, I fear that in too many cases “the
worst [of our day] are full of passionate intensity.”
No child should have to go to school fearful that
they won’t live to see their parents that evening.
No citizenry should have to live with a system—
pick a nation, any nation, or put a pin in a world
map almost at random—where corruption is
rampant, where chaos is the order of the day, and
where statesmanlike character, elevated (to say
nothing of elegant) speech, and dignified personal
behavior are seemingly alien concepts. No young
people your age—or any age—ought to face
conditions in so many places where poverty and
abuse (including sexual abuse), malnutrition and
disease, and human trafficking and terror are still
the rule rather than the exception for too many
people, including too many children.
Well, I don’t want to dwell on anything negative today, and you might say it has always been
so down through time, and maybe it has. But it
doesn’t have to be! So go out there and light a
candle. Be a ray of light. Be your best self and let
your character shine. Cherish the gospel of Jesus
Christ and live it. The world needs you, and surely
your Father in Heaven needs you if His blessed
purposes for His children are to prevail. You
have entered to learn. Now go forth to serve and
strengthen. If correcting all the world’s ills seems
a daunting task, so be it. Go out there and be
undaunted. If we cannot look to you to change the
world, tell me to whom we should look.
John Donne—Darkness Always Yields to Light
Here is the reason that you can succeed—
my second and only other reminder to you
today. I give you encouragement from another
Englishman, the gifted son of an ironmonger, a
brilliant young man who studied law, traveled the
world, and came home to find his true calling in
poetry and the pulpit.
John Donne was arguably the greatest of all
the metaphysical poets but was, as well, one
who reached the pinnacle of ministerial success,
becoming the dean of St. Paul’s Cathedral and
preaching regularly before Charles I and the royal
family. The best of his sermons are unequaled in
the history of the English Church. Almost totally
neglected for more than 300 years before being
discovered, as it were, a century or so ago, John
Donne returns from his grave to give BYU graduates a final word of confidence as you step out
onto the path leading firmly to your future.
I have just said that the world you now enter
holds challenges and difficulties. In the days and
years ahead, you may suffer some discouragement
and disappointment. On occasion you may feel
genuine despair, either for yourself or for your
children or for the plight and conditions of others.
You may even make a personal mistake or two—
serious mistakes, perhaps, though I hope not—
and you may worry that any chance to be happy
and secure in life has eluded you forever.
When such times come, I ask you to remember
this: This is the Church of the happy endings.
Troubles need never be permanent nor fatal.
Darkness always yields to light. The sun always
rises. Faith, hope, and charity will always triumph
in the end. Furthermore, they will triumph all
along the way.
Our English preacher said of this:
We ask our daily bread, and God never says you should
have come yesterday, he never says [I have run out,]
you must [come] again to-morrow, but to-day if you
will hear his voice, to-day he will hear you. . . . God
. . . brought light out of darkness, not out of a lesser
light; he can bring thy summer out of winter, though
thou [had] no [hope of] spring; though in the ways
of fortune, or [mis]understanding, or conscience, thou
[hast] been benighted till now, wintred and frozen,
clouded and eclipsed, damp and benumbed, smothered
and stupefied till now, . . . God [yet] comes to thee, not
as in the dawning of the day, not as in the bud of the
spring, but as the sun at [full] noon, to [banish] all
shadows, as the sheaves in harvest, to fill all penuries,
all occasions invite his mercies, and all times are his
seasons.
With all else you have learned here, may you
leave this great school—which I love with all my
heart—secure in the promise of God’s unfailing
love for you and the redeeming blessings that
flow forever from the gospel of Jesus Christ. You
undoubtedly will have days, to quote Mr. Donne,
when you may feel dark, cold, “clouded,” or
“eclipsed.” But if you desire God’s mercy, I
promise that help will come to you, “not as in
the dawning of the day, not as in the bud of the
spring, but as the sun at [full] noon, [banishing
every shadow].” All occasions invite divine mercy,
and in heaven it is always harvest time. Be secure
and safe, today and always, in the victory of the
kingdom of God over the troubles and ills of mortality. I am more certain of that victory than I am
of any other thing I have ever learned—in college
or out.
Congratulations on your very significant
achievement. As an apostle of the Lord Jesus
Christ, I bless you today with abundant promise
and profound peace regardless of challenges that
you may now be facing or those that may yet
come. I bless you to cultivate lives of service and
spiritual strength, lives of character and integrity
and moral fidelity, and lives that will bring you
confidence when you stand in the presence of
God our Eternal Father, as all of us surely will on
another kind of graduation day yet ahead. Until
then, may the sun always be at full noon for you,
banishing every shadow that might otherwise
mar your happiness. I express our pride in you
and wish you Godspeed for the exciting journey
you now undertake, in the name of Jesus Christ,
amen.

RELIGION: BOUND BY LOVING TIES

One of my BYU professors of yesteryear—
actually quite a few yesteryears—was
Edward L. Hart, who wrote the text of a muchloved hymn in the Church. The second verse of
that hymn, Our Savior’s Love, reads this way:
The Spirit, voice
Of goodness, whispers to our hearts
A better choice
Than evil’s anguished cries.
Loud may the sound
Of hope ring till all doubt departs,
And we are bound
To him by loving ties.
An omnibus word familiar to us all
that summarizes these “loving ties” to our
Heavenly Father is religion. Scholars debate the
etymology of that word just as scholars and
laymen alike debate almost everything about
the subject of religion, but a widely accepted
account of its origin suggests that our English
word religion comes from the Latin word
religare, meaning “to tie” or, more literally, “to
re-tie.” In that root syllable of ligare you can
hear the echo of a word such as ligature, which
is what a doctor uses to sew us up if we have a
wound.
So, for our purpose today, religion is that
which unites what was separated or holds
together that which might be torn apart—
an obvious need for us, individually and
collectively, given the trials and tribulations
we all experience here in mortality.
What is equally obvious is that the great conflict between good and evil, right and wrong,
the moral and the immoral—conflict that the
world’s great faiths and devoted religious
believers have historically tried to address—
is being intensified in our time and is affecting
an ever-wider segment of our culture. And
let there be no doubt that the outcome of this
conflict truly matters, not only in eternity but
in everyday life as well. Will and Ariel Durant
put the issue squarely as they reflected on what
they called “the lessons of history.” “There is no
significant example in history,” they said, “of
[any] society successfully maintaining moral
life without the aid of religion.”
If that is true—and surely we feel it is—
then we should be genuinely concerned over
the assertion that the single most distinguishing
feature of modern life is the rise of secularism with
its attendant dismissal of, cynicism toward,
or marked disenchantment with religion.
How wonderfully prophetic our beloved Elder
Neal A. Maxwell was—clear back in 1978—
when he said in a BYU devotional:
We shall see in our time a maximum . . . effort . . .
to establish irreligion as the state religion. [These
secularists will use] the carefully preserved . . .
freedoms of Western civilization to shrink freedom
even as [they reject] the value . . . of our rich JudeoChristian heritage.
Continuing on, he said:
Your discipleship may see the time come when
religious convictions are heavily discounted. . . . This
new irreligious imperialism [will seek] to disallow
certain . . . opinions simply because those opinions
grow out of religious convictions.
My goodness! That forecast of turbulent
religious weather issued nearly forty years ago
is steadily being fulfilled virtually every day
somewhere in the world in the minimization
of—or open hostility toward—religious practice, religious expression, and, even in some
cases, the very idea of religious belief itself.
Of course there is often a counterclaim that
while some in the contemporary world may be
less committed to religion per se, nevertheless
many still consider themselves “spiritual.” But,
frankly, that palliative may not offer much in
terms of collective moral influence in society if
“spirituality” means only gazing at the stars or
meditating on a mountaintop.
Indeed, many of our ancestors in generations past lived, breathed, walked, and talked
in a world full of “spirituality,” but that clearly
included concern for the state of one’s soul, an
attempt to live a righteous life, some form of
Church attendance, and participation in that
congregation’s charitable service in the community. Yes, in more modern times individuals
can certainly be “spiritual” in isolation, but
we don’t live in isolation. We live as families,
friends, neighbors, and nations. That calls for
ties that bind us together and bind us to the
good. That is what religion does for our society,
leading the way for other respected civic and
charitable organizations that do the same.
This is not to say that individual faith
groups in their many different forms and with
their various conflicting beliefs are all true
and equally valuable; obviously they cannot
be. Nor does it say that institutional religions
collectively—churches, if you will—have been
an infallible solution to society’s challenges;
they clearly have not been. But if we speak of
religious faith as among the highest and most
noble impulses within us, then to say that soand-so is a “religious person” or that such and
such a family “lives their religion” is intended
as a compliment. Such an observation would,
as a rule, imply that these people try to be an
influence for good, try to live to a higher level
of morality than they might otherwise have
done, and have tried to help hold the sociopolitical fabric of their community together.
Well, thank heaven for that, because the
sociopolitical fabric of a community wears a
little thin from time to time—locally, nationally,
or internationally—and a glance at the evening
news tells us this is one of those times. My concern is that when it comes to binding up that
fabric in our day, the ligatures of religion are
not being looked to in quite the way they once
were. My boyhood friend and distinguished
legal scholar Elder Bruce C. Hafen framed it
even more seriously than that:
Democracy’s core values of civilized religion . . . are
now under siege—partly because of violent criminals
who claim to have religious motives; partly because
the wellsprings of stable social norms once transmitted naturally by religion and marriage-based family
life are being polluted . . . ; and partly because the
advocates of some causes today have marshaled
enough political and financial capital to impose
by intimidation, rather than by reason, their antireligion strategy of “might makes right.”
There are many colliding social and cultural
forces in our day that contribute to this antireligious condition, which I am not going to
address in these remarks. But I do wish to make
the very general observation that part of this
shift away from respect for traditional religious
beliefs—and even the right to express those
religious beliefs—has come because of a conspicuous shift toward greater and greater preoccupation with the existential circumstances
of this world and less and less concern for—or
even belief in—the circumstances, truths, and
requirements of the next.
Call it secularism or modernity or the technological age or existentialism on steroids—
whatever you want to call such an approach to
life, we do know a thing or two about it. Most
important, we know that it cannot answer the
yearning questions of the soul, nor is it substantial enough to sustain us in times of moral
crises.
Rabbi Lord Jonathan Sacks, formerly Chief
Rabbi of the United Hebrew Congregations
of the British Commonwealth for twenty-two
years, a man whom I admire very much, has
written:
What the secularists forgot is that Homo sapiens is the meaning-seeking animal. If there is one
thing the great institutions of the modern world do
not do, it is to provide meaning.
We are so fortunate—and grateful—that
modern technology gives us unprecedented
personal freedom, access to virtually unlimited knowledge, and communication capability beyond anything ever known in this
world’s history, but neither technology nor its
worthy parent science can give us much moral
guidance as to how to use that freedom, where
to benefit from that knowledge, or what the
best purpose of our communication should
be. It has been principally the world’s great
faiths—religion, those ligatures to the Divine
we have been speaking of—that do that, that
speak to the collective good of society, that
offer us a code of conduct and moral compass for living, that help us exult in profound
human love, and that strengthen us against
profound human loss. If we lose consideration of these deeper elements of our mortal
existence—divine elements, if you will—we
lose much, some would say most, of that which
has value in life.
The legendary German sociologist Max
Weber once described such a loss of religious
principle in society as being stuck in an “iron
cage” of disbelief. And that was in 1904!
Noting even in his day the shift toward a more
luxurious but less value-laden society, a society
that was giving away its priceless spiritual and
religious roots, Weber said in 1918 that “not
summer’s bloom lies ahead of us, but rather a
polar night of icy darkness.”
But of course not everyone agrees that religion does or should play such an essential role
in civilized society. Recently the gloves have
come off in the intellectual street fighting being
waged under the banner of the “New Atheists.”
Figures like Richard Dawkins, Sam Harris,
Daniel Dennett, and the late Christopher
Hitchens are some of the stars in what is, for
me, a dim firmament. These men are as free
to express their beliefs—or, in their case,
disbeliefs—as any other, but we feel about them
what one Oxford don said about a colleague:
“On the surface, he’s profound, but deep down,
he’s [pretty] superficial.”
Rabbi Sacks said that surely it is mindboggling to think that a group of bright secular thinkers in the twenty-first century really
believe that if they can show, for example, “that
the universe is more than 6,000 years old” or
that a rainbow can be explained other “than as
a sign of God’s covenant after the Flood,” that
somehow such stunning assertions will bring
all of “humanity’s religious beliefs . . . tumbling
down like a house of cards and we would
be left with a serene world of rational nonbelievers,”—serene except perhaps when they
whistle nervously past the local graveyard.
A much harsher assessment of this movement came from theologian David Bentley
Hart, who wrote:
Atheism that consists entirely in vacuous arguments
afloat on oceans of historical ignorance, made
turbulent by storms of strident self-righteousness,
is as contemptible as any other form of dreary
fundamentalism.
We are grateful that a large segment of the
human population does have some form of religious belief, and in that sense we have not yet
seen a “polar night of icy darkness” envelop
us. But no one can say we are not seeing some
glaciers on the move.
Charles Taylor, in his book with the descriptive title A Secular Age, described the cold dimming of socioreligious light. The shift of our
time, he said, has been
from a society in which it was virtually impossible
not to believe in God, to one in which faith, even for
the staunchest believer, is [only] one human possibility among [many] others.
Charles Taylor also wrote that now, in the
twenty-first century, “belief in God is no longer
axiomatic.” Indeed, in some quarters it is not
even a convenient option, it is “an embattled
option.”
But faith has almost always been “an embattled option” and has almost always been won—
and kept—at a price. Indeed, many who have
walked away from faith have found the price
higher than they intended to pay, such as the
man who tore down the fence surrounding his
new property only to learn that his next-door
neighbor kept a pack of particularly vicious
Rottweilers.
David Brooks hinted at this but put it much
too mildly when he wrote in his New York Times
column, “Take away [the] rich social fabric [that
religion has always been,] and what you are left
with [are] people who are uncertain about who
they really are.” My point about “too mildly”
is that a rich social fabric, important as that is,
says absolutely nothing about the moral state
of one’s soul, redemption from physical death,
overcoming spiritual alienation from God, the
perpetuation of marriage and the family unit
into eternity, and so forth—if anyone is considering such issues in a postmodern world.
In fact, religion has been the principal
influence—not the only one, but the principal
one—that has kept Western social, political,
and cultural life moral, to the extent that
these have been moral. And I shudder at how
immoral life might have been—then and
now—without that influence. Granted, religion
has no monopoly on moral action, but centuries of religious belief, including institutional
church- or synagogue- or mosque-going, have
clearly been preeminent in shaping our notions
of right and wrong. Journalist William Saletan
put it candidly: “Religion is the vehicle through
which most folks learn and practice morality.”
I am stressing such points this morning
because I have my eye on that future condition
about which Elder Maxwell warned—a time
when if we are not careful we may find religion
at the margins of society rather than at the center of it, when religious beliefs and all the good
works those beliefs have generated may be
tolerated privately but not admitted or at least
certainly not encouraged publicly. The cloud
the prophet Elijah saw in the distance no larger
than “a man’s hand” is that kind of cloud on
the political horizon today. So we speak of it by
way of warning, remembering the storm into
which Elijah’s small cloud developed.
But whatever the trouble along the way,
I am absolutely certain how this all turns out.
I know the prophecies and the promises given
to the faithful, and I know our collective religious heritage—all the Western world’s traditional religious beliefs, varied as they are—is
remarkably strong and resilient. The evidence
of that religious heritage is all around us,
including at great universities, or at least it once
was—and fortunately still is at BYU.
Just to remind us how rich the ambiance of
religion is in Western culture and because this
is Campus Education Week, let me mention just
a few of the great religiously influenced nonLDS pieces of literature that I met while pursuing my education on this campus fifty years
ago, provincial and dated as my list is. I do so
while stressing how barren our lives would
be had there not been the freedom for writers,
artists, and musicians to embrace and express
religious values or discuss religious issues.
I begin by noting the majestic literary—to
say nothing of the theological—influence of the
King James Bible, what one of the professors I
knew later at Yale called “the sublime summit
of literature in [the] English [language],” the
greatest single influence on the world’s creative
literature for the last 400 years. I think also of
what is probably the most widely read piece
of English literature other than the Bible: John
Bunyan’s Pilgrim’s Progress.
Five decades after I first read them, I am
still moved by the magnificence of two of the
greatest poems ever written by the hand of
man: Dante Alighieri’s Divine Comedy and John
Milton’s Paradise Lost. Certainly the three greatest American novels I read at BYU were Herman
Melville’s Moby Dick, Nathaniel Hawthorne’s
The Scarlet Letter, and Mark Twain’s The
Adventures of Huckleberry Finn—each in its own
way a religious text and all more meaningful
in my reading of them now than when I was a
student on this campus so long ago. So too it is
with my encounter with Russian writers, especially Fyodor Dostoyevsky and Leo Tolstoy.
Then—to name only a handful—you add
British giants like George Herbert, John Donne,
William Blake, and Robert Browning; throw
in Americans like Emily Dickinson, William
Faulkner, and Flannery O’Connor; then an
American who became British, like T. S. Eliot,
and a Briton who became American, like W. H.
Auden; and for good luck throw in an Irishman
like W. B. Yeats and you have biblical imagery,
religious conflict, and wrenching questions of
sin, society, and salvation on virtually every
page you turn.
Having mentioned a tiny bit of the religiously related literature I happened to encounter as a student, I now note an equally tiny bit
of the contribution that religious sensibility has
provoked in the heart of the visual artist and
the soul of the exultant musician.
Brothers and sisters, my testimony this
morning, as one observer recently wrote, is that
“over the long haul, religious faith has proven
itself the most powerful and enduring force in
human history.” Roman Catholic scholar Robert
Royal made the same point, reaffirming that
for many, “religion remains deep, widespread,
and persistent, to the surprise and irritation of
those who claimed to have cast aside [religious]
illusion” —to those, I might add, who underestimated the indisputable power of faith.
The indisputable power of faith. The most
powerful and enduring force in human history.
The influence for good in the world. The link
between the highest in us and our highest
hopes for others. That is why religion matters.
Voices of religious faith have elevated our
vision, deepened our human conversation, and
strengthened both our personal and collective
aspirations since time began. How do we even
begin to speak of what Abraham, Moses, David,
Isaiah, Jeremiah, Nephi, Mormon, and Moroni
have given us? Or of what Peter, James, John,
the Apostle Paul, Joseph Smith, and Thomas S.
Monson mean to us?
It is impossible to calculate the impact that
prophets and apostles have had on us, but, putting them in a special category of their own, we
6 Brigham Young University 2015–16 Speeches
can still consider the world-shaping views and
moral force that have come to us from a Martin
Luther or a John Calvin or a John Wesley in
earlier times, or from a Billy Graham or a Pope
Francis or a Dalai Lama in our current age. In
this audience today we are partly who we are
because some 450 years ago, men like Nicholas
Ridley and Hugh Latimer, being burned at
the stake in Oxford, called out to one another
that they were lighting such a religious fire in
England that it would never be put out in all
the world. Later William Wilberforce applied
just such Christian conviction to abolishing
the slave trade in Great Britain. As an ordained
minister, Martin Luther King Jr. continued the
quest for racial and civil justice through religious eloquence at the pulpit and in the street.
George Washington prayed at Valley Forge,
and Abraham Lincoln’s most cherished volume
in his library, which he read regularly, was his
Bible—out of which he sought to right a great
national wrong and from which, in victory, he
called for “malice toward none, with charity for
all, with firmness in the right as God gives us
to see the right.”
So the core landscape of history has been
sketched by the pen and brush and word of
those who invoke a Divine Creator’s involvement in our lives and who count on the ligatures of religion to bind up our wounds and
help us hold things together.
Speaking both literally and figuratively of
a recurring feature on that landscape, Will
Durant wrote:
These [church] steeples, everywhere pointing
upward, ignoring despair and lifting hope, these
lofty city spires, or simple chapels in the hills—they
rise at every step from the earth to the sky; in every
village of every nation on the globe they challenge
doubt and invite weary hearts to consolation. Is
it all a vain delusion? Is there nothing beyond life
but death, and nothing beyond death but decay?
We cannot know. But as long as men suffer these
steeples will remain.
Of course, those of us who are believers have
very specific convictions about what we can
know regarding the meaning of those ubiquitous church steeples.
In that spirit let me conclude with my
heartfelt apostolic witness of truths I do know
regarding the ultimate gift true religion provides us. I have been focusing on the social,
political, and cultural contributions that religion
has provided us for centuries, but I testify that
true religion—the gospel of Jesus Christ—gives
us infinitely more than that; it gives us “peace
in this world, and eternal life in the world to
come,” as the scripture phrases it.
True religion brings understanding of
and loyalty to our Father in Heaven and His
uncompromised love for every one of His
spirit children—past, present, and future. True
religion engenders in us faith in the Lord Jesus
Christ and hope in His Resurrection. It encourages love, forbearance, and forgiveness in our
interactions with one another, as He so magnanimously demonstrated them in His.
True religion, the tie that binds us to God and
to each other, not only seals our family relationships in eternity but also heightens our delight
in those family experiences while in mortality.
Well beyond all the civic, social, and cultural
gifts religion gives us is the mercy of a loving
Father and Son who conceived and carried out
the atoning mission of that Son, the Lord Jesus
Christ, suturing up that which was torn, bonding together that which was broken, healing
that which was ill or imperfect, “proclaim[ing]
liberty to the captives, and . . . opening . . . the
prison to them that are bound.”
Because my faith, my family, my beliefs, and
my covenants—in short, my religion—mean
everything to me, I thank my Father in Heaven
for religion and pray for the continued privilege
to speak of it so long as I shall live. May we
think upon the religious heritage that has been
handed down to us—at an incalculable price
in many instances—and in so remembering
not only cherish that heritage more fervently
but live the religious principles we say we want to
preserve. Only in the living of our religion will
the preservation of it have true meaning. It is in
that spirit that we seek the good of our fellow
men and women and work toward the earthly
kingdom of God rolling forth, so that the heavenly kingdom of God may come.
May our religious privileges be cherished,
preserved, and lived, binding us to God and
to each other until that blessed millennial day
comes, I earnestly pray in the name of Jesus
Christ, amen.

REMEMBER LOT'S WIFE

You all look so good. Sister Holland walked
in and said, “I think I’m going to cry.” You
have to understand: Give yourselves 20 or 30
years—then you’ll know how we feel coming
back here.
We love this campus. We’re thrilled to be
with you on it, and we love you personally
with all our hearts.
You have had, will have, and now have
better university presidents than I was, but
you’ll never have one who loves you and loves
this university more than I do. Thank you for
serving here, and thank you for being in attendance on a bright, clear, January morning.
We are grateful to President and Sister
Samuelson for their kindness and their leadership at this university. We actually know something about their jobs and what they entail. You
and we are very lucky to have them at the helm
of this special school, and we praise them publicly for the time they spend, the success they
are having, and the strength that they bring.
I loved every word of their counsel to you last
week, and I pray that my remarks to you today
are consistent with their messages about light,
about trust, and about the privilege it is to have
the gospel of Jesus Christ enhance our study at
BYU. President and Sister Samuelson, we do
love you. You have our prayers, our gratitude,
and our support.
The start of a new year is the traditional
time to take stock of our lives and see where
we are going, measured against the backdrop
of where we have been. I don’t want to talk to
you about New Year’s resolutions, because you
only made five of them and you have already
broken four. (I give that remaining one just
another week.) But I do want to talk to you
about the past and the future, not so much in
terms of New Year’s commitments per se, but
more with an eye toward any time of transition
and change in your lives—and those moments
come virtually every day of our lives.
As a scriptural theme for this discussion,
I have chosen the second-shortest verse in all
of holy scripture. I am told that the shortest
verse—a verse that every missionary memorizes and holds ready in case he is called on
spontaneously in a zone conference—is John
11:35: “Jesus wept.” Elders, here is a second
option, another shortie that will dazzle your
mission president in case you are called on
two zone conferences in a row. It is Luke 17:32,
where the Savior cautions, “Remember Lot’s
wife.”
Hmmm. What did He mean by such an
enigmatic little phrase? To find out, I suppose
we need to do as He suggested. Let’s recall
who Lot’s wife was.
The original story, of course, comes to us out
of the days of Sodom and Gomorrah, when the
Lord, having had as much as He could stand
of the worst that men and women could do,
told Lot and his family to flee because those
cities were about to be destroyed. “Escape
for thy life,” the Lord said, “look not behind
thee . . . ; escape to the mountain, lest thou be
consumed” (Genesis 19:17; emphasis added).
With less than immediate obedience and
more than a little negotiation, Lot and his family ultimately did leave town, but just in the
nick of time. The scriptures tell us what happened at daybreak the morning following their
escape:
The Lord rained upon Sodom and upon Gomorrah
brimstone and fire from the Lord out of heaven;
And he overthrew those cities. [Genesis
19:24–25]
Then our theme today comes in the next
verse. Surely, surely, with the Lord’s counsel
“look not behind thee” ringing clearly in her
ears, Lot’s wife, the record says, “looked back,”
and she was turned into a pillar of salt.
In the time we have this morning, I am not
going to talk to you about the sins of Sodom
and Gomorrah, nor of the comparison the Lord
Himself has made to those days and our own
time. I am not even going to talk about obedience and disobedience. I just want to talk to
you for a few minutes about looking back and
looking ahead.
One of the purposes of history is to teach
us the lessons of life. George Santayana, who
should be more widely read than he is on a
college campus, is best known for saying,
“Those who cannot remember the past are
condemned to repeat it” (Reason in Common
Sense, vol. 1 of The Life of Reason [1905–1906]).
So, if history is this important—and it surely
is—what did Lot’s wife do that was so wrong?
As something of a student of history, I have
thought about that and offer this as a partial
answer. Apparently what was wrong with Lot’s
wife was that she wasn’t just looking back; in her
heart she wanted to go back. It would appear
that even before they were past the city limits, she was already missing what Sodom and
Gomorrah had offered her. As Elder Maxwell
once said, such people know they should have
their primary residence in Zion, but they still
hope to keep a summer cottage in Babylon (see
Larry W. Gibbons, “Wherefore, Settle This in
Your Hearts,” Ensign, November 2006, 102; also
Neal A. Maxwell, A Wonderful Flood of Light
[Salt Lake City: Bookcraft, 1990], 47).
It is possible that Lot’s wife looked back
with resentment toward the Lord for what He
was asking her to leave behind. We certainly
know that Laman and Lemuel were resentful
when Lehi and his family were commanded to
leave Jerusalem. So it isn’t just that she looked
back; she looked back longingly. In short, her
attachment to the past outweighed her confidence in the future. That, apparently, was at
least part of her sin.
So, as a new year starts and we try to benefit
from a proper view of what has gone before, I
plead with you not to dwell on days now gone,
nor to yearn vainly for yesterdays, however
good those yesterdays may have been. The
past is to be learned from but not lived in. We
look back to claim the embers from glowing
experiences but not the ashes. And when we
have learned what we need to learn and have
brought with us the best that we have experienced, then we look ahead, we remember that
faith is always pointed toward the future. Faith
always has to do with blessings and truths and
events that will yet be efficacious in our lives.
So a more theological way to talk about Lot’s
wife is to say that she did not have faith. She
doubted the Lord’s ability to give her something better than she already had. Apparently
she thought—fatally, as it turned out—that
nothing that lay ahead could possibly be
as good as those moments she was leaving
behind.
It is here at this moment in this little story
that we wish Lot’s wife had been a student at
BYU enrolled in a freshman English class. With
any luck, she might have read, as I did, this
verse from Edwin Arlington Robinson:
Miniver Cheevy, child of scorn,
Grew lean while he assailed the seasons;
He wept that he was ever born,
And he had reasons.
Miniver loved the days of old
When swords were bright and steeds were prancing;
The vision of a warrior bold
Would set him dancing.
Miniver sighed for what was not,
And dreamed, and rested from his labors;
He dreamed of Thebes and Camelot,
And Priam’s neighbors. . . .
Miniver cursed the commonplace
And eyed a khaki suit with loathing;
He missed the medieval grace
Of iron clothing. . . .
Miniver Cheevy, born too late,
Scratched his head and kept on thinking;
Miniver coughed, and called it fate,
And kept on drinking.
[Miniver Cheevy (1910), stanzas 1–3, 6, 8]
To yearn to go back to a world that cannot
be lived in now; to be perennially dissatisfied
with present circumstances and have only dismal views of the future; to miss the here-andnow-and-tomorrow because we are so trapped
in the there-and-then-and-yesterday—these are
some of the sins, if we may call them that, of
both Lot’s wife and old Mr. Cheevy. (Now, as a
passing comment, I don’t know whether Lot’s
wife, like Miniver, was a drinker, but if she
was, she certainly ended up with plenty of salt
for her pretzels.)
One of my favorite books of the New
Testament is Paul’s too-seldom-read letter to
the Philippians. After reviewing the very privileged and rewarding life of his early years—his
birthright, his education, his standing in the
Jewish community—Paul says that all of that
was nothing (“dung” he calls it) compared to
his conversion to Christianity. He says, and
I paraphrase: “I have stopped rhapsodizing
about ‘the good old days’ and now eagerly
look toward the future ‘that I may apprehend
that for which Christ apprehended me.’” Then
comes this verse:
This one thing I do, forgetting those things which
are behind, and reaching forth unto those things
which are before,
I press toward the mark for the prize of the
high calling of God in Christ Jesus. [Philippians
3:13–14]
No Lot’s wife here. No looking back at
Sodom and Gomorrah here. Paul knows it is
out there in the future, up ahead wherever
heaven is taking us where we will win “the
prize of the high calling of God in Christ
Jesus.”
At this point, let me pause and add a lesson
that applies both in your own life and also in
the lives of others. There is something in us,
at least in too many of us, that particularly
fails to forgive and forget earlier mistakes in
life—either mistakes we ourselves have made
or the mistakes of others. That is not good. It
is not Christian. It stands in terrible opposition
to the grandeur and majesty of the Atonement
of Christ. To be tied to earlier mistakes—our
own or other people’s—is the worst kind of
wallowing in the past from which we are called
to cease and desist.
I was told once of a young man who for
many years was more or less the brunt of every
joke in his school. He had some disadvantages,
and it was easy for his peers to tease him. Later
in his life he moved away from his community. He eventually joined the army and had
some successful experiences there in getting an
education and generally stepping away from
his past. Above all, as many in the military do,
he discovered the beauty and majesty of the
Church and became very active and happy in it.
Then, after several years, he came back to
the town of his youth. Most of his generation
had moved on, but not all. Apparently when he
returned quite successful and quite reborn, the
same old mind-set that had existed before was
still there, waiting for his return. To the people
in his hometown he was still just old “so and
so”—you remember the guy who had the
problem, that idiosyncrasy, this quirky nature,
and did such and such and such and such. And
wasn’t it all just hilarious?
Well, you know what happened. Little by
little this man’s Pauline effort to leave that
which was behind and grasp the prize that
God had laid before him was gradually diminished until he died about the way he had lived
in his youth. He came full circle: again inactive
and unhappy and the brunt of a new generation of jokes. Yet he had had that one bright,
beautiful midlife moment when he had been
able to rise above his past and truly see who he
was and what he could become. Too bad, too
sad, that he was again to be surrounded by a
whole batch of Lot’s wives, those who thought
his past was more interesting than his future.
Yes, they managed to rip out of his grasp that
for which Christ had grasped him. And he died
even more sadly than Miniver Cheevy, though
as far as I know the story, through absolutely
no fault of his own.
That happens in marriages, too, and in
other relationships we have. I can’t tell you
the number of couples I have counseled who,
when they are deeply hurt or even just deeply
stressed, reach farther and farther into the past
to find yet a bigger brick to throw through
the window “pain” of their marriage. When
something is over and done with, when it has
been repented of as fully as it can be repented
of, when life has moved on as it should and a
lot of other wonderfully good things have happened since then, it is not right to go back and
open up some ancient wound that the Son of
God Himself died trying to heal.
Let people repent. Let people grow. Believe that
people can change and improve. Is that faith? Yes!
Is that hope? Yes! Is it charity? Yes! Above all, it
is charity, the pure love of Christ. If something
is buried in the past, leave it buried. Don’t keep
going back with your little sand pail and beach
shovel to dig it up, wave it around, and then
throw it at someone, saying, “Hey! Do you
remember this?” Splat!
Well, guess what? That is probably going to
result in some ugly morsel being dug up out of
your landfill with the reply, “Yeah, I remember
it. Do you remember this?” Splat.
And soon enough everyone comes out of
that exchange dirty and muddy and unhappy
and hurt, when what God, our Father in
Heaven, pleads for is cleanliness and kindness
and happiness and healing.
Such dwelling on past lives, including past
mistakes, is just not right! It is not the gospel of
Jesus Christ. It is worse than Miniver Cheevy,
and in some ways worse than Lot’s wife,
because at least there he and she were only
destroying themselves. In these cases of marriage and family and wards and apartments
and neighborhoods, we can end up destroying
so many, many others.
Perhaps at this beginning of a new year
there is no greater requirement for us than to
do as the Lord Himself said He does: “Behold,
he who has repented of his sins, the same is
forgiven, and I, the Lord, remember them no
more” (D&C 58:42).
The proviso, of course, is that repentance
has to be sincere, but when it is and when
honest effort is being made to progress, we
are guilty of the greater sin if we keep remembering and recalling and rebashing someone
with their earlier mistakes—and that “someone” might be ourselves. We can be so hard
on ourselves, often much more so than with
others!
Now, like the Anti-Nephi-Lehies of the Book
of Mormon, bury your weapons of war, and
leave them buried. Forgive, and do that which
is harder than to forgive: Forget. And when it
comes to mind again, forget it again.
You can remember just enough to avoid
repeating the mistake, but then put the rest of
it all on the dung heap Paul spoke of to those
Philippians. Dismiss the destructive and keep
dismissing it until the beauty of the Atonement
of Christ has revealed to you your bright future
and the bright future of your family and your
friends and your neighbors. God doesn’t care
nearly as much about where you have been as
He does about where you are and, with His
help, where you are willing to go. That is the
thing Lot’s wife didn’t get—and neither did
Laman and Lemuel and a host of others in the
scriptures.
This is an important matter to consider at
the start of a new year—and every day ought
to be the start of a new year and a new life.
Such is the wonder of faith and repentance and
the miracle of the gospel of Jesus Christ.
We started this hour with a little verse
remembered from one of my BYU English
classes. May I move toward a close with a few
lines from another favorite poet whom I probably met in that same class or one similar to it.
For the benefit of all BYU students in the new
year of 2009, Robert Browning wrote:
Grow old along with me!
The best is yet to be,
The last of life, for which the first was made:
Our times are in His hand
Who saith, “A whole I planned,
Youth shows but half; trust God: see all, nor be
afraid!”
Sister Holland and I were married about the
time both of us were reading poems like that in
BYU classrooms. We were as starstruck—and
as fearful—as most of you are at these ages
and stages of life. We had absolutely no money.
Zero. For a variety of reasons, neither of our
families was able to help finance our education.
We had a small apartment just south of campus—the smallest we could find: two rooms
and a half bath. We were both working too
many hours trying to stay afloat financially, but
we had no other choice.
I remember one fall day—I think it was
in the first semester after our marriage in
1963—we were walking together up the hill
past the Maeser Building on the sidewalk that
led between the President’s Home and the
Brimhall Building. Somewhere on that path
we stopped and wondered what we had gotten ourselves into. Life that day seemed so
overwhelming, and the undergraduate plus
graduate years that we still anticipated before
us seemed monumental, nearly insurmountable. Our love for each other and our commitment to the gospel were strong, but most of all
the other temporal things around us seemed
particularly ominous.
On a spot that I could probably still mark for
you today, I turned to Pat and said something
like this: “Honey, should we give up? I can get
a good job and carve out a good living for us.
I can do some things. I’ll be okay without a
degree. Should we stop trying to tackle what
right now seems so difficult to face?”
In my best reenactment of Lot’s wife, I said,
in effect, “Let’s go back. Let’s go home. The
future holds nothing for us.”
Then my beloved little bride did what she
has done for 45 years since then. She grabbed
me by the lapels and said, “We are not going
back. We are not going home. The future holds
everything for us.”
She stood there in the sunlight that day
and gave me a real talk. I don’t recall that she
quoted Paul, but there was certainly plenty in
her voice that said she was committed to setting
aside all that was past in order to “press toward
the mark” and seize the prize of God that lay
yet ahead. It was a living demonstration of
faith. It was “the substance of things hoped for,
the evidence of things not seen” (Hebrews 11:1).
So we laughed, kept walking, and finished up
sharing a root beer—one glass, two straws—at
the then newly constructed Wilkinson Center.
Twenty years later I would, on occasion,
look out of the window of the President’s
Home across the street from the Brimhall
Building and picture there on the sidewalk
two newlywed BYU students, down on their
money and down even more on their confidence. And as I would gaze out that window,
usually at night, I would occasionally see not
Pat and Jeff Holland but you and you and you,
walking that same sidewalk. I would see you
sometimes as couples, sometimes as a group
of friends, sometimes as just a lone student.
I knew something of what you were feeling.
Some of you were having thoughts such as
these: Is there any future for me? What does a
new year or a new semester or a new major or
a new romance hold for me? Will I be safe? Will
life be sound? Can I trust in the Lord and in the
future? Or would it be better to look back, to
go back, to go home?
To all such of every generation, I call out,
“Remember Lot’s wife.” Faith is for the future.
Faith builds on the past but never longs to stay
there. Faith trusts that God has great things
in store for each of us and that Christ truly
is the “high priest of good things to come”
(Hebrews 9:11).
My young brothers and sisters, I pray you
will have a wonderful semester, a wonderful new year, and a wonderful life all filled
with faith and hope and charity. Keep your
eyes on your dreams, however distant and far
away. Live to see the miracles of repentance
and forgiveness, of trust and divine love that
will transform your life today, tomorrow, and
forever. That is a New Year’s resolution I ask
you to keep, and I leave a blessing on you—
every one of you—to be able to do so and to
be happy, in the name of Him who makes it all
possible, even the Lord Jesus Christ, amen.

LESSONS FROM LIBERTY JAIL

My beloved young friends, it is a thrill for
Sister Holland and for me to be with you
tonight for this worldwide satellite broadcast.
It’s always a thrill to be in the Marriott Center.
I wish it were possible for us to be in each of
your individual locations, seeing you personally and being able to shake your hands. We
haven’t figured out a way to do that yet, but
we send our love and greeting to all of you
wherever you are in the world. In spite of the
vastness of our global audience, we hope all
of you are individually able to feel the love
we have for you tonight and that each of you
can gain something from our message that is
applicable in your personal lives.
The Prophet in Liberty Jail
 One of the great blessings of our assignments
as General Authorities is the chance to visit
members of the Church in various locations
around the world and to glean from the history
that our members have experienced across the
globe. In that spirit I wish to share with you
tonight some feelings that came to me during
a Church assignment I had last spring when
I was assigned to visit the Platte City stake in
western Missouri, here in the United States.
The Platte City Missouri Stake lies adjacent to the Liberty Missouri Stake, now a very
famous location in Church history encompassing several important Church history sites,
including the ironically named Liberty Jail.
From your study of Church history, you will all
know something of the experience the Prophet
Joseph Smith and his brethren had while
imprisoned in that facility during the winter of
1838–39. This was a terribly difficult time in our
history for the Church generally and certainly
for the Prophet Joseph himself, who bore the
brunt of the persecution in that period. Indeed,
I daresay that until his martyrdom five and a
half years later, there was no more burdensome
time in Joseph’s life than this cruel, illegal, and
unjustified incarceration in Liberty Jail.
Time does not permit a detailed discussion
of the experiences that led up to this moment
in Church history, but suffice it to say that
problems of various kinds had been building
ever since the Prophet Joseph had received a
revelation in July of 1831 designating Missouri
as the place “consecrated for the gathering of
the saints” and the building up of “the city of
Zion” (D&C 57:1, 2). By October of 1838, all-out
war seemed inevitable between Mormon and
non-Mormon forces confronting each other
over these issues. After being driven from several of the counties in the western part of that
state and under the presumption they had been
invited to discuss ways of defusing the volatile situation that had developed, five leaders
of the Church, including the Prophet Joseph,
marching under a flag of truce, approached
the camp of the Missouri militia near the small
settlement of Far West, located in Caldwell
County.
As it turned out, the flag of truce was
meaningless, and the Church leaders were
immediately put in chains and placed under
heavy guard. The morning after this arrest, two
more Latter-day Saint leaders, including the
Prophet’s brother Hyrum, were taken prisoner,
making a total of seven in captivity.
Injustice swiftly moved forward toward
potential tragedy when a military “court” convened by officers of that militia ordered that
Joseph Smith and the six other prisoners all
be taken to the public square at Far West and
summarily shot. To his eternal credit, Brigadier
General Alexander Doniphan, an officer in
the Missouri forces, boldly and courageously
refused to carry out the inhumane, unjustifiable order. In a daring stand that could have
brought him his own court-martial, he cried
out against the commanding officer:
It is cold-blooded murder. I will not obey your
order. . . . And if you execute these men, I will hold
you responsible before an earthly tribunal, so help
me God.
In showing such courage and integrity,
Doniphan not only saved the lives of these
seven men but endeared himself forever to
Latter-day Saints in every generation.
Their execution averted, these seven Church
leaders were marched on foot from Far West
to Independence, then from Independence
to Richmond. Parley P. Pratt was remanded
to nearby Daviess County for trial there, and
the other six prisoners, including Joseph and
Hyrum, were sent to Liberty, the county seat
of neighboring Clay County, to await trial there
the next spring. They arrived in Liberty on
December 1, 1838, just as winter was coming on.
The jail, one of the few and certainly one
of the more forbidding of such structures in
that region, was considered escape proof, and
it probably was. It had two stories. The top or
main floor was accessible to the outside world
only by a single small, heavy door. In the
middle of that floor was a trapdoor through
which prisoners were then lowered into the
lower floor or dungeon. The outside walls of
the prison were of rough-hewn limestone two
feet thick, with inside walls of 12-inch oak logs.
These two walls were separated by a 12-inch
space filled with loose rock. Combined, these
walls made a formidable, virtually impenetrable barrier four feet thick.
In the dungeon the floor-to-ceiling height
was barely six feet, and inasmuch as some of
the men, including the Prophet Joseph, were
over six feet tall, this meant that when standing they were constantly in a stooped position,
and when lying it was mostly upon the rough,
bare stones of the prison floor covered here and
there by a bit of loose, dirty straw or an occasional dirty straw mat.
The food given to the prisoners was coarse
and sometimes contaminated, so filthy that one
of them said they “could not eat it until [they]
were driven to it by hunger.” On as many as
four occasions they had poison administered
to them in their food, making them so violently
ill that for days they alternated between vomiting and a kind of delirium, not really caring
whether they lived or died. In the Prophet
Joseph’s letters, he spoke of the jail being a
hell, surrounded with demons . . . where we are compelled to hear nothing but blasphemous oaths, and
witness a scene of blasphemy, and drunkenness and
hypocrisy, and debaucheries of every description.3
Jeffrey R. Holland 
“We have . . . not blankets sufficient to keep
us warm,” he said, “and when we have a
fire, we are obliged to have almost a constant
smoke.” “Our souls have been bowed down”
and “my nerve trembles from long confinement.” “Pen, or tongue, or angels,” Joseph
wrote, could not adequately describe “the malice of hell” that he suffered there. And all of
this occurred during what, by some accounts,
was considered then the coldest winter on
record in the state of Missouri.
It is not my purpose to make this a speech
about the sorrow and difficulty these men
confronted in Liberty Jail, so let me put a few
photos on the screen and conclude this little
introductory portion of my message. I promise
I have something else in mind to say. Here is
a photo of the jail pretty much as it stood at the
time Joseph and his brethren were incarcerated
there.
Here is a photo taken some years later when
officers and historians from the Church visited
the location. I’m not sure if that fellow on top is
trying to get out or get in. Here is a cross
section of the Church’s reconstruction of the
prison, which can now be seen at our visitors’
center there. Note the two-story arrangement
with a rope and bucket, the only link between
the dungeon and the upper floor. Here
is a painting by Liz Lemon Swindle showing
Joseph in prayer. Note the forlorn, longing look
on Joseph’s face. And
here’s a portrayal by Greg Olsen showing how
Joseph may have written some of the revelations that came during this imprisonment.
And this is my final
photo, which leads me to the real message
I have come to give tonight.
A Prison-Temple Experience
Most of us, most of the time, speak of the
facility at Liberty as a “jail” or a “prison”—and
certainly it was that. But Elder Brigham H.
Roberts, in recording the history of the Church,
spoke of the facility as a temple, or, more
accurately, a “prison-temple.” Elder Neal A.
Maxwell used the same phrasing in some of
his writings. Certainly it lacked the purity,
the beauty, the comfort, and the cleanliness
of our true temples, our dedicated temples.
The speech and behavior of the guards and
criminals who came there was anything but
templelike. In fact, the restricting brutality and
injustice of this experience at Liberty would
make it seem the very antithesis of the liberating, merciful spirit of our temples and the ordinances that are performed in them. So in what
sense could Liberty Jail be called a “temple”—
or at least a kind of temple—in the development of Joseph Smith personally and in his role
as a prophet? And what does such a title tell
us about God’s love and teachings, including
where and when that love and those teachings
are made manifest?
 As we think on these things, does it strike us
that spiritual experience, revelatory experience,
sacred experience can come to every one of us
in all the many and varied stages and circumstances of our lives if we want it, if we hold on
and pray on, and if we keep our faith strong
through our difficulties? We love and cherish
our dedicated temples and the essential, exalting ordinances that are performed there. We
thank heaven and the presiding Brethren that
more and more of them are being built, giving
more and more of us greater access to them.
They are truly the holiest, most sacred structures in the kingdom of God, to which we all
ought to go as worthily and as often as possible.
But tonight’s message is that when you have
to, you can have sacred, revelatory, profoundly
instructive experience with the Lord in any
situation you are in. Indeed, let me say that
even a little stronger: You can have sacred,
revelatory, profoundly instructive experience
with the Lord in the most miserable experiences
of your life—in the worst settings, while enduring the most painful injustices, when facing the
most insurmountable odds and opposition you
have ever faced.
 Now let’s talk about those propositions
for a moment. Every one of us, in one way or
another, great or small, dramatic or incidental,
is going to spend a little time in Liberty Jail—
spiritually speaking. We will face things we do
not want to face for reasons that may not have
been our fault. Indeed, we may face difficult
circumstances for reasons that were absolutely
right and proper, reasons that came because
we were trying to keep the commandments of
the Lord. We may face persecution; we may
endure heartache and separation from loved
ones; we may be hungry and cold and forlorn.
Yes, before our lives are over we may all be
given a little taste of what the prophets faced
often in their lives. But the lessons of the winter
of 1838–39 teach us that every experience can
become a redemptive experience if we remain
bonded to our Father in Heaven through that
difficulty. These difficult lessons teach us that
man’s extremity is God’s opportunity, and if
we will be humble and faithful, if we will be
believing and not curse God for our problems,
He can turn the unfair and inhumane and
debilitating prisons of our lives into temples—
or at least into a circumstance that can bring
comfort and revelation, divine companionship
and peace.
 Let me push this just a little further. I’ve just
said that hard times can happen to us. President
Joseph Fielding Smith, grandnephew of the
Prophet Joseph and grandson of the incarcerated Hyrum, said something even stronger
than that when he dedicated the Liberty Jail
Visitors’ Center in 1963. Alluding to the kind
of history we’ve reviewed tonight and looking
on the scene where his grandfather and granduncle were so unjustly held, he said perhaps
such things have to happen—not only can they
happen, perhaps they have to. Said he:
As I have read the history of those days, the days
that went before and days that came after, I have
reached the conclusion that the hardships, the persecution, the almost universal opposition [toward
the Church at that time] were necessary. At any
rate they became school teachers to our people. They
helped to make [them] strong.
Lessons from Liberty Jail
Well, without trying to determine which of
these kinds of experiences in our life are “mandatory” and which are “optional” but still good
for us, may I suggest just a very few of the lessons learned at Liberty—those experiences that
were “school teachers” to Joseph and can be to
us, experiences that contribute so much to our
education in mortality and our exaltation in
eternity.
In selecting these lessons I note yet another
kind of blessing that came out of this adversity. To make the points that I am now going
to try to make in my message to you, I have
drawn directly upon the revelatory words that
came from the lips of Joseph Smith during this
heartbreaking time, words that we now have
canonized as sacred scripture in the Doctrine
and Covenants. I guess we’re not supposed to
have favorite scriptures, and I have enough of
them that you won’t be able to pin me down to
one or two, but certainly any list of my favorite
scriptures would have to include those written
from the darkness of Liberty Jail.
So what we instantly learn is that God was
not only teaching Joseph Smith in that prison
circumstance but He was teaching all of us,
for generations yet to come. What a scriptural
gift! And what a high price was paid for it!
But how empty would our lives as Latter-day
Saints be if we did not have sections 121, 122,
and 123 of the Doctrine and Covenants. If you
have not read them recently, I want you to read
them tonight, or tomorrow at the latest—no
later. That is your homework assignment, and
I will be checking on you! They are contained
in total on a mere six pages of text, but those
six pages will touch your heart with their
beauty and their power. And they will remind
you that God often “moves in a mysterious
way His wonders to perform.” In any case,
He certainly turned adversity into blessing
in giving us those sacred writings and reflections, so pure, noble, and Christian in both tone
and content, yet produced in such an impure,
ignoble, and unchristian setting.
1. Everyone Faces Trying Times
 Now then, three lessons from Liberty Jail:
May I suggest that the first of these is inherent in what I’ve already said—that everyone, including (and perhaps especially) the
righteous, will be called upon to face trying
times. When that happens we can sometimes
fear God has abandoned us, and we might be
left, at least for a time, to wonder when our
troubles will ever end. As individuals, as families, as communities, and as nations, probably
everyone has had or will have an occasion to
feel as Joseph Smith felt when he asked why
such sorrow had to come and how long its
darkness and damage would remain. We identify with him when he cries from the depth and
discouragement of his confinement:
O God, where art thou? . . .
How long shall thy hand be stayed . . . ?
Yea, O Lord, how long shall [thy people] suffer
. . . before . . . thy bowels be moved with compassion
toward them? [D&C 121:1–3]
That is a painful, personal cry—a cry from
the heart, a spiritual loneliness we may all have
occasion to feel at some time in our lives.
Perhaps you have had such moments
already in your young lives. If so, I hope you
have not had too many. But whenever these
moments of our extremity come, we must not
succumb to the fear that God has abandoned
us or that He does not hear our prayers. He
does hear us. He does see us. He does love us.
When we are in dire circumstances and want to
cry “Where art Thou?” it is imperative that we
remember He is right there with us—where He
has always been! We must continue to believe,
continue to have faith, continue to pray and
plead with heaven, even if we feel for a time
our prayers are not heard and that God has
somehow gone away. He is there. Our prayers
are heard. And when we weep He and the
angels of heaven weep with us.
When lonely, cold, hard times come, we
have to endure, we have to continue, we have
to persist. That was the Savior’s message in the
parable of the importuning widow (see Luke
18:1–8; see also Luke 11:5–10). Keep knocking
on that door. Keep pleading. In the meantime,
know that God hears your cries and knows
your distress. He is your Father, and you are
His child.
When what has to be has been and when
what lessons to be learned have been learned,
it will be for us as it was for the Prophet
Joseph. Just at the time he felt most alone and
distant from heaven’s ear was the very time
he received the wonderful ministration of the
Spirit and wonderful, glorious answers that
came from his Father in Heaven. Into this
dismal dungeon and this depressing time,
the voice of God came, saying:
My son, peace be unto thy soul; thine adversity
and thine afflictions shall be but a small moment;
And then, if thou endure it well, God shall exalt
thee on high; thou shalt triumph over all thy foes.
[D&C 121:7–8]
 Even though seemingly unjust circumstances may be heaped upon us and even
though unkind and unmerited things may
be done to us—perhaps by those we consider
enemies but also, in some cases, by those
whom we thought were friends—nevertheless,
through it all, God is with us. That is why
we had our marvelous choir sing tonight
Sarah Adams’ traditional, old Christian
hymn “Nearer, My God, to Thee” with that
seldom-sung fourth verse, which they sang
so beautifully:
Out of my stony griefs
Bethel I’ll raise;
So by my woes to be
Nearer, my God, to thee.
We are not alone in our little prisons here.
When suffering, we may in fact be nearer to
God than we’ve ever been in our entire lives.
That knowledge can turn every such situation
into a would-be temple.
 Regarding our earthly journey, the Lord has
promised:
I will go before your face. I will be on your right
hand and on your left, and my Spirit shall be in
your hearts, and mine angels round about you,
to bear you up. [D&C 84:88]
That is an everlasting declaration of God’s
love and care for us, including—and perhaps
especially—in times of trouble.
2. Even the Worthy Will Suffer
Secondly, we need to realize that just
because difficult things happen—sometimes
unfair and seemingly unjustified things—it
does not mean that we are unrighteous or that
we are unworthy of blessings or that God is
disappointed in us. Of course sinfulness does
bring suffering, and the only answer to that
behavior is repentance. But sometimes suffering comes to the righteous, too. You will
recall that from the depths of Liberty Jail when
Joseph was reminded that he had indeed been
“cast . . . into trouble,” had passed through
tribulation and been falsely accused, had been
torn away from his family and cast into a pit,
into the hands of murderers, nevertheless,
he was to remember that the same thing had
happened to the Savior of the world, and because
He was triumphant, so shall we be (see D&C
122:4–7). In giving us this sober reminder of
what the Savior went through, the revelation
from Liberty Jail records: “The Son of Man hath
descended below them all. Art thou greater
than he?” (D&C 122:8).
 No. Joseph was not greater than the Savior,
and neither are we. And when we promise
to follow the Savior, to walk in His footsteps
and be His disciples, we are promising to go
where that divine path leads us. And the path
of salvation has always led one way or another
through Gethsemane. So if the Savior faced
such injustices and discouragements, such
persecutions, unrighteousness, and suffering,
we cannot expect that we are not going to
face some of that if we still intend to call ourselves His true disciples and faithful followers.
And it certainly underscores the fact that the
righteous—in the Savior’s case, the personification of righteousness—can be totally worthy
before God and still suffer.
In fact, it ought to be a matter of great
doctrinal consolation to us that Jesus, in the
course of the Atonement, experienced all of the
heartache and sorrow, all of the disappointments and injustices that the entire family of
man had experienced and would experience
from Adam and Eve to the end of the world in
order that we would not have to face them so
severely or so deeply. However heavy our load
might be, it would be a lot heavier if the Savior
had not gone that way before us and carried
that burden with us and for us.
 Very early in the Prophet Joseph’s ministry,
the Savior taught him this doctrine. After
speaking of sufferings so exquisite to feel and
so hard to bear, Jesus said:
I, God, have suffered these things for all, that they
[and that means you and I and everyone] might
not suffer if they would repent. [D&C 19:16]
Jeffrey R. Holland 7
In our moments of pain and trial, I guess
we would shudder to think it could be worse,
but the answer to that is clearly that it could
be worse and it would be worse. Only through
our faith and repentance and obedience to the
gospel that provided the sacred Atonement is it
kept from being worse.
 Furthermore, we note that not only has
the Savior suffered, in His case entirely innocently, but so have most of the prophets and
other great men and women recorded in the
scriptures. Name an Old Testament or Book
of Mormon prophet, name a New Testament
Apostle, name virtually any of the leaders in
any dispensation, including our own, and you
name someone who has had trouble.
My point? If you are having a bad day,
you’ve got a lot of company—very, very good
company. The best company that has ever
lived.
 Now, don’t misunderstand. We don’t have
to look for sorrow. We don’t have to seek to
be martyrs. Trouble has a way of finding us
even without our looking for it. But when it is
obvious that a little time in Liberty Jail waits
before you (spiritually speaking), remember
these first two truths taught to Joseph in that
prison-temple. First, God has not forgotten you,
and second, the Savior has been where you
have been, allowing Him to provide for your
deliverance and your comfort.
 As the prophet Isaiah wrote, the Lord has
“graven thee upon the palms of [His] hands”
(Isaiah 49:16), permanently written right there
in scar tissue with Roman nails as the writing
instrument. Having paid that price in the suffering that They have paid for you, the Father
and the Son will never forget nor forsake you
in your suffering. (See Isaiah 49:14–16; see
also 1 Nephi 21:14–16.) They have planned,
prepared, and guaranteed your victory if
you desire it, so be believing and “endure
it well” (D&C 121:8). In the end it “shall be
for thy good” (D&C 122:7), and you will see
“everlasting dominion” flow unto you forever
and ever “without compulsory means” (D&C
121:46).
3. Remain Calm, Patient, Charitable,
and Forgiving
Thirdly, and tonight lastly, may I remind
us all that in the midst of these difficult feelings when one could justifiably be angry or
reactionary or vengeful, wanting to return an
eye for an eye and a tooth for a tooth, the Lord
reminds us from the Liberty Jail prison-temple
that
the rights of the priesthood are inseparably connected with the powers of heaven, and that the powers of heaven cannot be controlled nor handled only
[or “except”] upon the principles of righteousness.
[D&C 121:36]
Therefore, even when we face such distressing circumstances in our life and there
is something in us that wants to strike out at
God or man or friend or foe, we must remember that “no power or influence can or ought
to be maintained [except] by persuasion, by
long-suffering, by gentleness and meekness,
and by love unfeigned; . . . without hypocrisy,
and without guile” (D&C 121:41–42; emphasis
added).
It has always been a wonderful testimony to
me of the Prophet Joseph’s greatness and the
greatness of all of our prophets, including and
especially the Savior of the world in His magnificence, that in the midst of such distress and
difficulty they could remain calm and patient,
charitable, and forgiving—that they could
even talk that way, let alone live that way. But
they could, and they did. They remembered
their covenants, they disciplined themselves,
and they knew that we must live the gospel
at all times, not just when it is convenient and
not just when things are going well. Indeed,
they knew that the real test of our faith and
our Christian discipleship is when things are
not going smoothly. That is when we get to
8 Brigham Young University 2008–2009 Speeches
see what we’re made of and how strong our
commitment to the gospel really is.
Surely the classic example of this is that in
the most painful hours of the Crucifixion the
Savior could say, “Father, forgive them; for
they know not what they do” (Luke 23:34).
That is a hard thing to ask when we’re hurting.
That is a hard thing to do when we’ve been
offended or are tired or stressed out or suffering innocently. But that is when Christian
behavior may matter the most. Remember,
“the powers of heaven cannot be controlled
nor handled [except] upon the principles of
righteousness.” And do we need the powers
of heaven with us at such times! As Joseph
was taught in this prison-temple, even in
distress and sorrow we must “let [our] bowels
. . . be full of charity towards all men . . . ;
then [and only then] shall [our] confidence
wax strong in the presence of God; and . . . the
Holy Ghost shall be [our] constant companion”
(D&C 121:45–46).
 Remaining true to our Christian principles is
the only way divine influence can help us. The
Spirit has a near-impossible task to get through
to a heart that is filled with hate or anger or
vengeance or self-pity. Those are all antithetical to the Spirit of the Lord. On the other hand,
the Spirit finds instant access to a heart striving
to be charitable and forgiving, long-suffering
and kind—principles of true discipleship.
What a testimony that gospel principles are
to apply at all times and in all situations and
that if we strive to remain faithful, the triumph
of a Christian life can never be vanquished,
no matter how grim the circumstance might
be. How I love the majesty of these elegant,
celestial teachings taught, ironically, in such
a despicable setting and time.
Do All Things Cheerfully
 As a valedictory to the lessons from Liberty
Jail, I refer to the last verse of the last section of
these three we have been referring to tonight.
In this final canonized statement of the Liberty
Jail experience, the Lord says to us through His
prophet, Joseph Smith:
Therefore, dearly beloved brethren [and sisters,
when we are in even the most troubling of
times], let us cheerfully do all things that lie in
our power; and then may we stand still, with the
utmost assurance, to see the salvation of God, and
for his arm to be revealed. [D&C 123:17; emphasis
added]
What a tremendously optimistic and faithful concluding declaration to be issued from
a prison-temple! When he wrote those lines,
Joseph did not know when he would be
released or if he would ever be released. There
was every indication that his enemies were
still planning to take his life. Furthermore, his
wife and children were alone, frightened, often
hungry, wondering how they would fend
for themselves without their husband and
father. The Saints, too, were without homes
and without their prophet. They were leaving
Missouri, heading for Illinois, but who knew
what tragedies were awaiting them there?
Surely, to say it again, it was the bleakest and
darkest of times.
 Yet in these cold, lonely hours, Joseph says
let us do all we can and do it cheerfully. And
then we can justifiably turn to the Lord, wait
upon His mercy, and see His arm revealed in
our behalf.
What a magnificent attitude to maintain in
good times or bad, in sorrow or in joy!
Blessing and Testimony
My beloved young friends, as part of my
concluding testimony to you tonight, I wish to
give you a blessing. It seems to me that as our
apostolic witnesses are taken into the world,
we have two opportunities and, indeed, perhaps obligations. One is to testify and bear
witness, as I have been trying to do and will
conclude in doing. The other is to bless—as the
ancient Apostles did when the Savior invited
Jeffrey R. Holland 9
them to do as He had done, except that it
would be in all the world.
So for every one of you in attendance
tonight—here in this vast auditorium or in
other locations around the world—I bless
every one of you, each one of you in your individual circumstances, as if my hands were on
your head. I offer that to you as honestly as I
offer my testimony. I bless you in the name of
the Lord that God does love you, does hear
your prayers, is at your side, and will never
leave you.
I bless the brethren that you—that we—
will be worthy of the priesthood we bear, that
we will live true to the discipleship to which
we have been called, in that great order, the
Holy Priesthood, after the Order of the Son
of God. I bless you that we will really be like
the Master—that we will think more like He
thinks, that we will talk more like He talks, and
that we will do more of what He did. I bless
you brethren as you strive to be faithful that
you will have all the blessings of the priesthood, many of which we have quoted tonight
from these very sections from the Doctrine
and Covenants.
I bless the sisters within this audience and
within the sound of my voice. I would have
you know how much we cherish you, how
much God cherishes you, and how much the
flag of faith has been flown by the sisters of
this Church from the beginning. In every generation, it would seem, from the beginning of
time down to the present hour and beyond, so
often it has been the women in our lives—our
grandmothers, our mothers, our wives, our
daughters, our sisters, our granddaughters—
who have taken that torch of faith and that
banner of beautiful living and have carried
gospel principles wherever it would take them,
against whatever hardship, into their own little
equivalent of Liberty Jails and difficult times.
Sisters, we love you and honor you and bless
you. We ask that every righteous desire of your
heart, tonight and forever, be answered upon
your head and that you will walk away from
this devotional with the understanding and the
knowledge firmly in your heart as to how much
God and heaven and the presiding Brethren of
this Church love you and honor you.
I salute you young adults of this Church
in this great CES congregation and say that
the future is in your hands. Those of us of my
generation have to, in the very near future,
pass the baton to you. God bless you to face
those times with the valor, the honesty, and the
integrity we have spoken of here tonight.
In closing, I testify that the Father and the
Son do live. And I testify that They are close,
perhaps even closest via the Holy Spirit,
when we are experiencing difficult times.
I testify (and as our closing musical number,
“My Kindness Shall Not Depart from Thee,”
will testify, quoting the prophet Isaiah) that
heaven’s kindness will never depart from
you, regardless of what happens (see Isaiah
54:7–10; see also 3 Nephi 22:7–10). I testify that
bad days come to an end, that faith always
triumphs, and that heavenly promises are
always kept. I testify that God is our Father,
that Jesus is the Christ, that this is the true
and living gospel—found in this, the true and
living Church. I testify that President Thomas
S. Monson is a prophet of God, our prophet
for this hour and this day. I love him and sustain him as I know you do. In the words of
the Liberty Jail prison-temple experience, my
young friends, “Hold on thy way. . . . Fear not
. . . , for God shall be with you forever and
ever” (D&C 122:9). In the name of Jesus Christ,
amen.

TERROR,TRIUMPH

Thank you for coming, even if you did
know who the speaker would be. It’s a
thrill for me to be with you tonight. Where did
you all come from? (Don’t answer that! We
don’t have time.) And although I can’t see all
of you, I am very conscious of the wonderful,
much larger satellite audience gathered in so
many other locations around the world—some
80,000 or so of you. We welcome all of you,
and I thank you for your attendance and your
invitation to me to speak.
 I want to excuse Sister Holland tonight.
She would have dearly loved being with us,
but she is in Houston, Texas, tonight, helping
with a brand-new granddaughter born to our
daughter and son-in-law there. If those of you
gathered in Houston turn around slowly and
look near the back of the room, you may see a
cute little grandmother hiding on the back row
pretending to be an institute student. Now I
know full well how young she looks, brethren,
but please, she is already taken. I appreciate
her support there just as much as if she were
here at my side tonight. I bring you her love,
and only such duty as grandmothers have at
such times would keep her from being here
with us. “Hermana Holland, te amo.”
 As many of you know, Sister Holland and I
have just returned from a two-year assignment
in Chile, where, like so many of you tonight are
doing, we sat with young adults and institute
students in stake centers half a world away,
receiving these broadcasts far from Church
headquarters. We too felt the Spirit of the Lord
and the love of our leaders. We especially felt
the fellowship of thousands around the world,
like you, who were the same age, shared the
same faith, and wanted the same things for a
full and happy future.
 I come tonight very mindful of my young
friends in Chile but equally mindful of all our
other friends around the world—in England
and France, in Korea and Japan, in Australia
and Nigeria and the Ukraine, to say nothing of
the legions of you gathered throughout North
America. Bienvenidos to all of you, whatever
language you speak, and please know that I
love you. There is such strength in our numbers. I pray for the Spirit and blessings of the
Lord to be upon all of us and earnestly desire
that what I say will be of some value to each
of you.
Terror
 I want to speak to you tonight in the context
of ongoing anxiety in the world and some of
the challenges we face at home and abroad. Of
course there have always been challenges in
every age and dispensation, but yesterday—
September 11—was the third anniversary of a
violent and near-unimaginable event that
rocked the whole world. Indeed, the aftermath
of that act has dramatically and perhaps permanently affected many of the ways in which the
world now lives. Perhaps with such an anniversary yesterday, the fears and concerns of our
modern times are still in your hearts today.
 In any case, certainly our neighbors—the
citizens of the nations to which we are beaming
this broadcast tonight—have, since September
11, 2001, been dangling off balance, have been
made more fearful, and have been alarmed by
international events and the almost wholesale
new use of the word terror. Not many years
ago that word was reserved almost entirely for
B-grade movie advertisements and Stephen
King novels. Now, sadly, it is daily fare in our
newspapers and so common in conversation
that even young children, including the schoolchildren in Russia, are conscious that the world
in which we live can be brutally, criminally
affected by people called “terrorists.” And
there are other disasters of other kinds, natural
and otherwise, documented in the news that
remind us that life can be fragile, that life can
present fateful turns of events.
The Last Days
 Against that backdrop, I know that many of
you have wondered in your hearts what all of
this means regarding the end of the world and
your life in it. Many have asked, “Is this the
hour of the Second Coming of the Savior and
all that is prophesied surrounding that event?”
Indeed, sometime not long after 9-11, I had a
missionary ask me in all honesty and full of
faith, “Elder Holland, are these the last days?”
I saw the earnestness in his face and some of
the fear in his eyes, and I wanted to be reassuring. I thought perhaps an arm around him and
some humor could relieve his anxiety a little.
Giving him a hug, I said, “Elder, I may not be
the brightest person alive, but even I know the
name of the Church.” We then talked about
being Latter-day Saints. I said, “Yes, Elder, we
are in the last days, but there is really nothing
new about that. The promised Second Coming
of the Savior began with the First Vision of the
Prophet Joseph Smith in 1820. So we already
have about 184 years of experience seeing the
Second Coming and the last days unfold. We
can be certain that we are in the last days—
years and years of them,” I said, and gave him
a friendly shake of the hand and sent him on
his way.
 He smiled, seemed more reassured to put
all this in some context, and went on his way.
I assume he has long since finished a successful mission and is now happily at home getting
on with his life, perhaps even sitting in this
audience somewhere looking for a wife! (He’d
better be.)
 I hasten to say that I do know what this
young man was really asking. What he really
meant was, “Will I finish my mission? Is there
any point in getting an education? Can I hope
for a marriage? Do I have a future? Is there any
happiness ahead for me?” And I say to all of
you what I said three years ago to him: “Yes,
certainly—to all those questions.”
 As far as the actual timing of the final,
publicly witnessed Second Coming itself and
its earthshaking events, I do not know when
that will happen. Furthermore, President
Gordon B. Hinckley has said that he doesn’t
know when it will happen, and that is because
no one knows when it will happen. The Savior
said that even the angels in heaven would not
know (see Matthew 24:36).
 We should watch for the signs and read
the meaning of the seasons, we should live
as faithfully as we possibly can, and we
should share the gospel with everyone so that
blessings and protections will be available to
all. But we cannot and must not be paralyzed
just because that event and the events surrounding it are out there ahead of us somewhere. We cannot stop living life. Indeed, we
should live life more fully than we have ever
lived it before. After all, this is the dispensation
of the fulness of times.
 I say this because in recent times—post 9-11
times, I suppose—I have heard very fearful
and even dismal opinions coming from some
in your age group regarding the questions that
missionary had in mind. I have heard some
of you say that you wonder whether there is
any purpose in going on a mission or getting
an education or planning for a career if the
world we live in is going to be so uncertain.
I have even heard sweethearts say, “We don’t
know whether we should get married in such
uncertain times.”
 Worst of all, I have heard reports of some
newlyweds questioning whether they should
bring children into a terror-filled world on the
brink of latter-day cataclysms. May I tell you
that, in a way, those kinds of attitudes worry
me more than Al-Qaeda worries me.
 I have just two things to say to any of you
who are troubled about the future. I say it
lovingly and from my heart.
 First, we must never, in any age or circumstance, let fear and the father of fear (Satan
himself) divert us from our faith and faithful
living. There have always been questions about
the future. Every young person or every young
couple in every era has had to walk by faith
into what has always been some uncertainty—
starting with Adam and Eve in those first tremulous steps out of the Garden of Eden. But that
is all right. This is the plan. It will be okay. Just
be faithful. God is in charge. He knows your
name and He knows your need.
 Faith in the Lord Jesus Christ—that is the
first principle of the gospel. We must go forward, as it says in K. Newell Dayley’s hymn
commemorating our pioneers of the past,
“with faith in ev’ry footstep.”1 But like those
pioneers, you do have to keep taking them—
one step and then another and then the next.
That is how tasks are accomplished, that is
how goals are achieved, and that is how frontiers are conquered. In more divine language,
that is how worlds are created and it is how
your world will be created.
 God expects you to have enough faith and
determination and enough trust in Him to keep
moving, keep living, keep rejoicing. In fact, He
expects you not simply to face the future (that
sounds pretty grim and stoic); He expects you
to embrace and shape the future—to love it and
rejoice in it and delight in your opportunities.
 God is anxiously waiting for the chance to
answer your prayers and fulfill your dreams,
just as He always has. But He can’t if you don’t
pray, and He can’t if you don’t dream. In short,
He can’t if you don’t believe.
 Drawing upon my vast background of
children’s bedtime stories, I say you can pick
your poultry. You can either be like Chicken
Little and run about shouting “The sky is falling; the sky is falling” or you can be like the
Little Red Hen and forge ahead with the productive tasks of living, regardless of who does
or doesn’t help you or who does or doesn’t
believe just the way you believe.
 So much for farmyard stories! How about
two scriptures, both directed at those who live
in perilous times?
 The first is from section 101 of the Doctrine
and Covenants. If you recall, this revelation
came as the Saints who were gathered in
Missouri were suffering great persecution—
were at the very height of their persecution.
Mobs had driven them from their homes.
Hostility, even hatred, followed them from
county to county as they sought refuge. These
frightened Saints lost land, livestock, clothing,
furniture, crops, and a host of personal possessions. Threats of death were heard every day.
I suppose, at its worst, this was the most
difficult and dangerous time—may I say 
“terror-filled”—that the Church had ever
known. Later on names like Haun’s Mill and
Liberty Jail would take their place in our
vocabulary forever.
 Yet in that frightening time the Lord said to
His people:
Let your hearts be comforted concerning Zion; for
all flesh is in mine hands; be still and know that I
am God.
 Zion shall not be moved out of her place,
notwithstanding her children are scattered.
 They that remain, and are pure in heart, shall
return, and come to their inheritances, they and
their children, with songs of everlasting joy, to build
up the waste places of Zion—
 And all these things that the prophets might be
fulfilled. [D&C 101:16–19]
 So, my young friends, let your hearts be
comforted concerning Zion. And remember the
most fundamental definition of Zion we have
ever been given: those who are “pure in heart”
(D&C 97:21). If you will keep your hearts pure,
you and your children and your grandchildren
shall sing songs of everlasting joy as you build
up Zion—and you shall not be moved out of
your place.
 The other verse I refer to is from the Savior,
spoken to His disciples as He faced His crucifixion and as they faced fear, disarray, and
persecution. Talk about troubled times! In His
last collective counsel to them in mortality, and
knowing full well what lay ahead for Him and
for them, He said: “These things I have spoken
unto you, that in me ye might have peace. In
the world ye shall have tribulation: but be of
good cheer; I have overcome the world” (John
16:33).
 So, in a world of tribulation—and there will
always be plenty of it—let’s remember our
faith. Let’s recall the other promises and prophecies that have been given, all the reassuring
ones, and let’s live life more fully, with more
boldness and courage than at any other time in
our history.
 Christ has overcome the world and made
straight a path for us in the wilderness. He has
said to us in our day: “Gird up your loins and
be prepared. Behold, the kingdom is yours, and
the enemy shall not overcome” (D&C 38:9). So
let’s gird up. Let’s get some gusto into singing
those songs of everlasting joy.
Triumph
 That leads directly to the other related point
I want to make regarding the day in which you
and I live. In times of anxiety we tend to focus
pretty much (like my young missionary friend
did) on the “Latter-day” part of that title.
 But tonight I issue a call to each of you
to concentrate on the “Saint” portion of that
phrase. That is the element in our Church title
that should be demanding our attention. Think
of the blessings we enjoy. Think of the remarkable age in which we live. Think of the economic and educational, scientific and spiritual
blessings we have that no other era or people
in the history of the world have ever had, and
then consider the responsibility we have to live
worthily in our moment in time.
This Great Dispensation
 We are making our appearance on the stage
of mortality in the greatest dispensation of the
gospel ever given to mankind, and we need to
make the most of it.
 Here is a favorite quote of mine from the
Prophet Joseph Smith:
 The building up of Zion is a cause that has
interested the people of God in every age; it is a
theme upon which prophets, priests and kings have
dwelt with peculiar delight; they have looked forward with joyful anticipation to the day in which
we live; and fired with heavenly and joyful anticipations they have sung and written and prophesied of
this our day; . . . we are the favored people that God
has [chosen] to bring about the Latter-day glory.
Note this similar affirmation from Wilford
Woodruff in 1894. Perhaps I do not need
to remind you of the staggering challenges
President Woodruff faced. Those years here in
the West were, I suppose, every bit as fearful
in their own way as were the ones I described
in Missouri: prophets in seclusion, apostles in
prison, fear (in President Woodruff’s words)
“that the whole nation” was turning against
our people, preparing to “make war upon” the
Church.
 Nevertheless, President Woodruff said in the
midst of such troubles:
 The Almighty is with this people. We shall have
all the revelations that we will need, if we will do
our duty and obey the commandments of God. . . .
While I . . . live I want to do my duty. I want the
Latter-day Saints to do their duty. . . . Their responsibility is great and mighty. The eyes of God and all
the holy prophets are watching us. This is the great
dispensation that has been spoken of ever since the
world began. We are gathered together . . . by the
power and commandment of God. We are doing the
work of God. . . . Let us fill our mission.
 Lastly, let me share this from President
Hinckley, our modern prophet, who currently
guides us through the challenging times of our
present hour. Citing just last April conference
that very theme struck by President Woodruff,
he said to all of us:
We of this generation are the end harvest of all
that has gone before. It is not enough to simply be
known as a member of this Church. A solemn obligation rests upon us. Let us face it and work at it.
 We must live as true followers of the Christ, with
charity toward all, returning good for evil, teaching
by example the ways of the Lord, and accomplishing
the vast service He has outlined for us.
 May we live worthy of the glorious endowment
of light and understanding and eternal truth which
has come to us through all the perils of the past.
Somehow, among all who have walked the earth, we
have been brought forth in this unique and remarkable season. Be grateful, and above all be faithful.
 It is interesting to me that in those three
quotations, over a representative period of
time, our prophets have focused not on the
terror of the times in which they lived and not
on the ominous elements of the latter days, in
which we are all living, but they felt to speak of
the opportunity and blessing, and above all the
responsibility, to seize the privileges afforded
us in this, the greatest of all dispensations.
I love the line from the Prophet Joseph Smith
saying that earlier prophets, priests, and kings
“have looked forward with joyful anticipation
to the day in which we live; and . . . have sung
and written and prophesied of this our day.”
What were they so joyful about? I can assure
you they weren’t concentrating on terror and
tragedy. Brother Woodruff’s words were:
“The eyes of God and all the holy prophets
are watching us. This is the great dispensation
that has been spoken of ever since the world
began.” Let me repeat President Hinckley’s
words: “Through all the perils of the past,
[s]omehow, among all who have walked the
earth, we have been brought forth in this
unique and remarkable season. Be grateful,
and above all be faithful.”
 I don’t know how all of that makes you
feel, but suddenly any undue anxiety about
the times in which we live dissipates for me,
and I am humbled and spiritually thrilled,
motivated at the opportunity we have been
given. God is watching over His world, His
Church, His leaders, and He is certainly watching over you. Let’s just make sure we are the
“pure in heart” and that we are faithful. How
blessed you will be. How fortunate your
children and grandchildren will be.
 Think about it. No earlier people down
through the gospel ages—including our own
parents, in many cases—have had anywhere
near the blessings that you and I have been
given.
Think of the help we have been given to
take the light of the gospel to a darkened
world. We have approximately 55,000 missionaries—obviously far more than in any other
age in the history of the world since time
began. And that number is repeated every two
years by those going out to replace their predecessors! But we need even more. We have an
LDS presence in some 170 countries. We publish our scriptures in more than 100 languages.
 Over 6,000 years or so ago there was one
temple in the old world (it was rebuilt two
or three times, but it was always the same
temple on the same mountain: Mount Moriah
in Jerusalem) and two or three temples in
Book of Mormon history, but now we live in a
time when temples are multiplying so rapidly
we can hardly keep up. As of a few minutes
ago we had 119 active temples with more,
I am sure, to be announced and put under
construction.
 Add the miracle of the computer, which
helps us document our family histories and
systematically perform saving ordinances
for the redemption of our dead. Add modern transportation, which allows the First
Presidency, the Twelve, and other General
Authorities to circle the globe and personally
bear witness of the Lord to all of the Saints in
all of the lands. Add that where we cannot go
we can now “send,” as the scriptures say, with
satellite broadcasts like the one we are using
tonight (see D&C 84:62).
 Add all the elements of education, science,
technology, communication, transportation,
medicine, nutrition, and revelation that surround us, and we begin to realize what the
angel Moroni meant when he said repeatedly to the boy prophet Joseph Smith, quoting the Old Testament prophet Joel, that in
the last days God would pour out His spirit
upon “all flesh” and that the whole world, all
humankind, would be blessed by the light
coming in all fields of endeavor as part of the
Restoration of the gospel of Jesus Christ (Joel
2:28; emphasis added; see also Joseph Smith—
History 1:41).
 We consider all these blessings that we have
in our dispensation, and we pause to say to our
Father in Heaven, “How great Thou art” and
“How good Thou art.”
 In fact, I have a theory about those earlier
dispensations and the leaders, families, and
people who lived then, of those whom the
Prophet Joseph, President Woodruff, and
President Hinckley spoke. I have thought often
about them and the destructive circumstances
that confronted them. They faced terribly difficult times and, for the most part, did not
succeed in their dispensations. Apostasy and
darkness eventually came to every earlier age
in human history. Indeed, the whole point of
the Restoration of the gospel in these latter
days is that it had not been able to survive in
earlier times and therefore had to be pursued
in one last, triumphant age.
 We know the challenges Abraham’s
posterity faced (and still do). We know of
Moses’ problems with an Israelite people
who left Egypt but couldn’t quite get Egypt to
leave them. Isaiah was the prophet who saw
the loss of the 10 Israelite tribes to the north.
Jeremiah, Ezekiel, and Daniel were all prophets of captivity. Peter, James, John, and Paul,
the great figures of the New Testament, all
saw apostasy creeping into their world almost
before the Savior had departed and certainly
while they themselves were still living. Think
of the prophets of the Book of Mormon, living
in a dispensation ending with such painful
communication between Mormon and Moroni
about the plight they faced and the nations
they loved dissolving into corruption, terror,
and chaos.
 In short, apostasy and destruction of one
kind or another was the ultimate fate of every
general dispensation we have ever had down
through time. But here’s my theory. My theory
is that those great men and women, the leaders
in those ages past, were able to keep going, to 
keep testifying, to keep trying to do their best,
not because they knew that they would succeed but because they knew that you would.
I believe they took courage and hope not so
much from their own circumstances as from
yours—a magnificent congregation of young
adults like you tonight gathered by the hundreds of thousands around the world in a
determined effort to see the gospel prevail
and triumph.
 Moroni said once, speaking to those of us
who would receive his record in the last days:
Behold, the Lord hath shown unto me great and
marvelous things concerning that which must
shortly come, at that day when these things shall
come forth among you.
 Behold, I speak unto you as if ye were present,
and yet ye are not. But behold, Jesus Christ hath
shown you unto me, and I know your doing.
[Mormon 8:34–35]
 One way or another, I think virtually all
of the prophets and early apostles had their
visionary moments of our time—a view that
gave them courage in their own less-successful eras. Those early brethren knew an amazing amount about us. Prophets such as Moses,
Nephi, and the brother of Jared saw the latter
days in tremendously detailed vision. Some
of what they saw wasn’t pleasing, but surely
all those earlier generations took heart from
knowing that there would finally be one dispensation that would not fail.
 Ours, not theirs, was the day that gave them
“heavenly and joyful anticipations” and caused
them to sing and prophesy of victory. Ours is
the day, collectively speaking, toward which
the prophets have been looking from the beginning of time, and those earlier brethren are
over there still cheering us on! In a very real
way, their chance to consider themselves fully
successful depends on our faithfulness and our
victory. I love the idea of going into the battle
of the last days representing Alma and Abinadi
and what they pled for and representing Peter
and Paul and the sacrifices they made. If you
can’t get excited about that kind of assignment
in the drama of history, you can’t get excited!
A Wedding Feast
 Let me add another element to this view of
the dispensation that I think follows automatically. Because ours is the last and greatest of
all dispensations, because all things will eventually culminate and be fulfilled in our era,
there is, therefore, one particular, very specific
responsibility that falls to those of us in the
Church now that did not rest quite the same
way on the shoulders of Church members
in any earlier time. Unlike the Church in the
days of Abraham or Moses, Isaiah or Ezekiel,
or even in the New Testament days of James
and John, we have a responsibility to prepare the
Church of the Lamb of God to receive the Lamb of
God—in person, in triumphant glory, in His millennial role as Lord of Lords and King of Kings.
No other dispensation ever had that duty.
 In the language of the scriptures, we are the
ones designated in all of history who must prepare the bride for the advent of the Bridegroom
and be worthy of an invitation to the wedding
feast (see Matthew 25:1–12; 22:2–14; D&C
88:92, 96). Collectively speaking—whether
it is in our lifetime or our children’s or our
grandchildren’s or whenever—we nevertheless have the responsibility as a Church and
as individual members of that Church to be
worthy to have Christ come to us, to be worthy
to have Him greet us, and to have Him accept
and receive and embrace us. The lives we present to Him in that sacred hour must be worthy
of Him!
We Must Be Acceptable to Him
 So, setting aside fear of the future or
concerns about the dimensions of a backyard
bomb shelter, I am filled with awe, with an
overwhelming sense of duty to prepare my life
(and to the extent that I can, to help preparethe lives of the members of the Church) for
that long-prophesied day, for that transfer of
authority, for the time when we will make
a presentation of the Church to Him whose
Church it is.
 I do know this: When Christ comes, the
members of His Church must look and act
like members of His Church are supposed to
look and act if we are to be acceptable to Him.
We must be doing His work and we must be
living His teachings. He must recognize us
quickly and easily as truly being His disciples.
As President J. Reuben Clark Jr. once advised,
our faith must not be difficult to detect.
 Yes, if in that great, final hour we say we are
believers, then we had surely better be demonstrating it. The Shepherd knows His sheep, and
we must be known in that great day as His followers in deed as well as in word.
 Surely that is why President Hinckley said:
“It is not enough [for us, you and me, now, in
our time] to simply be known as a member of
this Church. . . . We must live as true followers
of . . . Christ.”
 Yes, my beloved young friends, these are
the latter days, and you and I are to be the best
Latter-day Saints we can. Put an emphasis on
the last word there, please.
 When will all of this finish? When shall
Christ appear publicly, triumphantly, and the
Millennium begin? I have already told you
that I don’t know. What I do know is that the
initial moments of that event began 184 years
ago. I do know that as a result of that First
Vision and what has followed it, we live in a
time of unprecedented blessings—blessings
given to us for the purpose of living faithfully
and purely so when the Bridegroom finally
and triumphantly arrives, He can personally,
justifiably bid us to the wedding feast.
 Is there a happy future for you and your
posterity in these latter days? Absolutely!
Most assuredly you have a beautiful future.
All wedding feasts are happy occasions.
Will there be difficult times when those ominous latter-day warnings and prophecies are
fulfilled? Of course there will. There always
have been. Be prepared. Will those who have
built upon the great rock of Christ withstand
such winds, such hail, and the mighty shafts
in the whirlwind? You know that they will.
You have it on good word. You have it on His
word! That “rock upon which ye are built . . .
is a sure foundation, a foundation whereon if
men [and women] build they cannot fall” (see
Helaman 5:12).
 My beloved young brothers and sisters,
I leave you my love and my testimony that
God not only lives, He loves us. He loves you.
Everything He does is for our good and our
protection. There is evil and sorrow in the
world, but there is no evil or harm in Him. He
is our Father—a perfect father—and He will
shelter us from the storm.
 I testify not only that Jesus is the Christ, the
Holy and Only Begotten Son of God, but that
He lives, that He loves us, that on the strength
and merit of His atoning sacrifice, we too will
live eternally. He conquered death and hell for
us, and He conquered fear in the same way.
 This is the Church and kingdom of God
on earth. Joseph Smith was a prophet and
Gordon B. Hinckley is a prophet. Truth has
been restored. You and I are fortunate enough
to have been born when all of this knowledge
and all of this safety are available to us.
 I leave an apostolic blessing on each one of
you individually within the sound of my voice
that you will live with confidence, optimism,
faith, and devotion. I bless you that you will be
serious about life’s challenges but not frightened or discouraged. I bless you to feel the joy
of the Saints in the latter days—never crippling anxiety or destructive despair. Indeed,
the only concern I would have us entertain is
a very personal one: How can we live more
fully, more faithfully, so that all the blessings of
this great dispensation can be showered upon
each one of us and upon those whose lives
we touch?
“Fear not, little flock. . . . Look [to Christ] in
every thought; doubt not, fear not.” “Ye have
not as yet understood how great blessings
the Father hath . . . prepared for you. . . . Be of
good cheer. . . . The kingdom is yours and the
blessings thereof are yours, and the riches of
eternity are yours” (D&C 6:34, 36; 78:17–18).
 I leave you my blessing, my love, and an
apostolic witness of the truthfulness of these
things in the protective name of the Lord Jesus
Christ, amen.

HOW DO I LOVE THEE

I am delighted to be with you the day after
Valentine’s Day and the day before Sister
Holland’s birthday. Guess what is on my mind!
Guess what I am going to talk about! Yes, I am
going to talk about love, because Shakespeare
made me do it. You see, it is the fifteenth of
February. If it were the fifteenth of March, it
would be the ides of March. And everybody
remembers what Brutus did to Julius Caesar on
the ides of March—and it befell Mark Antony
to get back at Brutus in the great funeral oration,
the same Mark Antony who let Cleopatra take
him for the proverbial trip up the Nile without
a paddle. Never mind that the ides of February
were actually the day before yesterday. I am certainly not going to let that stop me from speaking about love and romance and marriage—a
topic absolutely foreign to the interests of those
on the BYU campus and one scarcely mentioned
here this entire month. Indulge me. Pretend
you are interested—if only because Sister
Holland is my valentine and it is her birthday
tomorrow.
You know, winning Sister Holland was not
an easy thing to do. I worked at it and worked
at it and worked at it until I finally had the
courage to ask for her hand. In a romantic setting I said as meekly and humbly as I could,
“Pat, will you marry me?”
To which she said, “Oh, dearest darling,
dearest loved one, yes. Yes, yes, yes. When
shall we set the date? Oh, we have got to
reserve the temple. I know exactly what colors
I want for the bridesmaids. Should we have the
reception indoors or out? And someone must
be at the guest book. And I can just see in my
mind the cake that we want. . . .”
Then she stopped mid-sentence and said,
“Oh, darling. You are so overcome you are
speechless. Here I have just gone on and on.
Wouldn’t you like to say something on this
night of nights?”
To which I replied, “I think I have said too
much already.”
She counters that story by reminding me
that when I arrived for our first date, her little
brother shouted to her, “Hey, dreamboat, your
barnacle is here!”
Actually neither of those stories is true, but
who knows? Maybe you can use them someday when you have to speak at BYU on love
and marriage.
Do let me now be serious. What I have
learned of romantic love and the beauty of
marriage I have learned from Sister Holland. I
am honored to be her husband and am happy
for you that she is on this campus again this
morning, if only for an hour or two. As I once
said of her, paraphrasing what Mark Twain’s
Adam said of his Eve, “Wherever she was,
there was paradise” (see “Adam’s Diary”).
I wish to speak to you this morning about
Christlike love and what I think it can and
should mean in your friendships, in your
dating, in serious courtship, and, ultimately,
in your marriage.
I approach the subject knowing full well
that, as a newly engaged young woman said to
me just last month, “There is certainly a lot of
advice out there!” I don’t want to add needlessly to this rhetoric on romance, but I believe
that second only to your membership in the
Church, your “membership in a marriage” is
the most important association you will have
in time and eternity—and to the faithful what
doesn’t come in time will come in eternity. So
perhaps all of you will forgive me for offering,
yes, more advice. But I wish it to be scriptural
advice, gospel advice. Advice, if you will, that
is as basic to life as it is to love—counsel that is
equally applicable to men and to women. It has
nothing to do with trends or tides of the time
or tricks of the trade but has everything to do
with the truth.
So may I put your friendships and dates
and eventually your marriages in a scriptural
context this morning and speak to you of what
I will try to communicate as true love.
After a long wonderful discourse by Mormon
on the subject of charity, the seventh chapter of
Moroni tells us that this highest of Christian
virtues is more accurately labeled “the pure
love of Christ.”
And it endureth forever; and whoso is found
possessed of it at the last day, it shall be well with
him [and her].
Wherefore, . . . pray unto the Father with all the
energy of heart, that ye may be filled with this love,
which he hath bestowed upon all who are true followers of his Son, Jesus Christ; that ye may become
the sons [and daughters] of God; that when he
shall appear we shall be like him, for we shall see
him as he is; . . . that we may be purified even as he
is pure. [Moroni 7:47–48]
True charity, the absolutely pure, perfect love
of Christ, has really been known only once in
this world—in the form of Christ Himself, the
living Son of the living God. It is Christ’s love
that Mormon goes to some length to describe
for us and that Paul the Apostle did as well
some years before, writing to the Corinthians in
New Testament times. As in everything, Christ
is the only one who got it all right, did it all
perfectly, loved the way we are all to try to love.
But even though we fall short, that divine standard is there for us. It is a goal toward which
we are to keep reaching, keep striving—and,
certainly, a goal to keep appreciating.
And as we speak of this, may I remind you,
as Mormon explicitly taught, that this love, this
ability, capacity, and reciprocation we all so
want, is a gift. It is “bestowed”—that is
Mormon’s word. It doesn’t come without effort
and it doesn’t come without patience, but, like
salvation itself, in the end it is a gift, given by
God to the “true followers of his Son, Jesus
Christ.” The solutions to life’s problems are
always gospel solutions. Not only are answers
found in Christ, but so is the power, the gift, the
bestowal, the miracle of giving and receiving
those answers. In this matter of love, no doctrine
could be more encouraging to us than that.
I have taken for a title to my remarks Mrs.
Browning’s wonderful line “How do I love
thee?” (Elizabeth Barrett Browning, Sonnets
from the Portuguese [1850], no. 43.) I am not
going to “count the ways” this morning, but I
am impressed with her choice of adverb—not
when do I love thee nor where do I love thee nor
why do I love thee nor why don’t you love me,
2 Brigham Young University 1999–2000 Speeches
but, rather, how. How do I demonstrate it, how
do I reveal my true love for you? Mrs. Browning
was correct. Real love is best shown in the
“how,” and it is with the how that Mormon
and Paul help us the most.
The first element of divine love—pure
love—taught by these two prophets is its kindness, its selfless quality, its lack of ego and vanity and consuming self-centeredness. “Charity
suffereth long, and is kind, [charity] envieth
not, and is not puffed up, seeketh not her own”
(Moroni 7:45). I have heard President Hinckley
teach publicly and privately what I suppose all
leaders have said—that most problems in love
and marriage ultimately start with selfishness.
In outlining ideal love in which Christ, the
most unselfish man who ever lived, is the great
example, it is not surprising that this scriptural
commentary starts here.
There are many qualities you will want to
look for in a friend or a serious date—to say
nothing of a spouse and eternal companion—
but surely among the very first and most basic
of those qualities will be those of care and
sensitivity toward others, a minimum of selfcenteredness that allows compassion and courtesy to be evident. “That best portion of a good
man’s life [is] his . . . kindness,” said Mr. William
Wordsworth (Lines Composed a Few Miles Above
Tintern Abbey [1798], lines 33–35). There are lots
of limitations in all of us that we hope our sweethearts will overlook. I suppose no one is as
handsome or as beautiful as he or she wishes, or
as brilliant in school or as witty in speech or as
wealthy as we would like, but in a world of
varied talents and fortunes that we can’t always
command, I think that makes even more attractive the qualities we can command—such qualities as thoughtfulness, patience, a kind word,
and true delight in the accomplishment of
another. These cost us nothing, and they can
mean everything to the one who receives them.
I like Mormon and Paul’s language that
says one who truly loves is not “puffed up.”
Puffed up! Isn’t that a great image? Haven’t
you ever been with someone who was so conceited, so full of themselves that they seemed
like the Pillsbury Doughboy? Fred Allen said
once that he saw such a fellow walking down
Lovers’ Lane holding his own hand. True love
blooms when we care more about another
person than we care about ourselves. That is
Christ’s great atoning example for us, and it
ought to be more evident in the kindness we
show, the respect we give, and the selflessness
and courtesy we employ in our personal
relationships.
Love is a fragile thing, and some elements
in life can try to break it. Much damage can be
done if we are not in tender hands, caring hands.
To give ourselves totally to another person, as
we do in marriage, is the most trusting step we
take in any human relationship. It is a real act
of faith—faith all of us must be willing to exercise. If we do it right, we end up sharing everything—all our hopes, all our fears, all our
dreams, all our weaknesses, and all our joys—
with another person.
No serious courtship or engagement or
marriage is worth the name if we do not fully
invest all that we have in it and in so doing
trust ourselves totally to the one we love. You
cannot succeed in love if you keep one foot out
on the bank for safety’s sake. The very nature
of the endeavor requires that you hold on to
each other as tightly as you can and jump in
the pool together. In that spirit, and in the
spirit of Mormon’s plea for pure love, I want to
impress upon you the vulnerability and delicacy of your partner’s future as it is placed in
your hands for safekeeping—male and female,
it works both ways.
Sister Holland and I have been married for
nearly 37 years, just a half-dozen or so years
short of twice as long as we have lived without
each other. I may not know everything about
her, but I know 37 years’ worth, and she knows
that much of me. I know her likes and dislikes,
and she knows mine. I know her tastes and
interests, hopes and dreams, and she knows
mine. As our love has grown and our relationship has matured, we have been increasingly
free with each other about all of that.
The result is that I know much more clearly
now how to help her, and, if I let myself, I know
exactly what will hurt her. In the honesty of our
love—love that can’t truly be Christlike without such total devotion—surely God will hold
me accountable for any pain I cause her by
intentionally exploiting or hurting her when she
has been so trusting of me, having long since
thrown away any self-protection in order that
we could be, as the scripture says, “one flesh”
(Genesis 2:24). To impair or impede her in any
way for my gain or vanity or emotional mastery
over her should disqualify me on the spot to be
her husband. Indeed, it should consign my
miserable soul to eternal incarceration in that
large and spacious building Lehi says is the
prison of those who live by “vain imaginations”
and the “pride of the world” (1 Nephi 11:36,
12:18). No wonder that building is at the opposite end of the field from the tree of life representing the love of God! In all that Christ was,
He was not ever envious or inflated, never consumed with His own needs. He did not once,
not ever, seek His own advantage at the expense
of someone else. He delighted in the happiness
of others, the happiness He could bring them.
He was forever kind.
In a dating and courtship relationship, I
would not have you spend five minutes with
someone who belittles you, who is constantly
critical of you, who is cruel at your expense and
may even call it humor. Life is tough enough
without having the person who is supposed to
love you leading the assault on your selfesteem, your sense of dignity, your confidence,
and your joy. In this person’s care you deserve
to feel physically safe and emotionally secure.
Members of the First Presidency have
taught that “any form of physical or mental
abuse to any woman is not worthy of any
priesthood holder” and that no “man who
holds the priesthood of God [should] abuse his
wife in any way, [or] demean or injure or take
undue advantage of [any] woman”—and that
includes friends, dates, sweethearts, and fiancées,
to say nothing of wives (James E. Faust, “The
Highest Place of Honor,” Ensign, May 1988, 37,
and Gordon B. Hinckley, “Reach Out in Love
and Kindness,” Ensign, November 1982, 77).
If you are just going for pizza or to play a
set of tennis, go with anyone who will provide
good, clean fun. But if you are serious, or planning to be serious, please find someone who
brings out the best in you and is not envious of
your success. Find someone who suffers when
you suffer and who finds his or her happiness
in your own.
The second segment of this scriptural sermon
on love in Moroni 7:45 says that true charity—
real love—“is not easily provoked, thinketh no
evil, and rejoiceth not in iniquity.” Think of how
many arguments could be avoided, how many
hurt feelings could be spared, how many cold
shoulders and silent treatments could be ended,
and, in a worst-case scenario, how many
breakups and divorces could be avoided if we
were not so easily provoked, if we thought no
evil of one another, and if we not only did not
rejoice in iniquity but didn’t rejoice even in little
mistakes.
Temper tantrums are not cute even in children; they are despicable in adults, especially
adults who are supposed to love each other.
We are too easily provoked; we are too inclined
to think that our partner meant to hurt us—
meant to do us evil, so to speak; and in defensive or jealous response we too often rejoice
when we see them make a mistake and find
them in a fault. Let’s show some discipline on
this one. Act a little more maturely. Bite your
tongue if you have to. “He that is slow to anger
is better than the mighty; and he that ruleth his
spirit than he that taketh a city” (Proverbs 16:32).
At least one difference between a tolerable marriage and a great one may be that willingness
in the latter to allow some things to pass without comment, without response.
I mentioned Shakespeare earlier. In a talk
on love and romance you might well expect a
reference to Romeo and Juliet. But let me refer
to a much less virtuous story. With Romeo and
Juliet the outcome was a result of innocence
gone awry, a kind of sad, heartbreaking mistake
between two families that should have known
better. But in the tale of Othello and Desdemona
the sorrow and destruction is calculated—it is
maliciously driven from the beginning. Of all
the villains in Shakespeare’s writing, and perhaps in all of literature, there is no one I loathe
so much as I loathe Iago. Even his name sounds
evil to me, or at least it has become so. And
what is his evil, and Othello’s tragic, nearinexcusable susceptibility to it? It is the violation of Moroni 7 and 1 Corinthians 13. Among
other things, they sought for evil where none
existed, they embraced imaginary iniquity. The
villains here rejoiced not “in the truth.” Of the
innocent Desdemona, Iago said, “I turn her
virtue into pitch; / And out of her own goodness make the net / That shall enmesh them
all” (William Shakespeare, Othello, act 2, scene
3, lines 366–68). Sowing doubt and devilish
innuendo, playing on jealousy and deceit and
finally murderous rage, Iago provokes Othello
into taking Desdemona’s life—virtue turned
into pitch, goodness twisted into a fatal net.
Now, thank heavens, here in Happy Valley
this morning we are not talking of infidelity, real
or imagined, or of murder; but in the spirit of a
university education, let’s learn the lessons being
taught. Think the best of each other, especially
of those you say you love. Assume the good
and doubt the bad. Encourage in yourself what
Abraham Lincoln called “the better angels of our
nature” (First Inaugural Address, 4 March 1861).
Othello could have been saved even in the last
moment when he kissed Desdemona and her
purity was so evident. “That [kiss] dost almost
persuade / Justice to break her sword!” he said
(act 5, scene 2, lines 16–17). Well, he would have
been spared her death and then his own suicide
if he had broken what he considered justice’s
sword right then and there rather than, figuratively speaking, using it on her. This tragically
sad Elizabethan tale could have had a beautiful,
happy ending if just one man, who then influenced another, had thought no evil, had rejoiced
not in iniquity, but had rejoiced in the truth.
Thirdly and lastly, the prophets tell us that
true love “beareth all things, believeth all
things, hopeth all things, endureth all things”
(1 Corinthians 13:7). Once again that is ultimately a description of Christ’s love—He is the
great example of one who bore and believed
and hoped and endured. We are invited to do
the same in our courtship and in our marriage
to the best of our ability. Bear up and be strong.
Be hopeful and believing. Some things in life
we have little or no control over. These have to
be endured. Some disappointments have to be
lived with in love and in marriage. These are
not things anyone wants in life, but sometimes
they come. And when they come, we have to
bear them; we have to believe; we have to hope
for an end to such sorrows and difficulty; we
have to endure until things come right in the end.
One of the great purposes of true love is to
help each other in these times. No one ought to
have to face such trials alone. We can endure
almost anything if we have someone at our side
who truly loves us, who is easing the burden
and lightening the load. In this regard, a friend
from our BYU faculty, Professor Brent Barlow,
told me some years ago about Plimsoll marks.
As a youth in England, Samuel Plimsoll
was fascinated with watching ships load and
unload their cargoes. He soon observed that,
regardless of the cargo space available, each
ship had its maximum capacity. If a ship
exceeded its limit, it would likely sink at sea.
In 1868 Plimsoll entered Parliament and passed
a merchant shipping act that, among other
things, called for making calculations of how
much a ship could carry. As a result, lines were
drawn on the hull of each ship in England. As
the cargo was loaded, the freighter would sink
lower and lower into the water. When the water
level on the side of the ship reached the Plimsoll
mark, the ship was considered loaded to capacity,
regardless of how much space remained. As a
result, British deaths at sea were greatly reduced.
Like ships, people have differing capacities
at different times and even different days in
their lives. In our relationships we need to
establish our own Plimsoll marks and help
identify them in the lives of those we love.
Together we need to monitor the load levels
and be helpful in shedding or at least readjusting some cargo if we see our sweetheart is
sinking. Then, when the ship of love is stabilized, we can evaluate long-term what has to
continue, what can be put off until another
time, and what can be put off permanently.
Friends, sweethearts, and spouses need to be
able to monitor each other’s stress and recognize the different tides and seasons of life. We
owe it to each other to declare some limits and
then help jettison some things if emotional
health and the strength of loving relationships
are at risk. Remember, pure love “beareth all
things, believeth all things, hopeth all things,
endureth all things,” and helps loved ones do
the same.
Let me close. In Mormon’s and Paul’s final
witnesses, they declare that “charity [pure love]
never faileth” (Moroni 7:46, 1 Corinthians 13:8).
It is there through thick and thin. It endures
through sunshine and shadow, through darkest
sorrow and on into the light. It never fails. So
Christ loved us, and that is how He hoped we
would love each other. In a final injunction to all
his disciples for all time, He said, “A new commandment I give unto you, That ye love one
another; as I have loved you” (John 13:34; emphasis
added). Of course such Christlike staying power
in romance and marriage requires more than any
of us really have. It requires something more, an
endowment from heaven. Remember Mormon’s
promise: that such love—the love we each yearn
for and cling to—is “bestowed” upon “true followers of Christ.” You want capability, safety,
and security in dating and romance, in married
life and eternity? Be a true disciple of Jesus. Be a
genuine, committed, word-and-deed Latter-day
Saint. Believe that your faith has everything to do
with your romance, because it does. You separate dating from discipleship at your peril. Or, to
phrase that more positively, Jesus Christ, the
Light of the World, is the only lamp by which
you can successfully see the path of love and
happiness for you and for your sweetheart.
How should I love thee? As He does, for that way
“never faileth.” I so testify and express my love
for you and for Him, in the sacred name of the
Lord Jesus Christ, amen.

CAST NOT AWAY

There is a lesson in the Prophet Joseph
Smith’s account of the First Vision that
virtually everyone in this audience has had
occasion to experience, or one day soon will. It
is the plain and very sobering truth that before
great moments, certainly before great spiritual
moments, there can come adversity, opposition, and darkness. Life has some of those
moments for us, and occasionally they come
just as we are approaching an important
decision or a significant step in our life.
In the marvelous account that we read too
seldom, Joseph said he had scarcely begun his
prayer when he felt a power of astonishing
influence come over him. Thick darkness, as he
described it, gathered around him and seemed
bent on his utter destruction. But he exerted all
his powers to call upon God to deliver him out
of the power of this enemy, and as he did so a
pillar of light brighter than the noonday sun
descended gradually until it rested upon him.
At the very moment of the light’s appearance,
he found himself delivered from the destructive power that had held him bound. What
then followed is the greatest epiphany since
the events surrounding the crucifixion, resurrection, and ascension of Christ in the meridian
of time. The Father and the Son appeared to
Joseph Smith, and the dispensation of the
fulness of times had begun. (See JS—H
1:15–20.)
Most of us do not need any more reminders
than we have already had that there is one who
personifies “opposition in all things,” that “an
angel of God” fell “from heaven” and in so
doing became “miserable forever.” What a
chilling destiny. Lehi teaches us that because
this is Lucifer’s fate, “he sought also the misery
of all mankind” (2 Nephi 2:11, 17–18). Surely
this must be the original ecclesiastical source
for the homely little adage that misery loves
company.
A morning’s devotional could be devoted to
this subject of the adversary’s strong, preliminary, anticipatory opposition to many of the
good things that God has in store for us. But
today I want to move past that observation to
another truth we may not recognize so readily.
This is a lesson in the parlance of the athletic
contest that reminds us “it isn’t over until it’s
over.” It is the reminder that the fight goes on.
Unfortunately we must not think that Satan is
defeated with that first, strong breakthrough
that so dramatically brings the light and moves
us forward.
To make my point a little more vividly, may
I go to another passage of scripture, indeed to
another vision. You will recall that the book of
Moses begins with him being taken up to “an
exceedingly high mountain” where, the scripture says, “he saw God face to face, and he
talked with him, and the glory of God was upon
Moses” (Moses 1:1–2). What then followed was
what happens to prophets who are taken to
high mountains. The Lord said to Moses,
Look, and I will show thee the workmanship of mine
hands. . . .
And . . . Moses . . . beheld the earth, yea, even
all of it; and there was not a particle of it which he
did not behold, discerning it by the spirit of God.
And he beheld also the inhabitants thereof, and
there was not a soul which he beheld not. [Moses
1:4, 27–28]
This experience is remarkable by every
standard. It is one of the great revelations given
in human history. It stands with the greatest
accounts we have of any prophet’s experience
with divinity.
But Moses’ message to you today is, “Don’t
let your guard down.” Don’t assume that a
great revelation, some marvelous illuminating
moment, or the opening of an inspired path is
the end of it. Remember, it isn’t over until it’s
over. What happened to Moses next, after his
revelatory moment, would be ludicrous if it
were not so dangerous and so absolutely true
to form. In an effort to continue his opposition,
in his unfailing effort to get his licks in later if
not sooner, Lucifer appeared and shouted in
equal portions of anger and petulance after
God had revealed himself to the prophet, saying, “Moses, worship me.” But Moses was not
having it. He had just seen the real thing, and
by comparison this sort of performance was
pretty dismal.
Moses looked upon Satan and said: Who art thou?
. . . where is thy glory, that I should worship thee?
For behold, I could not look upon God, except
his glory should come upon me. . . . But I can look
upon thee in the natural man. . . .
. . . Where is thy glory, for it is darkness unto
me? And I can judge between thee and God. . . .
Get thee hence, Satan; deceive me not. [Moses
1:13–16]
The record then depicts a reaction that is
both pathetic and frightening.
And now, when Moses had said these words,
Satan cried with a loud voice, and ranted upon the
earth, and commanded, saying: I am the Only
Begotten, worship me.
And it came to pass that Moses began to fear
exceedingly; and as he began to fear, he saw the bitterness of hell. Nevertheless, calling upon God [the
very phrase used by Joseph Smith], he received
strength, and he commanded, saying: Depart from
me, Satan, for this one God only will I worship,
which is the God of glory.
And now Satan began to tremble, and the earth
shook. . . .
And it came to pass that Satan cried with a loud
voice, with weeping, and wailing, and gnashing of
teeth; and he departed hence. [Moses 1:19–22]
So Satan left, always to come again, we can
be sure, but always to be defeated by the God
of Glory—always.
I wish to encourage every one of you today
regarding opposition that so often comes after
enlightened decisions have been made, after
moments of revelation and conviction have
given us a peace and an assurance we thought
we would never lose. In his letter to the
Hebrews, the Apostle Paul was trying to
encourage new members who had just joined
the Church, who undoubtedly had had spiritual experiences and had received the pure
light of testimony, only to discover that not
only had their troubles not ended, but that
some of them had only begun.
It reminds me of President Hugh B. Brown’s
statement about marriage. He said he had
always been told that when he got married he
would come to the end of his troubles. So he
got married, only to discover they were speaking about the front end. Now, you returned
missionaries who are still sitting around single,
don’t chuckle too loudly at that. I am not
through with you this morning!
Paul pled with those new members about
the way President Hinckley is pleading with
new members today. The reminder is that we
cannot sign on for a moment of such eternal
significance and everlasting consequence without knowing it will be a fight—a good fight
and a winning fight, but a fight nevertheless.
Paul said to those who thought a new testimony, a personal conversion, or a spiritual
baptismal experience would put them beyond
trouble, “Call to remembrance the former days,
in which, after ye were illuminated, ye endured
a great fight of afflictions” (Hebrews 10:32;
emphasis added).
Then came this tremendous counsel, which
is at the heart of my counsel to you and the
title of my remarks this morning:
Cast not away therefore your confidence,
which hath great recompence of reward.
For ye have need of patience, that, after ye have
done the will of God, ye might receive the promise.
. . .
. . . If any man draw back, my soul shall have no
pleasure in him. . . .
. . . We are not of them who draw back unto
perdition. [Hebrews 10:35–36, 38–39; emphasis
added]
In LDS talk that is to say, “Sure it is tough—
before you join the Church, while you are trying to join, and after you have joined.” That is
the way it has always been, Paul said, but don’t
“draw back,” he warned. Don’t panic and
retreat. Don’t lose your confidence. Don’t forget how you once felt. Don’t distrust the experience you had. That tenacity is what saved
Moses when the adversary confronted him,
and it is what will save you.
I suppose every returned missionary and
probably every convert within the sound of my
voice knows exactly what I am talking about:
appointments for discussions canceled, the
Book of Mormon in a plastic bag hanging from
a front-door knob, baptismal dates not met.
And so it goes through the teaching period,
through the commitments, through the baptism, through the first weeks and months in
the Church, and more or less forever. At least
the adversary would pursue it forever, if he
thought he could see any weakening of your
resolve or any chink in your armor—even if it
is after the fact.
This opposition turns up almost anyplace
something good has happened. It can happen
when you are trying to get an education. It can
hit you after your first month in your new mission field. It certainly happens in matters of
love and marriage. (Now I am back to those
returned missionaries.) I would like to have a
dollar for every person in a courtship who
knew he or she had felt the guidance of the
Lord in that relationship, had prayed about the
experience enough to know it was the will of
the Lord, knew they loved each other and
enjoyed each other’s company, and saw a lifetime of wonderful compatibility ahead—only
to panic, to get a brain cramp, to have total
catatonic fear sweep over them. They “draw
back,” as Paul said, if not into perdition at least
into marital paralysis.
I am not saying you shouldn’t be very careful about something as significant and serious
as marriage. And I certainly am not saying that
a young man can get a revelation that he is to
marry a certain person without that young
woman getting the same confirmation. I have
seen a lot of those one-way revelations in
young people’s lives. Yes, there are cautions
and considerations to make, but once there has
been genuine illumination, beware the temptation to retreat from a good thing. If it was right
when you prayed about it and trusted it and
lived for it, it is right now. Don’t give up when
the pressure mounts. You can find an apartment. You can win over your mother-in-law.
You can sell your harmonica and therein fund
one more meal. It’s been done before. Don’t
give in. Certainly don’t give in to that being who
is bent on the destruction of your happiness. He
wants everyone to be miserable like unto himself. Face your doubts. Master your fears.
“Cast not away therefore your confidence.”
Stay the course and see the beauty of life
unfold for you.
To help us make our way through these
experiences, these important junctures in our
lives, let me draw from another scriptural
reference to Moses. It was given in the early
days of this dispensation when revelation was
needed, when a true course was being set and
had to be continued.
Virtually everyone in the room knows the
formula for revelation given in section 9 of
the Doctrine and Covenants—you know, the
verses about studying it out in your mind and
the Lord promising to confirm or deny. What
most of us don’t read in conjunction with this
is the section that precedes it—section 8. In that
revelation the Lord defined revelation:
I will tell you in your mind and in your heart, by
the Holy Ghost, which shall come upon you and
which shall dwell in your heart. [I love the combination there of both mind and heart. God will
teach us in a reasonable way and in a revelatory way—mind and heart combined, by the
Holy Ghost.]
Now, behold, this is the spirit of revelation;
behold, this is the spirit by which Moses
brought the children of Israel through the Red
Sea on dry ground. [D&C 8:2–3; emphasis
added]
Question: Why would the Lord use the
example of crossing the Red Sea as the classic
example of “the spirit of revelation”? Why
didn’t he use the First Vision? Or the example
from the book of Moses we just used? Or the
vision of the brother of Jared? Well, he could
have used any of these, but he didn’t. Here he
had another purpose in mind.
Usually we think of revelation as information. Just open the books to us, Lord, like: What
was the political significance of the Louisiana
Purchase or the essence of the second law of
thermodynamics? It is obvious that when you
see those kinds of questions on a test paper,
you need revelation. Someone said prayer will
never be eliminated from the schools so long as
there are final examinations. But aside from the
fact that you probably aren’t going to get that
kind of revelation—because in this Church we
do not believe in ex nihilo creation, especially
in exams—this is too narrow a concept of revelation. May I suggest how section 8 broadens
our understanding of section 9, particularly in
light of these “fights of affliction” that Paul
spoke of and that I have been discussing.
First of all, revelation almost always comes
in response to a question, usually an urgent
question—not always, but usually. In that
sense it does provide information, but it is
urgently needed information, special information. Moses’ challenge was how to get himself
and the children of Israel out of this horrible
predicament they were in. There were chariots
behind them, sand dunes on every side, and
just a lot of water immediately ahead. He
needed information all right—what to do—but
it wasn’t a casual thing he was asking. In this
case it was literally a matter of life and death.
You will need information, too, but in matters of great consequence it is not likely to
come unless you want it urgently, faithfully,
humbly. Moroni calls it seeking “with real
intent” (Moroni 10:4). If you can seek that way,
and stay in that mode, not much that the
adversary can counter with will dissuade you
from a righteous path. You can hang on, whatever the assault and affliction, because you
have paid the price to—figuratively, at least—
see the face of God and live.
Like Moses in his vision, there may come
after the fact some competing doubts and some
confusion, but they will pale when you measure them against the real thing. Remember the
real thing. Remember how urgently you have
needed help in earlier times and that you got it.
The Red Sea will open to the honest seeker of
revelation. The adversary does have power to
hedge up the way, to marshal Pharaoh’s forces
and dog our escape right to the water’s edge,
but he can’t produce the real thing. He cannot
conquer if we will it otherwise. “Exerting all [our]
powers to call upon God,” the light will again
come, the darkness will again retreat, the safety
will again be sure. That is lesson number one
about crossing the Red Sea, your Red Seas, by
the spirit of revelation.
Lesson number two is closely related to it.
It is that in the process of revelation and in
making important decisions, fear almost
always plays a destructive, sometimes paralyzing role. To Oliver Cowdery, who missed the
opportunity of a lifetime because he didn’t
seize it in the lifetime of the opportunity, the
Lord said, “You did not continue as you commenced.” Does that sound familiar to those
who have been illuminated and then knuckled
under to second thoughts and returning
doubts? “It is not expedient that you should
translate now,” the Lord said in language that
must have been very hard for Oliver to hear.
“Behold, it was expedient when you commenced; but you feared, and the time is past,
and it is not expedient now” (D&C 9:5, 10–11;
emphasis added).
Every one of us runs the risk of fear. You
do, and I do. Did you catch the line I tried to
emphasize as I read the account from the Pearl
of Great Price? For a moment in that confrontation, “Moses began to fear exceedingly; and as
he began to fear, he saw the bitterness of hell”
(Moses 1:20). That’s when you see it—when
you are afraid.
That is exactly the problem that beset the
children of Israel at the edge of the Red Sea.
That is lesson number two. It has everything
to do with holding fast to earlier illumination.
The record says, “And when Pharaoh drew
nigh, the children of Israel lifted up their eyes,
and, behold, the Egyptians marched after
them; and they were sore afraid.”
Some, just like those Paul had described
earlier, said, “Let’s go back. This isn’t worth
it. We must have been wrong. That probably
wasn’t the right spirit telling us to leave
Egypt.” What they actually said to Moses was,
“Wherefore hast thou dealt thus with us, to
carry us forth out of Egypt? . . . It had been
better for us to serve the Egyptians, than that
we should die in the wilderness” (Exodus
14:10–12).
And I have to say, “What about that which
has already happened? What about the miracles that got you here? What about the frogs
and the lice? What about the rod and the serpent, the river and the blood? What about the
hail, the locusts, the fire, and the firstborn
sons?”
How soon we forget. It would not have been
better to stay and serve the Egyptians, and it is
not better to remain outside the Church nor to
reject a mission call nor to put off marriage and
so on and so on forever. Of course our faith will
be tested as we fight through these self-doubts
and second thoughts. Some days we will be
miraculously led out of Egypt—seemingly free,
seemingly on our way—only to come to yet
another confrontation, like all that water lying
before us. At those times we must resist the temptation to panic and to give up. At those times fear
will be the strongest of the adversary’s weapons
against us.
“And Moses said unto the people, Fear ye
not, stand still, and see the salvation of the
Lord. . . . The Lord shall fight for you.”
In confirmation the great Jehovah said to
Moses, “Speak unto the children of Israel, that
they go forward” (Exodus 14:13–15; emphasis
added).
That is the second lesson of the spirit of
revelation. After you have gotten the message,
after you have paid the price to feel his love
and hear the word of the Lord, “go forward.”
Don’t fear, don’t vacillate, don’t quibble,
don’t whine. You may, like Alma going to
Ammonihah, have to find a route that leads
an unusual way, but that is exactly what the
Lord was doing here for the children of Israel.
Nobody had ever crossed the Red Sea this way,
but so what? There’s always a first time. With
the spirit of revelation, dismiss your fears and
wade in with both feet. In the words of Joseph
Smith, “Brethren [and, I would add, sisters],
shall we not go on in so great a cause? Go forward and not backward. Courage, brethren;
and on, on to the victory!” (D&C 128:22).
The third lesson from the Lord’s spirit of
revelation in the miracle of the crossing of the
Red Sea is that, along with the illuminating revelation that points us toward a righteous purpose or
duty, God will also provide the means and power to
achieve that purpose. Trust in that eternal truth.
If God has told you something is right, if something is indeed true for you, he will provide the
way for you to accomplish it. That is true of joining the Church. It is true of getting an education, of going on a mission or of getting
married or of any of a hundred worthy tasks in
your young lives. Remember what the Savior
said to the Prophet Joseph in the Sacred Grove.
What was the problem in 1820? Why was
Joseph not to join any other Church? It was at
least in part because “they teach for doctrines
the commandments of men, having a form of
godliness, but they deny the power thereof” (JS—
H 1:19; emphasis added).
God’s grace is sufficient! The Lord would
tell Joseph again and again through those early
difficult days that, just as in the days of old,
these modern children of Israel would
be led out of bondage by power, and with a
stretched-out arm. . . .
Therefore, let not your hearts faint . . . : Mine
angel shall go up before you. . . .
. . . and also my presence, and in time ye shall
possess the goodly land. [D&C 103:17–20]
What goodly land? Your goodly land. Your
promised land. Your New Jerusalem. Your own
little acre flowing with milk and honey. Your
future. Your dreams. Your destiny. I believe
that in our own individual ways, God takes us
to the grove or the mountain or the temple and
there shows us the wonder of what his plan is
for us. We may not see it as fully as Moses or
Nephi or the brother of Jared did, but we see as
much as we need to see in order to know the
Lord’s will for us and to know that he loves us
beyond mortal comprehension. I also believe
that the adversary and his pinched, calculating
little minions try to oppose such experiences
and then try to darken them after the fact. But
that is not the way of the gospel. That is not the
way of a Latter-day Saint who claims as the
fundamental fact of the Restoration the spirit of
revelation.
Fighting through darkness and despair and
pleading for the light is what opened this dispensation. It is what keeps it going, and it is
what will keep you going. With Paul, I say to
all of you:
Cast not away therefore your confidence, which
hath great recompence of reward.
For ye have need of patience, that, after ye have
done the will of God, ye might receive the promise.
[Hebrews 10:35–36]
I acknowledge the reality of opposition and
adversity, but I bear witness of the God of
Glory, of the redeeming Son of God, of light
and hope and a bright future. I promise you
that God lives and loves you, each one of you,
and that he has set bounds and limits to the
opposing powers of darkness. I testify that
Jesus is the Christ, the victor over death and
hell and the fallen one who schemes there. The
gospel of Jesus Christ is true, and it has been
restored, just as we have sung and testified this
morning.
“Fear ye not.” And when the second and
the third and the fourth blows come, “fear ye
not. . . . The Lord shall fight for you.” “Cast not
away therefore your confidence.” I say this in
the sacred and holy name of our Protector and
Redeemer, even the Lord Jesus Christ. Amen.

COME UNTO ME

I am honored and privileged to be invited to
address you tonight. I am very conscious
that your speaker last month was President
Gordon B. Hinckley. I am not sure how any of
us are supposed to follow him and his marvelous prophetic messages, but if you will
promise not to hiss, boo, stalk out, or otherwise
show your displeasure, I will do my best. I do
ask for your faith and prayers tonight, that the
Spirit of the Lord will be unrestrained and with
us in great abundance. Our instruction and edification, as the scripture says, is to come “from
above.” I pray for and await that heavenly
guidance even as you do.
May I say how pleased Sister Holland and
I are with the concept of a Churchwide fireside
that reaches out to all of the college-age and
young-adult audience of the Church, not only
in the U.S. and Canada but almost literally
around the world. Right after our marriage it
was our career decision and good fortune to
sign on with the Church Educational System
and—one way or another—spend the next 24
years of our lives with you. We were still doing
that in 1989 when I was called to full-time service as a General Authority. This is my first
opportunity since that call to speak in this setting to a CES audience we have known so well
and have loved for so long.
I am particularly grateful for this beautiful
choral rendition provided by the institute choir
from Snow College. That beautiful number, one
of my very favorite pieces of devotional music,
provides not only the Spirit but also the text for
my brief message to you tonight. The source
for this wonderful selection is the eleventh
chapter of Matthew, verses 28–30.
Come unto me, all ye that labour and are heavy
laden, and I will give you rest.
Take my yoke upon you, and learn of me; for I
am meek and lowly in heart: and ye shall find rest
unto your souls.
For my yoke is easy, and my burden is light.
That is my basic message to each of you
tonight, wherever you live, whatever your joys
or sorrows, however young or old you may be,
at whatever point you may find yourself in this
mortal journey of ours. Some of you know
what you want to be and where you want to go
with your lives, and some of you don’t. Some
of you seem to have so many blessings and so
many wonderful choices ahead of you. Others
of you feel, for a time and for whatever reason,
less fortunate and with fewer attractive paths
lying immediately ahead.
But whoever you are and wherever you
find yourself as you seek your way in life,
I offer you tonight “the way . . . and the life”
(John 14:6). Wherever else you think you may
be going, I ask you to “come unto him” as the
imperative first step in getting there, in finding
your individual happiness and strength and
success.
When Andrew and Philip first heard Christ
speak, they were so moved, so spellbound that
they followed him as he left the crowd. Sensing
that he was being pursued, Christ turned and
asked the two men, “What seek ye?” (John
1:38). Other translations render that simply
“What do you want?”
They answered, “Where dwellest thou?” or
“Where do you live?”
And Christ said, “Come and see.” Just a
short time later he formally called Peter and
others of the new apostles with the same spirit
of invitation, “Come, follow me” (see Matthew
4:19).
It seems to me that the essence of our lives
is distilled down to these two brief elements in
these opening scenes of the Savior’s mortal
ministry. One element is the question, to every
one of us, “What seek ye? What do you want?”
The second is his answer as to how to get that.
Whoever we are, and whatever our problems,
his response is always the same, forever:
“Come unto me.” Come see what I do and how
I spend my time. Learn of me, follow me, and
in the process I will give you answers to your
prayers and rest to your souls.
My beloved young friends, I know of no
other way for you to succeed or to be happy or
to be safe. I know of no other way for you to be
able to carry your burdens or find what Jacob
called “that happiness which is prepared for
the saints” (2 Nephi 9:43). That is why we
make solemn covenants based on Christ’s
atoning sacrifice, and that is why we take upon
us his name. In as many ways as possible, both
figuratively and literally, we try to take upon
us his identity. We seek out his teachings and
retell his miracles. We send latter-day witnesses, including prophets, apostles, and missionaries, around the world to declare his
message. We call ourselves his children, and
we testify that he is the only source of eternal
life. We plead for him to swing open the gates
of heaven in our behalf and trust everlastingly
that he will, based upon our faithfulness.
My desire for you tonight is to have more
straightforward experience with the Savior’s
life and teachings. Perhaps sometimes we come
to Christ too obliquely, focusing on structure or
methods or elements of Church administration.
Those are important and, like the tithes of mint
and anise and cummin Christ spoke of, should
be observed—but not without attention to the
weightier matters of the kingdom, first and
foremost of which is a personal spiritual relationship with deity, including the Savior,
whose kingdom this is.
The Prophet Joseph Smith taught in the
Lectures on Faith that it was necessary to have
“an acquaintance” (that’s his phrase) with the
divine attributes of the Father and the Son in
order to have faith in them. Specifically he said
that unless we believe Christ to be “merciful
and gracious, slow to anger, long-suffering and
full of goodness,” that unless we can rely on
these unchanging attributes, we would never
have the faith necessary to claim the blessings
of heaven. If we could not count on “the excellency of . . . character” (that is also his phrase)
maintained by the Savior and his willingness
and ability to “forgive iniquity, transgression,
and sin,” we would be, he said, “in constant
doubt of salvation.” But because the Father and
the Son are unchangeably “full of goodness”
then, in the words of the Prophet, such knowledge “does away [with] doubt, and makes faith
exceedingly strong” (Lectures on Faith 3:19–20).
Lay Down Your Burden
I don’t know what things may be troubling
you personally tonight, but, even knowing
how terrific you are and how faithfully you are
living, I would be surprised if someone somewhere weren’t troubled by a transgression or
the temptation of transgression. To you, wherever you may be, I say, Come unto him and lay
down your burden. Let him lift the load. Let
him give peace to your soul. Nothing in this
world is more burdensome than sin. It is the
heaviest cross men and women ever bear. And
while I believe you to be the greatest generation of young adults ever to live in this Church,
nevertheless the world around you is an
increasingly hostile and sinful place.
Occasionally that splashes onto us, and perhaps, in the case of a few of you, it may be
nearly drowning you.
To anyone struggling under the burden of
sin, we say again with the Prophet Joseph that
God has “a forgiving disposition” (Lectures on
Faith 3:20). You can change. You can be helped.
You can be made whole—whatever the problem. All he asks is that you walk away from the
darkness and come into the light, his light, with
meekness and lowliness of heart. That is at the
heart of the gospel. That is the very center of
our message. That is the beauty of redemption.
Christ has “borne our griefs, and carried our
sorrows,” Isaiah declared, “and with his stripes
we are healed”—if we want to be (Isaiah
53:4–5; Mosiah 14:4–5).
For anyone out there seeking the courage
to repent and change, I remind you that the
Church is not a monastery for the isolation of
perfect people. It is more like a hospital provided for those who wish to get well. Do whatever you have to do to come into the fold and
be blessed. For some of you that is simply to
live with greater faith, to believe more. For
some of you it does mean to repent: Right here.
Tonight. For some of you (I hope there are
investigators out there. There better be!) it
means to be baptized and come into the body
and fellowship of Christ. For virtually all of us
it means to live more by the promptings and
promises of the Holy Ghost and to “press forward with a steadfastness in Christ, having a
perfect brightness of hope, and a love of God
and of all men.”
“This is the way,” Nephi said—there is that
word again—“and there is none other way . . .
whereby man [or woman] can be saved in the
kingdom of God” (2 Nephi 31:20–21).
This reliance upon the forgiving, long-suffering, merciful nature of God was taught from
before the very foundation of the world. It was
always to give us hope and help, a reason to
progress and improve, an incentive to lay
down our burdens and take up our salvation.
May I be bold enough to suggest that it is
impossible for anyone who really knows God
to doubt his willingness to receive us with
open arms in a divine embrace if we will but
“come unto him.” There certainly can and will
be plenty of external difficulties in life. Nevertheless the soul that comes unto Christ dwells
within a personal fortress, a veritable palace of
perfect peace. “Whoso hearkeneth unto me,”
Jehovah says, “shall dwell safely, and shall be
quiet from fear of evil” (Proverbs 1:33).
That is exactly what Paul said to the
Corinthians. Trying to help them keep their
chin up—and the Corinthians had a lot to be
grim about—he wrote:
Blessed be God, even the Father of our Lord
Jesus Christ, the Father of mercies, and the God of
all comfort;
Who comforteth us in all our tribulation, that
we may be able to comfort them which are in any
trouble, by the comfort wherewith we ourselves are
comforted of God. [2 Corinthians 1:3–4]
Jesus taught the same thing to the Nephites,
who also lived in a difficult world. “For the
mountains shall depart and the hills be
removed,” he said, “but my kindness shall not
depart from thee, neither shall the covenant of
my peace be removed [from thee]” (3 Nephi
22:10; see also verses 13–14). I love that. The
hills and the mountains may disappear. The
seas and oceans may dry up completely. The
least likely things in the world may happen,
but “my kindness shall not depart from thee,
neither shall the covenant of my peace be
removed [from thee]” (emphasis added). After
all, he has, he reminds us, “graven thee upon
the palms of my hands” (1 Nephi 21:16).
Considering the incomprehensible cost of the
Crucifixion, Christ is not going to turn his back
on us now.
Peace to Our Souls
The Lord has probably spoken enough such
“comforting words” to supply the whole universe, it would seem, and yet we see all around
us unhappy Latter-day Saints, worried Latterday Saints, and gloomy Latter-day Saints into
whose troubled hearts not one of these innumerable consoling words seems to be allowed
to enter. In fact, I think some of us must have
that remnant of Puritan heritage still with us
that says it is somehow wrong to be comforted
or helped, that we are supposed to be miserable about something.
Consider, for example, the Savior’s benediction upon his disciples even as he moved
toward the pain and agony of Gethsemane and
Calvary. On that very night, the night of the
greatest suffering the world has ever known or
ever will know, he said, “Peace I leave with
you, my peace I give unto you. . . . Let not your
heart be troubled, neither let it be afraid” (John
14:27).
I submit to you that may be one of the
Savior’s commandments that is, even in the
hearts of otherwise faithful Latter-day Saints,
almost universally disobeyed; and yet I wonder
whether our resistance to this invitation could
be any more grievous to the Lord’s merciful
heart. I can tell you this as a parent: As concerned as I would be if somewhere in their lives
one of my children were seriously troubled or
unhappy or disobedient, nevertheless I would
be infinitely more devastated if I felt that at such
a time that child could not trust me to help, or
should feel his or her interest were unimportant
to me or unsafe in my care. In that same spirit,
I am convinced that none of us can appreciate
how deeply it wounds the loving heart of the
Savior of the world when he finds that his people do not feel confident in his care or secure in
his hands or trust in his commandments.
Just because God is God, just because
Christ is Christ, they cannot do other than care
for us and bless us and help us if we will but
come unto them, approaching their throne of
grace in meekness and lowliness of heart. They
can’t help but bless us. They have to. It is their
nature. That is why Joseph Smith gave those
lectures on faith, so we would understand the
nature of godliness and in the process have
enough confidence to come unto Christ and
find peace to our souls. There is not a single
loophole or curveball or open trench to fall into
for the man or woman who walks the path that
Christ walks. When he says, “Come, follow
me” (Luke 18:22), he means that he knows
where the quicksand is and where the thorns
are and the best way to handle the slippery
slope near the summit of our personal mountains. He knows it all, and he knows the way.
He is the way.
Listen to this wonderful passage from
President George Q. Cannon teaching precisely
this very doctrine:
No matter how serious the trial, how deep the distress, how great the affliction, [God] will never
desert us. He never has, and He never will. He cannot do it. It is not His character [to do so]. He is
an unchangeable being; the same yesterday, the
same today, and He will be the same throughout the
eternal ages to come. We have found that God. We
have made Him our friend, by obeying His Gospel;
and He will stand by us. We may pass through the
fiery furnace; we may pass through deep waters; but
we shall not be consumed nor overwhelmed. We
shall emerge from all these trials and difficulties the
better and purer for them, if we only trust in our
God and keep His commandments. [“Freedom of
the Saints,” in Collected Discourses, comp. and
ed. Brian H. Stuy, 5 vols. (Burbank, California:
B.H.S. Publishing, 1987–92), 2:185; emphasis
added]
Once we have come unto Christ and
found the miracle of his “covenant of peace,”
I think we are under obligation to help others
do so, just as Paul said in that verse to the
Corinthians—to live as much like he lived as
we possibly can and to do as much of what he
did in order that others may walk in this same
peace and have this same reassurance.
Heal One Another
Much of the comfort we have sung and
spoken of tonight comes from the Savior’s
power to heal—heal the wounds of life or of
sorrow or, where necessary, of transgression.
Having wanted that for you tonight, that is one
thing I would now ask from you tonight—healing, healing for others, healing for those you
love and, yes, perhaps especially for those you
don’t. The people around us need a lot of help,
and I think the Lord expects us to join in that
effort. I think that is what he meant when he
said, “Come; see what I do and watch how I
spend my time.”
Following my call to the Quorum of the
Twelve, I read all of the standard works again,
with special concentration on anything said or
done by the Savior. Inasmuch as I couldn’t
sleep, I seemed to have more than the usual
amount of time and privacy to consider these
great teachings. As I put somewhat new and
often tear-filled eyes to the scriptures, I saw
perhaps for the first time the majesty of Christ’s
healing influence—probably because I was
needing so much of that myself. As the Savior’s
ministry in the New Testament began,
Matthew records:
And Jesus went about all Galilee, teaching in
their synagogues, and preaching the gospel of the
kingdom, and healing all manner of sickness and all
manner of disease among the people.
And his fame went throughout all Syria: and
they brought unto him all sick people that were
taken with divers diseases and torments, and those
which were possessed with devils, and those which
were lunatick, and those that had the palsy; and he
healed them. [Matthew 4:23–24]
Then, following the Sermon on the Mount,
in rapid succession, he heals a leper, the servant of a centurion, Peter’s mother-in-law, and
many that were possessed with devils . . . , and
healed all that were sick:
That it might be fulfilled which was spoken by
Esaias the prophet, saying, Himself took our infirmities, and bare our sicknesses. [Matthew 8:16–17;
emphasis added]
This is then followed in equally rapid fashion
by the casting out of the devils near Gadarene,
the healing of a man with palsy, the miracle of
the woman diseased 12 years with an issue of
blood, the raising of a young woman from the
dead, the sight returned to the eyes of two
blind men, and speech returned to one who
was dumb.
With all of this work lying before him,
Jesus caps off this almost nonstop scriptural
sequence with these verses, which every missionary has heard in responding to his or her
call:
But when he saw the multitudes, he was moved
with compassion on them, because they fainted, and
were scattered abroad, as sheep having no shepherd.
Then saith he unto his disciples, The harvest
truly is plenteous, but the labourers are few;
Pray ye therefore the Lord of the harvest, that he
will send forth labourers into his harvest.
[Matthew 9:36–38]
We all know that wonderful call for more
labourers into the work of the harvest refers
primarily to teaching and testifying. It is a
wonderful missionary scripture. But I wish to
suggest tonight that in context it surely is a call
to heal one another as well. Jesus certainly did
his missionary work, and he did that first. But
as he went about preaching and teaching, he
bound up all manner of wounds in the process.
The verse summarizing all of this, coming just
before the calling of the twelve apostles and
their charge to do likewise, says:
And Jesus went about all the cities and villages,
teaching in their synagogues, and preaching the
gospel of the kingdom, and healing every sickness
and every disease among the people. [Matthew
9:35]
Most of the healing I am speaking of
tonight is not necessarily that of administering
to the physically sick, though we surely should
be ready and worthy to either request or give
such a blessing at a moment’s notice according
to the order of the priesthood. No, what I am
speaking of tonight are those rending, wrenching illnesses of the soul that need to be healed
but may be quite personal—some burden held
deep inside, some weariness that is not always
particularly obvious to the rest of the world.
Here in the shadow of the 21st century we are
more often to face slightly more metaphysical
sicknesses than those biblical ills of old like
leprosy and consumption.
On the example of the Savior himself and
his call to his apostles, and with the need for
peace and comfort ringing in our ears, I ask
you to be a healer, be a helper, be someone who
joins in the work of Christ in lifting burdens, in
making the load lighter, in making things better. Isn’t that the phrase we used to use as children when we had a bump or a bruise? Didn’t
we say to Mom or Dad, “Make it better.” Well,
lots of people on your right hand and on your
left are carrying bumps and bruises that they
hope will be healed and made whole. Someone
sitting within reasonable proximity to you
tonight is carrying a spiritual or physical or
emotional burden of some sort or some other
affliction drawn from life’s catalog of a thousand kinds of sorrow. In the spirit of Christ’s
first invitation to Philip and Andrew and then
to Peter and the whole of his twelve apostles,
jump into this work. Help people. Heal old
wounds and try to make things better.
I don’t know about you, but in my experience I hardly know of a hymn that caught on
in the Church more readily than did “Lord, I
Would Follow Thee,” written by Susan Evans
McCloud and my BYU friend of years,
K. Newell Dayley. Don’t we all respond to
these lines:
Savior, may I learn to love thee,
Walk the path that thou hast shown,
Pause to help and lift another,
Finding strength beyond my own.
Savior, may I learn to love thee—
Lord, I would follow thee.
I would be my brother’s keeper;
I would learn the healer’s art.
To the wounded and the weary
I would show a gentle heart.
I would be my brother’s keeper—
Lord, I would follow thee.
[Hymns, 1985, no. 220]
Often we can, usually unwittingly, be quite
insensitive to the circumstances and difficulties
of those around us. We all have problems, and
ultimately each individual has to take responsibility for his or her own happiness. None of us
is so free of difficulty ourselves or so endowed
with time and money that we can do nothing
but tend “the wounded and the weary.”
Nevertheless, in looking to the Savior’s life for
an example, I suspect we can probably find a
way to do a little more of that than we do.
Since I have talked a little earlier tonight
about repentance, let me repent a bit myself—
or at least do the confessing part and hope
even now there is a way for me to make some
restitution where that is still possible. My confession is that I wish I could go back to my
youth and there have another chance to reach
out to those who, at the time, didn’t fall very
solidly onto my radar scope. We are so vulnerable in our youth. (And I certainly consider
you in your youth. In fact, you look younger to
me every year of my life!) We want to feel
included and important, to have the feeling we
matter to others. In your years people deserve
to have true friendships—the real value of
which, like our health, may never be realized
until we face life without them. I think that my
problem was not that I had too few friends but
almost too many—maybe more friends than
anyone I know. But it is the associations I
didn’t have, the friends I didn’t reach that
cause me some pain now all these years later.
Let me cite just one case, which will be
guilt enough for tonight. In 1979 we held in
St. George our 20-year class reunion for Dixie
High School. We had great high school years
filled with state football and basketball championships and a host of other “hometown,
USA” memories. My life was straight out of
Happy Days. I was Richie Cunningham before
Ron Howard was Richie Cunningham. We
even had our own Fonzie—black leather jacket
and all. Anyway, an effort was made to find
current addresses for the entire class and get
everyone to the reunion.
In the midst of all that fun, I remember the
terribly painful letter written by one very
bright—but, in her childhood, somewhat overweight and less than popular—young woman
who wrote something like this:
Congratulations to all of us for having survived
long enough to have a 20-year class reunion. I hope
everyone has a wonderful time. But don’t reserve a
place for me. I have, in fact, spent most of those 20
years trying to forget the painful moments of our
school days together. Now that I am nearly over
those feelings of loneliness and shattered selfesteem, I cannot bring myself to see all of the class
and run the risk of remembering all of that again.
Have a good time and forgive me. It is my problem,
not yours. Maybe I can come at the 30-year mark.
(Which, I am very happy to report, she did.)
But she was terribly wrong about one thing—
it was our problem, and we knew it.
I have wept for her—my friend—and other
friends like her in our youth for whom I and a
lot of others obviously were not masters of “the
healer’s art.” We simply were not the Savior’s
agents or disciples that he intended a group of
young people to be. I cannot help but wonder
what I might have done to watch out a little
more for the ones not included, to make sure
the gesture of a friendly word or a listening ear
or a little low-cost casual talk and shared time
might have reached far enough to include those
hanging on the outer edge of the social circle,
and in some cases barely hanging on at all.
Jesus said in the culmination of his most
remarkable sermon ever:
For if ye love them which love you, what reward
have ye? do not even the publicans the same?
And if ye salute your brethren only, what do ye
more than others? do not even the publicans so?
[Matthew 5:46–47]
It is with some apostolic sorrow that I
acknowledge I have never known what it is
like not to have a date when everyone else had
one, nor to be painfully shy, nor to be chosen
last for basketball, nor to be truly poor, nor to
face the memories and emotions of a broken
home—nor any one of a hundred other things
I know many in this audience have had to contend with in the past or are contending with
right now. In acknowledging that, I make an
appeal for us to reach beyond our own contentment, to move out of our own comfort and
companion zone, to reach those who may not
always be so easy to reach.
If we do less, what distinguishes us from
the biblical publican? I might not have been
able to heal all the wounds of those I met in my
young adult years—your years—but I can’t
help think that if I had tried even harder to be
more of a healer, more of a helper, a little less
focused on myself, and a little more centered
on others, some days in the lives of those God
placed in my path would have been much better. “I have called you friends,” the Savior said
in one of his highest compliments to his disciples (John 15:15). Therefore, “love one another,
as I have loved you” (verse 12). That harvest is
great and the laborers are few.
Christ Watches over Us
One last piece of counsel regarding coming
to Christ. It comes from an unusual incident in
the life of the Savior that holds a lesson for us
all. It was after Jesus had performed the miracle of feeding the five thousand from five
loaves of bread and two fishes. (By the way, let
me pause here to say, Don’t worry about Christ
running out of ability to help you. His grace is
sufficient. That is the spiritual, eternal lesson of
the feeding of the five thousand.) After Jesus
had fed the multitude, he sent them away and
put his disciples into a fishing boat to cross
over to the other side of the Sea of Galilee. He
then “went up into a mountain apart to pray”
(Matthew 14:23).
We aren’t told all of the circumstances of
the disciples as they set out in their boat, but
it was toward evening, and certainly it was
a night of storm. The winds must have been
ferocious from the start. Because of the winds,
these men probably never even raised the sails
but labored only with the oars—and labor it
would have been. We know this because by the
time of “the fourth watch of the night”
(Matthew 14:25)—that is somewhere between
three and six in the morning—they had gone
only a few miles. By then the ship was caught
up in a truly violent storm, a storm like those
that can still sweep down on the Sea of Galilee
to this day.
But, as always, Christ was watching over
them. He always does, remember? Seeing their
difficulty, the Savior simply took the most
direct approach to their boat, striding out
across the waves to help them, walking on the
water as surely as he had walked upon the
land. In their moment of great extremity, the
disciples looked and saw in the darkness this
wonder in a fluttering robe coming toward
them on the ridges of the sea. They cried out in
terror at the sight, thinking that it was a phantom upon the waves. Then, through the storm
and darkness—when the ocean seems so great
and little boats seem so small—there came the
ultimate and reassuring voice of peace from
their Master. “It is I,” he said, “be not afraid”
(verse 27).
This scriptural account reminds us that the
first step in coming to Christ—or his coming
to us—may fill us with something very much
like sheer terror. It shouldn’t, but it sometimes
does. One of the grand ironies of the gospel is
that the very source of help and safety being
offered us is the thing from which we may, in
our mortal shortsightedness, flee. For whatever
the reason, I have seen investigators run from
baptism, I have seen elders run from a mission
call, I have seen sweethearts run from marriage,
and I have seen young couples run from the
fear of families and the future. Too often too
many of us run from the very things that will
bless us and save us and soothe us. Too often
we see gospel commitments and commandments as something to be feared and forsaken.
Let me quote the marvelous James E.
Talmage on this matter:
Into every adult human life come experiences like
unto the battling of the storm-tossed voyagers with
contrary winds and threatening seas; ofttimes the
night of struggle and danger is far advanced before
succor appears; and then, too frequently the saving
aid is mistaken for a greater terror. [But,] as came
unto [these disciples] in the midst of the turbulent
waters, so comes to all who toil in faith, the voice of
the Deliverer—“It is I; be not afraid.” [Jesus the
Christ, 3d ed. (Salt Lake City: The Church of
Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints, 1916), p. 337]
Brother Talmage used there the word succor.
Do you know its meaning? It is used often in
the scriptures to describe Christ’s care for and
attention to us. It means literally “to run to.”
What a magnificent way to describe the
Savior’s urgent effort in our behalf. Even as he
calls us to come to him and follow him, he is
unfailingly running to help us.
Finally recognizing the Master that night,
Peter exclaimed, “Lord, if it be thou, bid me
come unto thee on the water.”
And Christ’s answer to him was as it always
is, to all of us: “Come,” he said.
Instantly, as was his nature, Peter sprang
over the vessel’s side and into the troubled
waves. While his eyes were fixed upon the
Lord the wind could toss his hair and the spray
could drench his robes, but all was well—he
was coming to Christ. Only when his faith and
his focus wavered, only when he removed his
glance from the Master to see the furious
waves and the black gulf beneath him, only
then did he begin to sink. In fear he cried out,
“Lord, save me” (Matthew 14:28–30).
In some disappointment the “Master of
ocean and earth and skies” (see “Master, the
Tempest Is Raging,” Hymns, 1985, no. 105)
stretched out his hand and grasped the drowning disciple with the gentle rebuke “O thou
of little faith, wherefore didst thou doubt?”
(Matthew 14:31). (See also Frederic W. Farrar,
The Life of Christ [Salt Lake City: Bookcraft,
1994], pp. 310–13.)
Jesus is the Christ, the Son of the living
God. This is his true and living Church. He
wishes us to come unto him, to follow him, to
be comforted by him. Then he wishes us to
give comfort to others. However halting our
steps are toward him—though they shouldn’t
be halting at all—his steps are never halting
toward us. May we have enough faith to accept
the goodness of God and the mercy of his Only
Begotten Son. May we come unto him and his
gospel and be healed. And may we do more to
heal others in the process. When the storms of
life make this difficult, may we still follow his
bidding to “come,” keeping our eye fixed on
him forever and single to his glory. In doing so
we too will walk triumphantly over the
swelling waves of life’s difficulties and remain
unterrified amid any rising winds of despair.
I pray we will hear this very night that
sweet utterance from the Savior of the world:
“Come unto me, all ye that labour and are
heavy laden. . . . And ye shall find rest unto
your souls” (Matthew 11:28–29). “Be of good
cheer; it is I; be not afraid” (Matthew 14:27). I
pray this for you and for those you can help, in
the sacred name of Jesus Christ. Amen.

THE WILL OF THE FATHER

At a university it seems appropriate to
introduce such a message with a piece of
great literature—but I decided to use this verse
anyway. Rudyard Kipling, eat your heart out.
If you can smile when things go wrong
And say it doesn’t matter,
If you can laugh off cares and woe
And trouble makes you fatter,
If you can keep a cheerful face
When all around are blue,
Then have your head examined, bud,
There’s something wrong with you.
For one thing I’ve arrived at:
There are no ands and buts,
A guy that’s grinning all the time
Must be completely nuts.
[“Smile, Darn You, Smile”]
I begin with a bit of humor only because
the task I wish to discuss with you this morning is a sobering one—not something we can
laugh off or say doesn’t matter. It is not an issue
limited to university-educated people, but it
may be a particularly poignant one for them. It
is a matter central to our salvation, and it may
involve great pain. Unless we are “nuts,” we
probably won’t grin through it all.
“I Have Suffered the Will of the Father”
Let me take a moment to set the stage. I use
the word advisedly. I want to imply divine
theater. Ralph Waldo Emerson once wrote, “If
the stars should appear one night in a thousand
years, how would men believe and adore; and
preserve for many generations the remembrance of the city of God which had been
shown [them]!” (Nature [1836], section 1).
In the spirit of that very provocative thought,
I invite you to consider another startling—and
much more important scene that should evoke
belief and adoration, a scene which, like the
stars at night, we have undoubtedly taken too
much for granted. Imagine yourselves to be
among the people of Nephi living in the land of
Bountiful in approximately A.D. 34. Tempests
and earthquakes and whirlwinds and storms,
quickened and cut by thunder and sharp lightning, have enveloped the entire face of the land.
Some cities—entire cities—have burst
into flames as if by spontaneous combustion.
Others have disappeared into the sea, never
to be seen again. Still others are completely
covered over with mounds of soil, and some
have been carried away with the wind.
The whole face of the land has been changed,
the entire earth around you has been deformed.
Then, as you and your neighbors are milling
about the temple grounds (a place that has suddenly seemed to many like a very good place
to be), you hear a voice and see a man clothed
in a white robe descending out of heaven. It is
a dazzling display. He seems to emanate the
very essence of light and life itself—a splendor
in sharp contrast to the three days of death and
darkness just witnessed.
He speaks and says simply, with a voice that
penetrates the very marrow of your bones,
“I am Jesus Christ, whom the prophets testified shall come into the world” (3 Nephi 11:10).
There it is—or, more correctly speaking, there
he is! He is the focal point and principal figure
behind every fireside and devotional and family home evening held by those Nephites for
the last six hundred years, and by their Israelite
forefathers for thousands of years before that.
Everyone has talked of him and sung of him
and dreamed of him and prayed—but here he
actually is. This is the day, and yours is the generation. What a moment! But you find you are
less inclined to check the film in your camera
than you are to check the faith in your heart.
“I am Jesus Christ, whom the prophets
testified shall come into the world.” Of all
the messages that could come from the scroll
of eternity, what has he brought to us? Get a
pencil. Where’s my notebook? Turn on every
tape recorder in town.
He speaks:
I am the light and the life of the world; . . . I have
drunk out of that bitter cup which the Father hath
given me, and have glorified the Father in taking
upon me the sins of the world, . . . I have suffered the
will of the Father in all things from the beginning.
That is it. Just a few lines. Only fifty-two
words. “And . . . when Jesus had spoken these
words the whole multitude fell to the earth”
(3 Nephi 11:11–12).
This introductory utterance from the resurrected Son of God constitutes my only text
today. I have thought very often about this
moment in Nephite history. I cannot think it
either accident or mere whimsy that the Good
Shepherd in his newly exalted state, appearing to a most significant segment of his flock,
chooses first to speak of his obedience, his
deference, his loyalty, and loving submission to
his father. In an initial and profound moment
of spellbinding wonder, when surely he had the
attention of every man, woman, and child as
far as the eye could see, his submission to his
father is the first and most important thing he
wishes us to know about himself.
Frankly, I am a bit haunted by the thought
that this is the first and most important thing
he may want to know about us when we meet
him one day in similar fashion. Did we obey,
even if it was painful? Did we submit, even if
the cup was bitter indeed? Did we yield to a
vision higher and holier than our own, even
when we may have seen no vision in it at all?
One by one he invites us to feel the wounds
in his hands and his feet and his side. And as
we pass and touch and wonder, perhaps he
whispers, “If any man will come after me, let
him deny himself, and take up his cross, and
follow me” (Matthew 16:24).
If such cross-bearing self-denial was, by
definition, the most difficult thing Christ or
any man has ever had to do, an act of submission that would, by the Savior’s own account,
cause him, “God, the greatest of all, to tremble
because of pain, and to bleed at every pore, and
to suffer both body and spirit”—if yielding and
obeying and bowing to divine will holds only
that ahead, then no wonder that even the Only
Begotten Son of the true and living God “would
that [he] might not drink the bitter cup, and
shrink” (D&C 19:18)!
Even as we rehearse this greatest of all
personal sacrifices, you can be certain that with
some in this world it is not fashionable nor
flattering to speak of submitting—to anybody
or anything. At the threshold of the twentyfirst century it sounds wrong on the face of it.
It sounds feeble and wimpish. It just isn’t the
American way.
As Elder Neal A. Maxwell wrote recently,
In today’s society, at the mere mention of the
words obedience and submissiveness hackles
rise and people are put on nervous alert. . . . People
promptly furnish examples from secular history to
illustrate how obedience to unwise authority and
servility to bad leaders have caused much human
misery and suffering. It is difficult, therefore, to get a
hearing for what the words obedience and submissiveness really mean—even when the clarifying
phrase, “to God,” is attached. [“Not My Will, But
Thine” (Salt Lake City: Bookcraft, 1988), p. 1]
After all, we come to a university, at least
in part, to cultivate self-reliance, to cultivate
independence, to learn to think and act for
ourselves. Didn’t Christ himself say, “Ye shall
know the truth, and the truth shall make you
free” (John 8:32)? Such freedom is exactly what
universities are about, especially this one. We try
very hard here to unshackle you from the bondage of ignorance and the captivity of wrong
opinions. We want you to be strong and to have
the most enlightened intelligence possible. We
want you to be powerful and high-principled
free agents.
So how do we speak of such spiritual
freedom and intellectual independence in one
breath only to plead with you to be submissive
and very dependent in the next breath? We do
so because no amount of university education,
or any other kind of desirable and civilizing
experience in this world, will help us at the
moment of our confrontation with Christ if we
have not been able—and are not then able—to
yield, yield all that we are, all that we have, and
all that we ever hope to have to the Father and
the Son.
The path to a complete Christian education
passes through the Garden of Gethsemane,
and we will learn there if we haven’t learned
it before that our Father will have no other
gods before him—even (or especially) if that
would-be god is our self. I assume you are all
far enough along in life to be learning that great
discipline already. It will be required of each of
us to kneel when we may not want to kneel, to
bow when we may not want to bow, to confess
when we may not want to confess—perhaps
a confession born of painful experience that
God’s thoughts are not our thoughts, neither
are his ways our ways, saith the Lord (see
Isaiah 55:8).
I think that is why Jacob says to be learned—
or, we would presume, to be any other worthy
thing—is good if one hearkens unto the counsels of God. But education, or public service, or
social responsibility, or professional accomplishment of any kind is in vain if we cannot, in those
crucial moments of pivotal personal history,
submit ourselves to God even when all our
hopes and fears may tempt us otherwise. We
must be willing to place all that we have—not
just our possessions (they may be the easiest
things of all to give up), but also our ambition
and pride and stubbornness and vanity—we
must place it all on the altar’ of God, kneel there
in silent submission, and willingly walk away.
I believe what I am describing here is the
scriptural definition of a saint, one who will
“yield to the enticings of the Holy Spirit,” and
“through the atonement of Christ . . . becometh as a child, submissive, meek, humble,
patient, full of love, willing to submit to all
things which the Lord seeth fit to inflict upon
him, even as a child doth submit to his father”
(Mosiah 3:19).
Obedience, the First Law of Heaven
As the Great Exemplar and Daystar of our
lives, is it any wonder that Christ chooses first
and foremost to define himself in relation to
his father—that he loved him and obeyed him
and submitted to him like the loyal son he was?
And what he as a child of God did, we must try
very hard to do also.
Obedience is the first law of heaven, but in
case you haven’t noticed, some of these commandments are not easy, and we frequently
may seem to be in for much more than we bargained for. At least if we are truly serious about
becoming a saint, I think we will find that is the
case.
Let me use an example from what is often
considered by foes, and even by some friends,
as the most unsavory moment in the entire
Book of Mormon. I choose it precisely because
there is so much in it that has given offense to
many. It is pretty much a bitter cup all the way
around.
I speak of Nephi’s obligation to slay Laban in
order to preserve a record, save a people, and
ultimately lead to the restoration of the gospel
in the dispensation of the fulness of times. How
much is hanging in the balance as Nephi stands
over the drunken and adversarial Laban I cannot say, but it is a very great deal indeed.
The only problem is that we know this, but
Nephi does not. And regardless of how much
is at stake, how can. he do this thing? He is a
good person, perhaps even a well-educated person. He has been taught from the very summit
of Sinai “Thou shalt not kill.” And he has made
gospel covenants.
“I was constrained by the Spirit that I should
kill Laban; but . . . I shrunk and would that I
might not slay him” (1 Nephi 4:10). A bitter test?
A desire to shrink? Sound familiar? We don’t
know why those plates could not have been
obtained some other way—perhaps accidentally left at the plate polishers one night or
maybe falling out the back of Laban’s chariot on
a Sabbath afternoon.
For that matter, why didn’t Nephi just
leave this story out of the book altogether?
Why didn’t he say something like, “And after
much effort and anguish of spirit, I did obtain
the plates of Laban and did depart into the
wilderness unto the tent of my father?” At the
very least he might have buried the account
somewhere in the Isaiah chapters, thus guaranteeing that it would have gone undiscovered up
to this very day.
But there it is, squarely in the beginning of
the book—page 8—where even the most casual
reader will see it and must deal with it. It is not
intended that either Nephi or we be spared the
struggle of this account.
I believe that story was placed in the very
opening verses of a 531-page book and then
told in painfully specific detail in order to
focus every reader of that record on the absolutely fundamental gospel issue of obedience
and submission to the communicated will of
the Lord. If Nephi cannot yield to this terribly
painful command, if he cannot bring himself
to obey, then it is entirely probable that he can
never succeed or survive in the tasks that lie
just ahead.
“I will go and do the things which the Lord
hath commanded” (1 Nephi 3:7). I confess that
I wince a little when I hear that promise quoted
so casually among us. Jesus knew what that
kind of commitment would entail, and so now
does Nephi. And so will a host of others before
it is over. That vow took Christ to the cross on
Calvary, and it remains at the heart of every
Christian covenant. “I will go and do the things
which the Lord hath commanded.” Well, we
shall see.
In all of this we are, of course, probing
Lucifer’s problem—he of the raging ego, he
who always took the Burger King motto too
far and had to have everything his way. Satan
would have done well to listen to that wisest
of Scottish pastors, George MacDonald, who
warned: “There is one kind of religion in which
the more devoted a man is, the fewer proselytes
he makes: the worship of himself” (C. S. Lewis,
ed., George MacDonald: An Anthology [New York:
Macmillan, 1947], p. 110).
But Satan’s performance can be instructive. The moment you have a self there is the
temptation to put it forward, to put it first and
at the center of things. And the more we are—
socially or intellectually or politically or economically—the greater the risk of increasing selfworship. Perhaps that is why when a newborn
baby was brought before the venerable Robert E.
Lee and the hopeful parents asked for this legendary man’s advice, saying, “What should we
teach this child? How should he make his way
in the world?” the wise old general said, “Teach
him to deny himself. Teach him to say no.”
Often such an exercise in submission is as
lonely as it is wrenching. Sometimes, in those
moments when we seem to need the Lord
the very most, we are left to obey seemingly
unaided. The psalmist cries out on behalf of all
of us in such times: ‘Why standest thou afar off,
Lord? why hidest thou thyself in times of trouble?” ‘Why art thou so far from helping me? . . .
I cry in the daytime, but thou hearest not; and
in the night season, [I] am not silent.” “Hide not
thy face far from me; . . . leave me not, neither
forsake me, O God of my salvation.” “Be not
silent [un]to me” (Psalms 10:1, 22:1–2, 27:9, 28:1).
The psalmist’s plea rings most painfully of
that ultimate anguish on Calvary, the cry that
characterized an act of supreme submission:
“My God, my God, why hast thou forsaken
me?” (Matthew 27:46 and Psalms 22:1). And to
a lesser degree we hear the supplication from
Liberty Jail: O God, where art thou? And where
is the pavilion that covereth thy hiding place?
How long shall thy hand be stayed . . . ? Yea,
O Lord, how long . . . ?” (D&C 121:1–3).
We know a good deal about the abuse
that Joseph and his colleagues suffered at the
hands of their jailors. Furthermore, we know of
Joseph’s submissive spirit at that time, choosing
then of all moments to pen some of the most
sublime language in holy writ—the appeal to
maintain influence “only by persuasion, by
long-suffering, by gentleness and meekness, and
by love unfeigned” (D&C 121:41). What a setting
in which to speak so kindly. What a brutal context in which to bring out such compassion.
But part of the story we don’t remember as
well is that of fellow prisoner Sidney Rigdon.
Sidney was actually released from jail some
two months before the Prophet Joseph and
the others, but Rigdon left muttering that “the
sufferings of Jesus Christ were . . . fool[ish
compared] to his” (HC 3:264).
Now it would not behoove us here in the
security of our pleasant quarters to pass judgment on Brother Rigdon or anyone else who
suffered these indignities in Missouri, but
to say that Christ’s atoning sacrifice, bearing
the weight of all the sins of all mankind from
Adam to the end of the world, was foolishness
compared to Brother Rigdon’s confinement in
Liberty Jail smacks of that defiant and finally
fatal arrogance we so often see in those who
end up in spiritual trouble.
Professor Keith W. Perkins of our Church
History Department has written that this
moment marks the turning point for ill
in Sidney Rigdon’s life (see “Trials and
Tribulations: The Refiner’s Fire” in The Capstone
of Our Religion: Insights into the Doctrine and
Covenants, eds. Robert L. Millet and Larry E.
Dahl [Salt Lake City: Bookcraft, 1989], p. 147).
After this experience he was no longer the
distinguished leader he truly had been in the
early years of the dispensation. Soon Joseph
Smith no longer felt him to be of use in the
First Presidency, and after the Prophet’s death,
Rigdon plotted against the Twelve in an effort
to gain unilateral control over the Church. In
the end he died a petty and bitter man, one
who had lost his faith, his testimony, his priesthood, and his promises.
Joseph, on the other hand, would endure and
be exalted when it was over. No wonder the
Lord told him very early in his life, “Be patient
in afflictions, for thou shalt have many; but
endure them, for, lo, I am with thee, even unto
the end of thy days” (D&C 24:8).
“Who are those arrayed in white before the
throne of God?” John the Revelator is asked in
his mighty vision. The answer: “These are they
which came out of great tribulation, and have
washed their robes, and made them white in
the blood of the Lamb” (Revelation 7:14).
Sometimes it seems especially difficult to
submit to “great tribulation” when we look
around and see others seemingly much less
obedient who triumph even as we weep. But
time is measured only unto man, says Alma
(see Alma 40:8), and God has a very good
memory.
“Thou Hast Sought My Will”
Elder Dean L. Larsen writes of a Sabbath
observing farmer who was troubled and
dismayed to see his Sabbath-breaking neighbor bring in far better crops with a much
higher, more profitable yield. But in such
times of seeming injustice, we must remember that God’s accounts are not always settled
in October (see “The Peaceable Things of the
Kingdom” in Hope [Salt Lake City: Deseret
Book, 1988], p. 200).
Sometimes, too, we underestimate the Lord’s
willingness to hear our cry, to confirm our wish,
to declare that our will is not contrary to his and
that his help is there only for the asking.
Note this example taken from Elder F. Burton
Howard’s biography of President Marion G.
Romney. I quote Elder Howard generously in
summarizing this story.
In 1967 Sister Romney suffered a serious
stroke. The doctors told then–Elder Romney
that the damage from the hemorrhage was
severe. They offered to keep her alive by
artificial means but did not recommend it. The
family braced themselves for the worst. Brother
Romney confided to those closest to him that
in spite of his anguished, personal yearning for
Ida’s restored health and continued companionship, above all he wanted “the Lord’s will
to be done and to take what he needed to take
without whimpering.”
As the days wore on, Sister Romney became
less responsive. She had, of course, been
administered to, but Elder Romney was “reluctant to counsel the Lord about the matter.”
Because of his earlier unsuccessful experience
of praying that he and Ida might have children,
he knew that he could never ask in prayer for
something which was not in harmony with the
will of the Lord.
He fasted that he might know how to show
the Lord that he had faith and that he would
accept God’s will in their lives. He wanted to
make sure that he had done all he could do.
She continued to fail.
One evening in a particularly depressed
state, with Ida unable to speak or recognize
him, Brother Romney went home and turned
as he always had to the scriptures in an effort
to commune with the Lord. He picked up the
Book of Mormon and continued where he had
left off the night before.
He had been reading in the book of Helaman
about the prophet Nephi, who had been falsely
condemned and unfairly charged with sedition.
Following a miraculous deliverance from his
accusers, Nephi returned home pondering the
things which he had experienced. As he did so
he heard a voice.
Although Marion Romney had read that
story many times before, it now struck him this
night as a personal revelation. The words of the
scripture so touched his heart that for the first
time in weeks he felt he had tangible peace. It
seemed as if the Lord was speaking directly to
him. The scripture read:
Blessed art thou, . . . for those things which thou
hast done. . . . And thou . . . hast not sought thine
own life, but hast sought my will, and to keep my
commandments.
And now, because thou hast done this . . . I will
bless thee forever; and I will make thee mighty in
word and in deed, in faith and in works; yea, even
that all things shall be done unto thee according to
thy word, for thou shalt not ask that which is contrary to my will. [Helaman 10:4–5]
There was the answer. He had sought only
to know and obey the will of the Lord, and
the Lord had spoken. He fell to his knees and
poured out his heart, and as he concluded his
prayer with the phrase, “Thy will be done,” he
either felt or actually heard a voice which said,
“It is not contrary to my will that Ida be healed.”
Brother Romney rose to his feet. It was past
two o’clock in the morning, but he knew what
he must do. Quickly he put on his tie and coat,
then went out into the night to visit Ida in the
hospital.
He arrived shortly before three o’clock.
His wife’s condition was unchanged. She did
not stir as he placed his hands upon her pale
forehead. With undeviating faith, he invoked
the power of the priesthood in her behalf. He
pronounced a simple blessing and then uttered
the incredible promise that she would recover
her health and mental powers and yet perform
a great mission upon the earth.
Even though he did not doubt, Elder Romney
was astonished to see Ida’s eyes open as he concluded the blessing. Somewhat stunned by all
that had happened, he sat down on the edge of
the bed only to hear his wife’s frail voice for the
first time in months. She said, “For goodness’
sake, Marion, what are you doing here?” He
didn’t know whether to laugh or to cry. He said,
“Ida, how are you?” With that flash of humor
so characteristic of both of them, she replied,
“Compared to what, Marion? Compared to
what?”
Ida Romney began her recovery from that
very moment, soon left her hospital bed, and
lived to see her husband sustained as a member
of the First Presidency of the Church, “a great
mission upon the earth” indeed (F. Burton
Howard, Marion G. Romney: His Life and Faith
[Salt Lake City: Bookcraft, 1988], pp. 137–42).
We must be careful not to miss the hand of
the Lord when it is offered, when it is his desire
to assist. My daughter Mary made this point in
a recent conversation, and I asked her permission to repeat it.
She was speaking of this ironic tendency
to fear and avoid the very source of our help
and deliverance, to retreat from rather than
go toward our safety. She recalled the account
in the fourteenth chapter of Matthew, when a
storm arose on the Sea of Galilee and the ship
containing the disciples was “tossed with waves:
for the wind was contrary” (Matthew 14:24). In
the midst of their anxiety, the disciples looked
toward the shore and a being, a ghost, an apparition, was seen walking directly toward them.
This only increased their panic, and they
began to cry out in fear. But it was Christ walking on the water toward them. “Be of good
cheer,” he called out. “It is I; be not afraid”
(Matthew 14:27). He was coming to help in their
moment of need, and they, misunderstanding,
were fleeing.
“This miracle is rich in symbolism and
suggestion,” writes Elder James E. Talmage.
By what law or principle the effect of gravitation
was superseded, so that a human body could be
supported upon the watery surface, man is unable
to affirm. The phenomenon is a concrete demonstration of the great truth that faith is a principle of
power, whereby natural forces may be conditioned
and controlled. Into every adult human life come
experiences like unto the battling of the storm-tossed
voyagers with contrary winds and threatening
seas; ofttimes the night of struggle and danger is
far advanced before succor appears; and then, too
frequently the saving aid is mistaken for a greater
terror. As came unto Peter and his terrified companions in the midst of the turbulent waters, so comes to
all who toil in faith, the voice of the Deliverer—”It is
I; be not afraid.” [Jesus the Christ (Salt Lake City:
The Church of Jesus Christ of Latterday Saints,
1916), p. 337]
Our Part in This Human Drama
With that image of Christ again appearing
in grandeur before us, let me conclude this
drama where I began. We are taught that each
one of us will come face-to-face with Christ to
be judged of him, just as the world itself will be
judged at his dramatic Second Coming.
I close with an adaptation of an account by
C. S. Lewis entitled “The World’s Last Night,”
which I have commandeered and changed for
our purposes here this morning. The metaphor
and most of the language is Lewis’s, but the
application is my own.
In King Lear (III, vii) there is a man who is
such a minor character that Shakespeare has
not even given him a name: he is simply called
“First Servant.” All the characters around
him—Regan, Cornwall, and Edmund—have
fine long-term plans. They think they know
how the story is going to end, and they are
quite wrong. The servant, however, has no
such delusions. He has no notion how the play
is going to go. But he understands the present
scene. He sees an abomination (the blinding of
old Gloucester) taking place. He will not stand
for it. His sword is out and pointed at his master’s breast in an instant. Then Regan stabs him
dead from behind. That is his whole part: eight
lines all told. But, Lewis says, if that were real
life and not a play, that is the part it would be
best to have acted.
The doctrine of the Second Coming teaches
us that we do not and cannot know when
Christ will come and the world drama will end.
He may appear and the curtain may be rung
down at any moment—say, before we have filed
out of the devotional this morning. This kind of
not knowing seems to some people intolerably
frustrating. So many things would be interrupted. Perhaps you were going to get married
next month. Perhaps you were to graduate this
spring. Perhaps you were thinking of going on
a mission or paying your tithing or denying
yourself some indulgence. Surely no good and
wise God would be so unreasonable as to cut
all that short. Not now, of all moments!
But we think this way because we keep on
assuming that we know the play. In fact, we
don’t know much of it. We believe we are on
in Act II, but we know almost nothing of how
Act I went or how Act III will be. We are not
even sure we know who the major and who the
minor characters are. The Author knows. The
audience, to the extent there is an audience of
angels filling the loge and the stalls, may have
an inkling. But we, never seeing the play from
the outside (as Sister Holland has just suggested), and meeting only the tiny minority
of characters who are “on” in the same scenes
as ourselves, largely ignorant of the future
and very imperfectly informed about the past,
cannot tell at what moment Christ will come
and confront us. We will face him one day, of
that we may be sure; but we waste our time in
guessing when that will be. That this human
drama has a meaning we may be sure, but most
of it we cannot yet see. When it is over we will
be told. We are led to expect that the Author
will have something to say to each of us on the
part that each of us has played. Playing it well,
then, is what matters most. To be able to say
at the final curtain “I have suffered the will of
the Father in all things” is our only avenue to
an ovation in the end. (see “The World’s Last
Night,” in Fern-Seed and Elephants and Other
Essays on Christianity by C. S. Lewis, ed. Walter
Hooper [Great Britain: Fontana/Collins, 1975],
pp. 76–77)
The work of devils and of darkness is never more
certain to be defeated than when men and women,
not finding it easy or pleasant but still determined
to do the Father’s will, look out upon their lives from
which it may seem every trace of God has vanished,
and asking why they have been so forsaken, still
bow their heads and obey. [Paraphrased from
C. S. Lewis, The Screwtape Letters (New York:
Macmillan Publishing Co., 1961), p. 39]
That it may be so in your rich and beautiful
and blessed young lives—faithful to the Father
in all things and to the very end—I pray in the
name of Jesus Christ. Amen.

AT THEIR MOST ENLIGTENED 

Welcome back to school. As Sister Holland
has said, we love you and miss you when
you are away, and we are praying for you to
have a bright and beautiful year together. Work
hard. Learn much. Make your opportunities
count. And do come in on time at night, but
don’t come by our house to tell us.
Another Election Year
This first semester of our brand-new academic year, it should be duly noted, is going to
be spiced up by a national presidential election. It is now the first week of September, the
conventions are over, and we have nine weeks
to the day to go. And we know only two things
for certain: first, that as Reinhold Niebuhr
once said, “Man’s capacity for justice makes
democracy possible, but man’s inclination to
injustice makes democracy necessary” (The
Children of Light and the Children of Darkness,
1944). Democracy is indeed, in that sense, still
“on trial.” The civic loyalty and involvement
of our people is its fundamental appeal and its
only protection. Take your responsibilities seriously, document and discuss the issues, and
cast your vote if you are of age. (And almost
all of you are.) Democracy only works if you
do. That’s the first thing we need to know in an
election year. The second thing we know is that
the humorists are going to have a heyday, and
indeed already are.
Americans love to joke about their public figures. Thomas E. Dewey is said to have
been the first presidential casualty of a political joke when, in the campaigning of 1948,
some comedian said he looked like he had just
fallen off a wedding cake. Now you are all too
young to have even seen pictures of Governor
Dewey, but with his impeccable dark suits and
pencil-thin mustache, that is exactly how he
looked—and people laughed. President John
F. Kennedy may not have laughed, however,
when Bob Hope kept snickering about his
youth. Mr. Hope said they had served milk at
Kennedy’s first cabinet meeting, but it hadn’t
turned out well because they spent the next
half hour just burping each other.
Comedians are especially tough on politicians who move from unknown to nationally
famous in just an instant, like Senator Dan
Quayle, for example. Now, regardless of your
personal political persuasion, you have to
admit that Senator Quayle has been the object
of plenty of “fowl” jokes. Mark Russell said he
didn’t know whether the ticket of “Bush and
Quayle” was the title of a hunting magazine
or the name of an English pub. Nevertheless,
Republicans are insisting that this ticket is the
nation’s best possible insurance against turning back the clock to those bitter days of the
sixties when this country was torn apart over
the war in Indiana. It was absolutely terrible,
says Russell—the bombing of Indianapolis, the
mining of harbors along the Ohio River, crawling through those jungles just outside Gary
and South Bend. But Jay Leno has defended
Senator Quayle’s military service devoutly. He
said National Guardsmen are necessary, even
though all they can do is “sit around waiting
for something to happen. If that isn’t training
for the vice presidency, I don’t know what is.”
Military service aside, many feel that
Senator Quayle has distinct advantages over
his Democratic counterpart, Senator Lloyd
Bentsen. Someone said that at least two things
Quayle has that Bentsen doesn’t have are a
hair blower and a discernible pulse. Governor
Dukakis’ advisers wanted him to pick a running mate who was less exciting than himself,
one not likely to overshadow him. Inside
sources say it came down to either Senator
Bentsen or Orville Redenbacher.
As for the presidential candidates themselves, the comedians are not a whit more
reverential. To them Bush is a wimp and
Dukakis a shrimp, with neither of them threatening Webster’s or Calhoun’s reputations for
oratory. Mark Russell said he didn’t think
there was enough caffeine in the whole world
to keep us awake through these nine weeks.
(I don’t know where that leaves us at BYU.)
Johnny Carson may have rendered
the unkindest cut of all when he said that
Governor Dukakis was so confident he had
already ordered Phone Book One to sit on in
the Oval Office. Carson quickly noted, however, that Dukakis had reason to be confident
because one of Vice-President Bush’s recent
stem-winding addresses, a police officer and
the district attorney came up, drew a chalk
outline around him, and said no one could
approach the podium until they had identified
the next of kin.
“He Built for Eternity”
Well, enough of this nonsense. There
really is method in my madness this morning. In addition to the very important matter
of a presidential election year—and it is a
very important matter, all joking aside—
BYU is also saluting in something of a final
way the bicentennial anniversary of the U.S.
Constitution, the document William Gladstone
once described as “the most wonderful work
ever struck off at a given time by the brain and
purpose of man” (“Kin Beyond Sea,” North
American Review 127 [September/October 1878],
p. 185). In fact, BYU is this very moment in the
midst of producing a feature-length film on the
Constitutional Convention that will premiere
on 30 April 1989, the bicentennial anniversary
of George Washington’s inauguration as the
first and, arguably, the greatest of this republic’s forty presidents.
Surely when the Lord speaks in section
101 of the Doctrine and Covenants of raising
up “wise men” for the founding of this nation
and the establishment of constitutional government, he must have been speaking first and
foremost of George Washington. As unassuming as he was, Washington’s impact on the new
republic and on the framing of its government
was greater than that of any other living man.
His prestige as the victorious colonial general
was immense, and his character, his very
presence, inspired confidence.
Note this language used by a journalist of
the day to describe Washington’s arrival for
that first inauguration. It is unclear whether the
writer is describing royalty or deity.
It is impossible to do justice . . . to . . . the Scene
exhibited on his Excellency’s approach to the city.
Innumerable multitudes thronged the shores, the
wharves, and the shipping—waiting with . . .
anticipation his arrival. . . .
This great occasion arrested the publick attention beyond all powers of description. . . . All ranks
and professions expressed thief feelings, in loud
acclamations, and with rapture hailed the arrival of
the FATHER OF HIS COUNTRY. . .
The scene . . . was . . . beyond any descriptive
powers of the pen to do justice to—How universal
. . . the sentiments of respect and veneration!—All
ranks [exclaimed,] “WELL, HE DESERVES IT
ALL!”
The spontaneous [expressions] of gratitude . . .
are the highest reward that virtue enjoys, . . .
Many persons . . . were heard to say, that they
should now die contented—nothing being wanted
to complete their happiness . . . but the sight of
the Saviour of [their new nation]. [From the
Connecticut Courant of 4 May 1789, in Everett
Carll Ladd, The American Polity (New York:
W.W. Norton and Company, 1987), pp. 72–73]
That was written two hundred years ago.
Two hundred years later the adulation is still
nearly the same in both tone and content.
Listen to this from a resolution passed by
Congress and read by the president of the
United States on the two-hundredth anniversary of Washington’s birth:
Washington has come to personify the American
Republic. He presided over the convention that
framed our Constitution. The weight of his great
name was the deciding factor in securing its adoption by the States. These results could never have
been secured had it not been recognized that he
would be the first President. When we realize what
it meant to take13 distracted colonies, impoverished,
envious, and hostile, and weld them into an orderly
federation under the authority of a central government, we can form some estimate of the influence of
this great man. . . .
We have seen many soldiers who have left
behind them little but the memory of their conflicts;
but . . . the power to establish among a great people
a form of self-government which the test of experience has shown will endure was bestowed upon
Washington, and Washington alone. . . . His was
the directing spirit without which there would have
been no independence, no Union, no Constitution,
and no Republic. His ways were the ways of truth.
He built for eternity. His influence grows. His stature increases with the increasing years. In wisdom
of action, in purity of character, he stands alone. We
can not yet estimate him. We can only indicate our
reverence for him and thank the Divine Providence
which sent him to serve and inspire his fellow men.
[Handbook of the George Washington Appreciation
Course for Teachers and Students (Washington,
D.C.: U.S. George Washington Bicentennial
Commission, 1932), pp. vii–viii]
To co-opt a line from James Madison
regarding those crucial times, George
Washington “decide[d] forever the fate of
Republican government” (Ladd, The American
Polity, p.73).
I have gone to some length this morning
to pay tribute to Washington for at least two
reasons. The first is because he is a genuine
hero, and I have always wanted to make some
public expression about the truly remarkable
man I believe he was. I think we may never
fully appreciate the magnitude of his impact
upon those neonatal days of this nation when
it could have so easily died aborning.
The second reason is to draw all of this
closer to home, to see what lessons Washington
and his age have for us here at the start of
another school year at BYU. To make that
transition I quote a recent BYU visitor, political pundit and journalistic gadfly Garry Willis.
Said he:
[In an election year] we get the presidents we
deserve. A great people is what you need for a great
president. Washington was the greatest president, because the people were at their most
enlightened and alert. [America] right now is
escapist. It wants to be soothed, and told it doesn’t
have to pay or sacrifice or learn. [“Things That
Matter,” Vis a Vis, July 1988, p. 70; emphasis
added]
Now our jokes about candidates and
campaigns leave a bit of a taste in our mouths.
Can that possibly be true, that the people
made Washington great? That they, as well
as he, were “at their most enlightened and
alert”? What does that mean for a university,
especially for Brigham Young University?
I know it means there must be no concession to escapism here, that we must not be
“soothed” regarding sacrifice and learning.
This university was born out of pioneer effort
and anguish. We have a century-long tradition here of asking very much of those who
come, and we are asking more and more every
year. We intend to be a great people here. We
intend to be one of the great universities of the
world, a unique university whose light casts
a very special gospel glow. But to do that, to
become that, will require the commitment and
loyalty of every one of us. As Ben Franklin said
at the fateful signing of the declaration that
started it all, “We must all hang together, or
most assuredly we shall all hang separately”
(to John Hankcock, on signing the Declaration
of Independence, 4 July 1776). This is still
true, two hundred and twelve years and two
months and two days later in Provo, Utah.
Knowledge Wedded to Virtue
Study diligently this year. You owe it to
both your prophetic and political ancestors.
The inestimable Thomas Jefferson said, “If a
nation expects to be ignorant and free . . . , it
expects what never was and never will be”
(letter to Colonel Charles Yancey, 6 January
1816). That sounds very much like something
revealed through our own Joseph Smith—that
men and women cannot be saved in ignorance, and indeed, that they can be saved no
faster than they gain knowledge (D&C 131:6;
Teachings, p. 217).
The Prophet Joseph Smith, who shortly
before his untimely death had determined to
run for the office of president of the United
States, said to all of us at BYU;
Thy mind, O man! If thou wilt lead a soul unto salvation, must stretch as high as the utmost heavens,
and search into and contemplate the darkest abyss,
and the broad expanse of eternity. . . .
. . . Your minds will expand wider and wider,
until you can circumscribe the earth and the heavens, . . . and contemplate the mighty acts of Jehovah
in all their variety and glory. [Teachings, pp. 137,
163]
This university is one of the “mighty acts
of Jehovah,” so far as I am concerned, and
we need to pledge to it our devout and loyal
citizenship. “Just say no” to some pleasures
and some distractions. Be a little more serious
about the responsibilities you have here. Stretch
your minds, study, and pray. Learn what great
people must always learn. Seek wisdom out of
the best books. Seek it “by study and also by
faith” (D&C 88:118). Have appropriate fun at
a great time in your life, but do not wish to be
soothed in the rigor of a superior education. If
we are to be all God wants us to be, we must be
“at our most enlightened and alert.”
Brigham Young, who did not run for
president of the United States but for a brief
moment did run from one, said,
All the knowledge, wisdom, power, and glory that
have been bestowed upon the nations of the earth,
from the days of Adam till now, must be gathered
home to Zion. [JD 8:279]
Put forth your ability to learn as fast as you can,
and gather all the strength of mind and principle of
faith you possibly can. [JD 8:146]
Learn everything that the children of men know.
[JD 16:77]
Take pains and pride to . . . rear [y]our children so
that the learning and education of the world may be
theirs. [JD 12:326]
Whether building countries or wilderness
cabins, whether crossing the Delaware or the
American desert, the Founding Fathers of this
nation and the prophets of the Restoration
knew that ignorance was the enemy, literally
and profoundly a tool of the adversary. “The
glory of God is intelligence, or, in other words,
light and truth. Light and truth forsake that
evil one” (D&C 93:36–37). “If men would be
great in goodness, they must be intelligent”
(Brigham Young, Manuscript History of the
Church, manuscript in The Church of Jesus
Christ of Latter-day Saints Archives, Salt
Lake City, 22 September 1851, vol. 21, p. 88).
“If a nation expects to be ignorant and free, it
expects what never was and never will be.”
Of course, from the earliest beginnings
of Western civilization, it has always been
understood that knowledge had to be wedded
to virtue, that mere information untempered
by qualities of justice and mercy and duty and
compassion could leave one simply a sophisticated barbarian in the end.
“Live Appropriately”
Perhaps the greatest essayist ever to put
pen to paper wrote, “To compose our character is our duty, not to compose books, and
to win, not battles and provinces, but order
and tranquility in our conduct. Our great and
glorious masterpiece is to live appropriately”
(Donald M. Frame, trans., The Complete Essays
of Montaigne [Stanford: Stanford University
Press, 1958], pp. 850–51; emphasis added).
That is true whether one speaks of founding
a republic or pursuing a university degree. So
is this from the brilliant Edmund Burke:
Men are qualified for civil liberty in exact proportion to their disposition to put moral chains on their
own appetites. . . . Society cannot exist unless a
controlling power upon will and appetite be placed
somewhere; and the less of it there is within, the
more there must be without. It is ordained in the
eternal constitution of things, that men of intemperate minds cannot be free. Their passions forge
their fetters. [The Works of the Right Honorable
Edmund Burke, vol. 4 (Boston: Little, Brown,
and Company, 1889), pp. 51-52; emphasis
added]
That was said, for all intents and purposes,
at the very hour this nation was being born,
but it sounds like something someone would
say today at BYU. Who would speak that way?
Joseph Smith? Or Brigham Young? Or Karl G.
Maeser? Or Ezra Taft Benson? Or your freshman English teacher? All of them would say it.
Ignorant, intemperate minds and behavior are
the enemies to all true possibility—social, intellectual, and theological. On the other hand,
educated, disciplined, virtuous lives are the
mark and hope of true godliness, true strength,
and freedom—in this life and forever.
We want you to feel a genuine sense of
freedom at BYU, but that can only come with
an appreciation for the moral expectations and
academic standards we have cultivated here
for more than one hundred years. You are
absolutely free-perfectly free-Founding Father
and George Washington free to embrace the
vision of this university established by apostles
and prophets, and agreed upon by this community in common consent. We plead with
you to seize fully and luxuriate in that opportunity. At BYU you are free to become more
than you can become at any other university in
the world—but then you know, of course, that
I am very biased. “To compose our character is
our duty . . . and to win, not battles and provinces, but order and tranquility in our conduct.
Our great and glorious masterpiece is to live
appropriately.”
Such public and personal virtue was
understood by the Founding Fathers to be the
precondition for republican government, the
base upon which the structure of all government would be built. Such personal ideals as
John Adams’ “virtuous citizen” and Thomas
Jefferson’s “moral sense” and “aristocracy of
talent and virtue” were fundamental. Even the
pessimistic James Madison said,
I go on this great republican principle, that the
people will have virtue and intelligence to select
men of virtue and wisdom. Is there no virtue
among us? If there be not, we are in a wretched
situation. No theoretical checks, no form of
government, can render us secure. To suppose
that any form of government will secure liberty
or happiness without any virtue in the people, is
a chimerical idea. [20 June 1788, in The Debates
in the Several State Conventions on the Adoption
of the Federal Constitution, arr. Jonathan Elliot,
vol. 3 (Philadelphia: J.B. Lippincott, 1901),
pp. 536–37]
To Be Honorable
We have a code of honor at BYU, and I
invite you to join with us this year in discussing and enhancing it. I especially invite you
to join with your BYUSA officers in reviewing
this code, examining its tradition and meaning,
and reexamining its premises and its promises.
If as a university community it is possible, as
some already helping us consider, to write a
yet better expression of what it means to be
honorable here, we will do so.
Inasmuch as this is your code, and it is
the broad basis upon which we form a moral
community at BYU, it is important for you
to understand it and come to feel a sense of
personal ownership for it. It means much more
than keeping your hair trimmed and well
groomed, and more than dressing modestly
and cleanly, though we expect that of every
one of you. Surely all can understand why
shorts and miniskirts and sloppy clothing and
bizarre hair fashions are inappropriate at BYU.
We want a clean, modest, dignified appearance because we stand for something here. We
are not a high school and we are not just any
university. At BYU, disciplined appearance
represents an external aspect of a much more
important and sacred inner discipline. Perhaps
good grooming and modest, clean clothing
are for BYU what some religions speak of as
symbolic sacraments—“an outward sign of
an inward grace.” And that “inward grace”
ought to be dealing with what Jesus called “the
weightier matters of the law.” These include
honesty and chastity and integrity and service—the consequential issues of the Honor
Code.
Be honest in class and out. Be women and
men of integrity with your teachers, your
roommates, your bishops, and yourselves.
Don’t cheat on an exam or steal a bicycle or
backpack and then stand in slack-jawed wonder when a high-ranking government official
commits espionage or a wealthy businessman
goes to jail for embezzlement.
How true is that our destinies are decided by
nothings and that a small imprudence helped by
some insignificant accident, as an acorn is fertilized by a drop of rain, may raise the trees on which
perhaps we and others shall be crucified. [Henri
Frederic Amiel, Journal, 9 April 1856, tr. Mrs.
Humphry Ward]
Be clean in thought and word and deed. I
told you last winter how strongly I feel about
the symbols and sacraments of human intimacy. That intimacy is not yours to violate,
and you do so at your peril. It will never matter at BYU if we have immaculate buildings
and manicured grounds and clean clothing and
well-groomed hair if in our inner selves we are,
as Christ once said to the hypocritical, “like
unto whited sepulchers, which indeed appear
beautiful outward, but are within full of dead
men’s bones, and . . . uncleanness” (Matthew
23:27).
Steven Blake’s Sacrifice
I started with George Bush and Michael
Dukakis and went on to George Washington
and Thomas Jefferson. That is all pretty heady
company for us here in Utah County. Let me
end on a more local note, with one brand of
BYU citizenship much closer at hand. I tell you
this story for its virtue, not for sensationalism
or sentimentality.
Last Tuesday, just one week ago this very
hour, Steven Eugene Blake was buried, a
twenty-one-year-old sophomore, son of faculty
member and friends Reed and Katie Dean
Blake. Steven was a BYU student majoring
in just about everything, one who believed
in learning and virtue and sacrifice. He interrupted his university experience to serve a
mission, as so many of you will do or have
done, and he served with devotion and faith
and immense enthusiasm.
Two months to the day after returning
from his mission, as Steven was preparing to
reenter BYU, he witnessed a terrible accident
at 225 West 2230 north in Provo, Utah. Two
employees of a local company were erecting a
large metal sign near that street. Unfortunately,
the mechanical boom they were operating
from their service truck came in contact with
the mega-sized 7200-volt power line that runs
along 2230 North. When that current flashed
down the boom to the truck, the employee
working near it was immediately knocked
unconscious, falling onto the electrified ground
wire and onto other perhaps now highly
charged metals that were nearby. The other
employee, who had been operating the boom
and had barely jumped to safety, called for
medical assistance and then tried to free his
colleague from the current.
Driving by this scene was Mr. Enthusiasm
himself—big, handsome, fun-loving Steven
Blake, BYU student, returned missionary,
citizen. A wrestler and football player in high
school, Steven, knowing that a human life was
at stake, but perhaps not realizing that life
would be his own, stopped his car and joined
that employee in trying to muscle his colleague
away from contact with the penetrating voltage. In doing so, both men were immediately
knocked unconscious, the employee falling
away from the truck but Steven falling forward
onto the wire and highly charged soil near the
rear of the truck. His body immediately began
to convulse from the relentless electrical pulse
surging through him.
Another valiant Samaritan happening by,
Dave Conley of Salt Lake City, then tried to
rescue Steven, but was immediately knocked
back. He fell unconscious, free from the electrical field.
Emergency medical personnel soon arrived
but were unable to free Steven from the current
until after the power had finally been shut off.
For some seventeen minutes Steven Blake—
BYU student, returned missionary, citizen—lay
with 7200 volts pounding through his muscular frame.
I sat in the Edgemont Fifth Ward Chapel
one week ago this very moment and thought of
Steven and thought of you and thought of the
beginning of new school terms for us and for
him.
“A great people is what you need for a
great university,” to paraphrase Mr. Wills.
“Not those who wish to escape, or be soothed,
but a people willing to pay and sacrifice and
learn.” Steven Blake’s sacrifice seems an
immense one this morning as I look at you and
look at his family who are here with us. We
could speak of what one should and should
not do when a lethal current is exposed and in
force. But that is not my purpose. My purpose
today is only to pay tribute to “virtuous citizenship”: “Greater love hath no man than this,
that a man lay down his life for his friends”
( John 15:13).
I tell this story this morning for its Christian
significance on a campus where we pledge and
profess Christian belief. I submit to you that
our effort this year must be perhaps different
in degree but not in kind from the effort that a
ragged bunch of irregulars made during a winter at Valley Forge, that a beleaguered band of
pioneer outcasts made in these valleys for the
privilege of freedom and worship and growth,
and that Steven Blake made on behalf of
seventy-year-old Johnny Wakamatsu. I submit
to you that your devotion to your educational
opportunity and the life of service that must
follow it is to be different in degree but not in
kind from that gift given by the Son of God
himself, made for friend and foe alike—none of
whom could possibly have comprehended the
full meaning and majesty of the privilege he
was providing them. In this academic year of
presidential elections and bicentennial celebrations, I salute you, the students of Brigham
Young University who have chosen to educate
your minds, discipline your appetites, and
serve, indeed sacrifice for your fellow men
and women.
God bless you for being the generation you
are, “fair as the moon, clear as the sun, and terrible as an army with banners” (D&C 109:73).
God bless you for wanting to be at your “most
enlightened and alert,” for preparing to live as
“a great and glorious masterpiece.” I pray for
every blessing upon you this year as you strive
to fill that full measure of your creation, in the
name of Jesus Christ. Amen.

A SCHOOL IN ZION

Late last winter I was feeling pretty blue
about something or other that didn’t seem
quite right at the university and found myself
wondering if all the effort was really worth it.
As is so often the case with such monumental
matters, I don’t even remember now what it was—
but whatever it was, it made those winter days a
bit darker than usual.
That led to a question I found myself asking late
one night in the darkened study of the President’s
Home: “Should the Church even have a university
at all?” Did it justify the effort, the expense, the
toil, the tithing—and was it worth the pain? After
all, the Church had disengaged from a number
of operations, which included not only hospitals
and hotels but, of far more interest to us, schools.
Should the Church, I wondered, continue to fund
BYU if resources are limited, if an increasing number of students cannot attend, and if individuals
at the university—or in any way the university
collectively—could not measure up to the expectations that so many generations have had for us?
I sat there that night thinking of what I said on
August 26, 1980, when you were kind enough to sit
through the very first of these nine messages from
me. I said then that I was gambling everything I
had, in whatever the Holland administrative years
would be, on one single and preeminent principle.
That cardinal supposition, that consuming vision,
was that we could be an excellent university,
indeed a truly great university, an “educational
Mt. Everest,” if you will, and still be absolutely,
unequivocally, forever faithful to the gospel of
Jesus Christ and to his restored Church that
sponsors us. In fact, we would accomplish the
one because of the other, never in spite of it. My
presidential belief—the only one that seemed to
me to justify BYU’s existence—was that we could
have it both ways, that superb scholarship and
rock-solid faith were as inextricable in our future
as they were essential to it. I spoke that day of
“scholar-saints” who could make this university
one of the latter-day wonders of the world.
From that first meeting to this very hour I have
believed that such idealism, such passion for the
ultimate possibility, was incumbent upon us all.
“’Tis but a base ignoble mind That mounts no
higher than a bird can soar,” Gloucester reminded Suffolk. I believed we could somehow, someway
mount higher, and I was certain God expected our
minds to soar. Henry Thoreau had mused by the
side of his woodland pond that “in the long run
men hit only what they aim at.” So not failure but
low aim would be the most severe indictment of a
Latter-day Saint fortunate enough to be at BYU.
Surely we of all people are moved by that
“indomitable urge”—that’s Ortega y Gasset’s
phrase—to expand life, to enlarge it, to improve it.
That is our hope, our heritage, our theology. From
the beginning ours has been a soul-stretching
belief. “Thy mind, O man!” said the Prophet
Joseph Smith, “if thou wilt lead a soul unto salvation, must stretch as high as the utmost heavens,
and search into and contemplate the darkest abyss,
and the broad expanse of eternity.” Only then,
he said, could we “contemplate the mighty acts of
Jehovah in all their variety and glory.”
“The mighty acts of Jehovah”? I have believed
that BYU should be one of the mighty acts of
Jehovah. To be less than that for his purposes and
his people seemed to me a blasphemy.
With such aspirations for us all, I suppose it
isn’t surprising that sometimes in the dark of the
night I feel we are not measuring up. Soaring is,
after all, difficult work. And yes, I did remember that Nauvoo, the city of Zion, had been laid
out to feature two Latter-day Saint monuments:
a temple and a university. But I also knew that
scholastic tension between the sacred and profane had marked most of this world’s history, and
if the dream weren’t really attainable, then why
have a BYU at all? The fraction of the Church’s
youth we can serve decreases dramatically each
year; we have a fixed BYU student numerator and
an exploding Church membership denominator.
So the only challenge we can ever address is the
qualitative one. And if we can’t win that war—if
Jerusalem really can’t find and fellowship Athens
and seal her firmly into the family group sheet —
then let’s stop holding all these cottage meetings
in Provo.
Would it not, I wondered, be better to use
the tithing resources of the Church in a more
fundamental way—missionary work or temple
building or humanitarian aid, say—and let our
students attend any one of a thousand other
universities that don’t pretend to such millennial
aspirations? If BYU were ever to look and act just
like any other university, who needs it? Not, I was
certain, the tithe payers of the Church.
Those are very dark thoughts—but then I’ve
learned that most thoughts at 1:00 or 2:00 in the
morning are pretty dark. (Thank heavens for
sleep. Surely the Lord knew what he was doing
when he put a night between two days. But back
to the study in the President’s Home.)
Thanks to my wife, I long ago established the
habit of reading at least some scripture every
night before retiring, however late it might be. So
after such dark thoughts, I turned a lamp back
on and reached for my scriptures. For whatever
reason I decided not to pursue the sequential
reading that I do most nights. I simply felt
inspired to open the scriptures at random and
find something fresh and unfamiliar. Now I don’t
believe every time anybody opens a scripture
it is necessarily an inspired act. Sometimes it
is, but I am equally confident that sometimes it
isn’t. Certainly those evenings when the book has
fallen open to the book of Numbers or the Bible
Dictionary I have felt less inspired than others.
But this night I opened the book without prejudice and with, I think, a special measure of hope
in my heart. Literally and truly the first words on
which my eyes fell were these in section 97 of the
Doctrine and Covenants: “Behold, I say unto you,
concerning the school in Zion, I, the Lord, am well
pleased that there should be a school in Zion” (D&C
97:3; emphasis added).
Those words hit me like a jackhammer. I chilled
and blushed and chilled again. I stood up and
walked around the room. I’m not embarrassed
to tell you I was emotional—you know me well
enough to have assumed that; I blubber if the sun
comes up. And there across the street just a few
yards from our home I thought I saw the statue
of Karl G. Maeser smile. (Karl actually wears a
pretty stern look all day there atop his pedestal, so
perhaps he smiles every morning at about 1:30 just
to relax, but I hadn’t seen him do it before!)
So I took something of a lightning strike that
night, and I almost felt required to apologize: “Lord, I really don’t harbor doubts about why we
have BYU, even on the bad days. Think of it as
a joke, a kind of bad joke, I was playing on my
neighbor over there, President Maeser. Please don’t
garnish my wages or my salvation. And please
don’t send me with President Cluff to search on
horseback for Zarahemla.” I even considered
singing the school song. “There has to be ‘a
school in Zion,’ you idiot, because there can be no
Zion without it!” By this time I suspected that the
Brigham Young statue was smiling too.
Now I know the school referred to in section 97
is technically not BYU. But BYU is, nevertheless,
a legitimate academic descendant of the School
of the Prophets, and I got a pat on the backside
that night that suggested I stop whining and go
to work; there was an inheritance to be claimed.
So today I stand before you a repentant man and
now presume to answer in some detail my own
dark and fleeting question. I would like to suggest
why I think the Lord is well pleased that there be
“a school in Zion” and why his servants have kept
a Brigham Young University when almost all other
Church academies are gone, why I think we need it
yet, and why I am committed more than ever to its
rightful destiny, a university worthy to place before
the all-searching eye of God.
As I have already said, the most conspicuous
and fundamental reason for “a school in Zion” is
plainly and simply because it is our theology. You
know the verses:
Do the work of printing, and . . . selecting and writing
books for schools in this church, that little children also
may receive instruction before me as is pleasing unto
me. [D&C 55:4]
Teach ye diligently and my grace shall attend you,
that you may be instructed more perfectly in . . . things
both in heaven and in the earth, and under the earth;
things which have been, things which are, things which
must shortly come to pass; . . . a knowledge also of
countries and of kingdoms. [D&C 88:78–79]
Seek ye out of the best books words of wisdom; seek
learning, even by study and also by faith. [D&C 88:118]
Study and learn, and become acquainted with all
good books, and with languages, tongues, and people.
[D&C 90:15]
Such knowledge would rise with us in the
Resurrection, we were told, and most sobering of
all was the warning: “It is impossible for a man to
be saved in ignorance” (D&C 131:6), for “the glory
of God is intelligence, or, in other words, light and
truth” (D&C 93:36), and “light and truth forsake
that evil one” (D&C 93:37). I will come back to that
line later.
So part of the message of the restored gospel
of Jesus Christ, part of the light now shining into
what had been dark ages indeed, was the divine
counsel that “to be learned is good if [we] hearken
unto the counsels of God” (2 Nephi 9:29).
Surely the most powerful and compelling of
all the glorious principles to reenter the world
by way of Palmyra was the doctrine of inherent
deity. Dare we think it? Could we say it? Would
we be labeled blasphemers and heretics for
believing it—that we are all literally the spiritual offspring of God, his rightful daughters and
sons, who through a kind of divine DNA and the
atoning mediation of that greatest of all heirs, the
Lord Jesus Christ, have been given the chance to
somewhere, someday by “diligence and obedience” (D&C 130:19) know what God knows and
do what God does? From those most humble
beginnings in Fayette to the magnificence of the
final Follett sermon, the Prophet Joseph kept rolling back the firmament, kept letting us glimpse,
however myopically, into the vast expanse of our
own eternity.
“God has created man with a mind capable
of instruction,” he wrote, “and a faculty which
may be enlarged in proportion to the heed and
diligence given to the light communicated from
heaven to the intellect.” No wonder we would
be “ardent friends of learning,” as President
George Q. Cannon described the Latter-day
Saints. No wonder we would be “true seekers after
knowledge.” No wonder Joseph would leave
warning, “A man is saved no faster than he gets
knowledge.” It would be axiomatic that some truths matter
much more than others, but an educated LDS mind
would know that and, having circumscribed all
truth into one great whole, it would order and
integrate and prioritize truth, mixing knowledge
with virtue, love, and the saving ordinances
of God. In reflecting on the atrocities of the
Holocaust, George Steiner observed:
We know now that a man can read Goethe or Rilke
in the evening, that he can play Bach and Schubert,
and go to his day’s work at Auschwitz in the morning.
. . . [What grows] up inside literate civilization [that
seems to lead to] barbarism?
“What grows up . . . is information without
knowledge, knowledge without wisdom, and
wisdom without . . . compassion.” So a Latterday Saint would read Goethe at sundown, play
Bach in the evening, and the next day die for his
fellowmen, if necessary.
“The Lord requireth the heart and a willing
mind,” Joseph taught (D&C 64:34; emphasis
added). Your mind and heart must expand
together. “You must enlarge your souls towards
each other,” he pled. “Let your hearts expand [as
you learn], let them be enlarged towards others.”
“The heart and a willing mind.”
And what of Brigham Young? The longer I
live and the more I read, the more fitting I find
it that this largest and nearly last remnant of
the academies established under his pioneer
leadership still bears and perpetuates his name.
As his advocate Hugh Nibley says, “There never
was a man more undeviatingly consistent and
rational in thought and utterance.”
Brigham Young’s metaphor for life was the
academy, and the principal schoolmaster was his
beloved Joseph Smith. Of Joseph he said, “He took
heaven, figuratively speaking, and brought it down
to earth; and he took the earth, brought it up, and
opened up, in plainness and simplicity, the things
of God; and that is the beauty of his mission.”
How plain was that view of life? How simple? To
Brigham Young, quite simple. “What are we here
for?” Brigham asks. He answers: “To learn to enjoy
more, and to increase in knowledge and in experience.”
Brigham taught:
The object of this existence is to learn. . . .
How gladly would we understand every principle
pertaining to science and art, and become thoroughly
acquainted with every intricate operation of nature. . . .
What a boundless field of truth and power is open for
us to explore! We are only just approaching the shores
of the vast ocean of information that pertains to this
. . . world, to say nothing of that which pertains to the
heavens.
Hugh Nibley says, “The treasures of the earth
are merely to provide us with room and board
while we are here at school.” And Brigham
Young, speaking of property and possessions, said:
They are made for the comfort of the creature, and not
for his adoration. They are made to sustain and preserve
the body while procuring the knowledge and wisdom that
pertain to God and his kingdom, in order that we may
preserve ourselves, and live for ever in his presence.
And when we have lived millions of years in the
presence of God and angels . . . , shall we then cease
learning? No, or eternity ceases.
We shall never cease to learn, unless we apostatize.
. . . Can you understand that?
Obviously that kind of effort would be a
struggle, but it was a struggle Brigham was always
willing to ask for. He must have anticipated all
the demands on our time at BYU. Stay anxiously
engaged, he said. Actually, what he said is:
After suitable rest and relaxation there is not a day,
hour or minute that we should spend in idleness, but
every minute of every day of our lives we should strive
to improve our minds and to increase [our] faith [in] the
holy Gospel.
The more knowledge the Elders have the better.
And, of course, for him knowledge meant
knowledge of everything.This is the belief and doctrine of the Latter-day Saints.
Learn everything that the children of men know.
Every true principle, every true science, every art, and
all the knowledge that men possess, or that they ever did
or ever will possess is from God. We should take pains
and pride to . . . rear our children so that the learning
and education of the world may be theirs.
Teach the children, give them the learning of the world
and the things of God.
Mothers, . . . we will appoint you a mission to teach
your children their duty; and instead of ruffles and fine
dresses to adorn the body, teach them that which will
adorn their minds.
“We are trying to teach this people to use their
brains,” he said. “Whatever duty you are called
to perform, take your minds with you, and apply
them to what is to be done.”
Apparently Brigham had an experience or two
when someone must have forgotten that.
In things pertaining to this life, the lack of knowledge
manifested by us as a people is disgraceful.
I have seen months and months, in this city, when
I could have wept like a whipt child to see the awful
stupidity of the people.
But that pain was the pain of a prophet, not
merely a pedagogue. He knew why we needed to
be intelligent.
All our educational pursuits are in the service of God,
for all these labors are to establish truth on the earth, . . .
that we may increase in knowledge, wisdom, understanding in the power of faith and in the wisdom of God,
that we may become fit subjects to dwell in a higher state
of existence and intelligence than we now enjoy.
“If men would be great in goodness, they must
be intelligent,” Brigham would say.
So it was theology. But surely one need not have
a school to learn. No, and many didn’t, including
Joseph and Brigham themselves, but they knew
that made it harder and maybe a lot less likely.
They wanted structure and synergism for their
young scholars. They needed, in short, a place in
which to assemble and intensify their education;
ergo, reason number two: they needed “a school
in Zion”—like we need BYU. It may be too much
to call ourselves Zion in the 1980s, but we can
be a place of gathering, not only for an academic
family five times the population of the southern
Utah city in which I was born, but a gathering
place for the knowledge and “treasures surviving
in the earth from every age and culture.”
Immediately after arriving in the valley,
President Young initiated such a gathering. He
told the Saints:
[Secure] at least [one] copy of every valuable treatise
on education—every book, map, chart, or diagram that
may contain interesting, useful, and attractive matter,
to gain the attention of children, and cause them to love
to learn to read; . . . also every historical, mathematical,
philosophical, geographical, geological, astronomical,
scientific, practical, and all other . . . useful and interesting writings.
It is the business of the Elders of this Church . . . to
gather up all the truths in the world pertaining to life
and salvation, to the Gospel we preach, to mechanism[s]
of every kind, to the sciences, and to philosophy,
wherever [they] may be found in every nation, kindred,
tongue, and people, and bring it to Zion.
All science and art belong to the Saints.
[They must] rapidly collect the intelligence that is
bestowed upon the nations, for all this intelligence
belongs to Zion. All the knowledge, wisdom, power, and
glory that have been bestowed upon [all] the nations
of the earth, from the days of Adam till now, must be
gathered home to Zion.
And, of course, gathering the stuff of learning,
the things of learning, or even the students of
learning was not enough. So, reason number
three. What any true Zion would need—and what
the present world needs even more—are those
educated and spiritual and wise who will sort,sift, prioritize, integrate, and give some sense
of wholeness, some spirit of connectedness to
great eternal truths. At the turn of the twentieth
century, Josiah Royce, writing about the great
intellectual achievements of our time, observed
that man has, through the richness of the
intellectual quest, “become more knowing, more
clever, . . . [and] more skeptical.” But we have not,
Royce warned, become “more profound or more
reverent.” Nor have we found a way to put our
learning in the context of the eternal.
Everyone in this room knows as well as I that
from Royce’s day to this, the problem with higher
education has been the perpetuation of dividedness, separateness, departmentalization, specialties, subspecialties, and subspecies of subspecialties. Universities in this nation are informational
Nagasakis, higher educational Hiroshimas. The
“watchmen on the tower” cry out for those who
will integrate, coalesce, clarify, and give both
order and rank to important human knowledge.
This generation has students who may not dare
to ask the great human questions because their
answers appear to be somewhere in the bottom
of an academic dumpster, one nearly exploding
at the seams from curricular cramming. “The
connectedness of things is what the educator
[must pursue],” said Mark Van Doren. “No human
capacity is great enough to permit a vision of
the world as simple, but if the educator does not
aim at the vision no one else will, and the consequences are dire when no one does.”
So I am convinced that the Lord needs “a school
in Zion” now, even more than a century ago, to
help a generation, indeed to help an entire Church
membership, sort through much intellectual
nonsense that is inevitably in an inert swamp of
facts. More than any time in human history our
students need—like Matthew Arnold needed—a
Latter-day Saint Sophocles to teach them, to whom
they would gladly give “special thanks [for an]
even-balanced soul, . . . Who saw life steadily and
saw it whole.”
Is not BYU the restored gospel’s designated
place to see “life steadily and [see] it whole”?
Shouldn’t it be here that no less an intellect than
Albert Einstein could find what he called that
“vivid sense of the [truly] beautiful, [that vivid
sense] of the morally good”? Could that not be
one of the functions of the Zion of the mind, as
Professor Allen Bergin referred to the university
in light of his own conversion to the Church and
decision to come to BYU? A place not only to
love the truth and gather it but a place to organize
and integrate it as well. A place for connectedness,
for true community. A place for “even-balanced
soul[s].”
But even as I make this appeal for us to help
our students and ultimately our church, I fear
that we often can hardly help ourselves toward
such wholeness and integration. Whether we are
plumbers or professors, clerks or clinicians, we
find it very hard to transcend our departments
and specialties. Heaven only knows we find it
hard to transcend the trivia of administration.
Let me use a homely example.
Last year in this setting I referred to a book
on education by Allan Bloom, The Closing of the
American Mind, which has since been on the New
York Times best-seller list, hard cover and paperback, for some sixty weeks. I said then that it
was perhaps the most unlikely best-selling book
of modern times—filled with philosophy and
erudite allusions and written on a dull subject like
the responsibility of university presidents and
professors. Whoever else might be interested in
such matters (and apparently a surprising number were), the provocative title The Closing of the
American Mind and the even more provocative
subtitle How Higher Education Has Failed Democracy
and Impoverished the Souls of Today’s Students could
not, I think, be more compelling or insistent to the
eye of a university population.
On the basis of the title alone, would not our
professional loyalties, or just the immensely
heated discussion the book has stimulated for
more than a year, almost force us to read it—at
least a chapter or two? Without being either
patronizing or prescriptive, may I just wonder
aloud how many in our community have sampled
it. I realize it is not required reading. I also realize its scope doesn’t fall neatly into a department.
Indeed, the writer may have a background and
behavior that do not square with ours. Best of all,I realize that one might argue against the book at
least as vigorously as one would argue for it, but
how are we supposed to know?
Great Scott! We are, you and I, accused in a
runaway best-seller of closing minds, of failing
democracy, and of impoverishing souls! Those
are terrible indictments. People have been pouring into bookstores in unprecedented numbers to
watch one man slap, for all intents and purposes,
every university in the nation with a gigantic slab
of tuna. What are we to do? Hunker down deeper
into our departments? I wonder.
The author says the book is “a meditation
on the state of our souls.” Does it succeed?
• Is, as he says, the crisis in the university “the
profoundest crisis” modern nations face?
Why?
• What of his argument that the U.S.
Constitution is something more of “moral
order” than of “rules of government”?
• What does he mean when he says, “Nature
[is] the standard by which we [must] judge
our . . . lives”? Isn’t the natural man an enemy
to God?
• Does he believe science can or cannot deal
with issues of “the good”?
• Is every Frenchman—and perhaps every
human being anywhere—born either
Cartesian or Pascalian, and why on earth
would it matter?
• What of his principal tension in the book, that
of freedom vs. openness? Do such distinctions amount to anything?
• How does he feel about the home and family?
Would Latter-day Saints generally agree or
disagree?
• Is watching a PBS program “the high tide [of
American] intellectual life”?
• What distinctions, pro or con, does he give
to phrases like “moral instinct,” “moral
reasoning,” “moral training,” “moral
education,” and “moral action”?
• Why does he say it is easier to “grasp the condition” of a student’s soul in the Louvre than
in a university classroom? How so?
• Is our critic for or against more movies about
Sir Thomas More and Mohandas Gandhi?
• What course at the university is most likely to
give a student the lasting “image of a perfect
soul”?
• What role does music play in what the author
calls the one “regularly recognizable . . . distinction between [the] educated and uneducated in America”?
• Of what does he speak when he quotes Saul
Bellow saying it “is a kind of ghost town into
which anyone can move and [immediately]
declare himself sheriff”?
• What is the unique significance the author
gives to the word modesty, and how does
it reflect on a fictional character like Anna
Karenina or a real one like St. Augustine?
• Is it, in fact, any big deal that America has
never had to “kill a king” or overthrow a
church?
• How does he feel about psychologists and
psychoanalysis? Do they rank higher or
lower than economists and economics? Does
he have the slightest idea what he is talking
about in either field?
Well, enough of this. Okay, so we’re not particularly interested in this book. Maybe we don’t
need to be. It certainly isn’t the lost 116 pages of
the Book of Mormon manuscript, and no one
needs to tell me how precious time is. Choices are
inevitable.
But I think how wonderful it would be if,
as a true community, we all read something
together and talked about it, something broad
and provocative and fun. If Bloom is too far down
the alphabet, I’d settle for Aeschylus. I think it
would be absolutely delightful if every person in
this room would read tonight Prometheus Bound,
Agamemnon, and Seven Against Thebes. That’s about
forty-two pages—shouldn’t take us more than a
couple of campaign speeches to do it—and then
over a paintbrush or pizza or pair of pinking
shears, wherever we gather together, we could
discuss them, gospel insights and all. That sounds
more fun to me than George Bush and Michael
Dukakis meeting face-to-face at a charisma clinic.How might we cultivate the larger sense of connectedness and community here? I do worry about
faculty, staff, and administrative segmentation
that keeps us from being a full-fledged “school
in Zion.” Fortunately those aspirations I spoke
of earlier work in our favor. The ennobling climb
toward an Everest allows us—indeed requires
us—to take the high ground and gives us a place
to view the broader, more liberating, more eternal
“general” education, if you will, that is so fundamental to the growth of the human mind and
development of the human soul.
That is the real merging we someday have to
do here—not only organizing and pruning and
prioritizing the world’s knowledge all about us but
also fusing gospel insights and gospel perspectives
into every field and discipline of study. One faculty
member recently wrote me, saying:
We need—without arrogance but with energy and
daring—to try [to] integrate faith and scholarship in
our writing and in our teaching and improve it until
it stands on its own merit. . . . We especially need to
get over merely trying to imitate others or win their
approval. Too many [here] are still worrying whether
what they write or say will pass the judgment of [a
particular university] (of all places!).
We ought to more fully find a way, a unique way, to
combine the best of traditional scholarship with the religious and moral questions and perspectives intrinsic to
that scholarship and to the restored gospel. That ought
not to be an avocation but a central part of our scholarly
work.
The echo of President Spencer W. Kimball’s
inaugural charge is in the air. “[Your] light must
have a special glow. You [must] do many things
[here] that are done elsewhere, but you must do
them better.”
I would quickly note that some disciplines
probably lend themselves a little more directly
to gospel insights and influence than others,
so please spare me the sardonic questions as to
whether there is a Mormon mathematics or a
consecrated chemistry. There probably isn’t, but I
would say there are Mormon mathematicians and
consecrated chemists and endowed engineers and
historians who are high priests. That should be an
advantage to our integration of truth.
I am making an unabashed appeal for a distinctly LDS approach to education—an approach
best featured on this campus by our present
university-wide efforts in religion, honors, and
general education.
Now I do not want my next statement misunderstood. Please, do not misunderstand. I do
not believe that Brigham Young University, at
least with current policies on both funding and
mission, will or should ever aspire to be a great
research university as the nation defines research
universities. I do believe, however, with all my
heart that we should aspire to become the finest undergraduate university on the face of the
planet. Now the misunderstanding I don’t want is
a knee-jerk, unwarranted assumption that we will
therefore have no serious scholarship required of
us nor have a significant, albeit careful selection of
graduate and professional programs. I did not say
we would be a four-year college. I said we would
be a university.
But we will never, I think, be an MIT or a Cal
Tech—nor should we. However, to be a worldclass undergraduate teaching university, we have
to be a lot smarter and a lot better than we are
now. For the purposes of an absolutely unequaled
liberal arts general and religious education,
we have to have teachers who investigate and
integrate and know something, who are ambitious
about godly growth—what Joseph Smith would
call “enlargement.” We have to have teachers
who are growing in precisely the same manner
we expect students to grow—and that means
significant scholarship.
In this day and age, with books like Bloom’s and
Boyer’s and Hirsch’s and a score of others lamenting the state of public education and laying the
blame squarely at the feet of the universities and
their colleges of education who train and place
teachers in those public schools, isn’t there something here BYU can uniquely do, some way we not
only can but should “stand and shine,” to refer to
John Masefield’s description of a true university?
Don’t we have both the advantage and the duty
to step forward and rally the whole country in thistime of national challenge? If BYU is to lend something unique to The Church of Jesus Christ of
Latter-day Saints in this last dispensation, something we can do that makes us a city set on a hill,
a light that cannot be hid, wouldn’t it be to produce just such an unequaled—and unfragmented
and undivided—“school in Zion”? To be known as
the place where one can obtain a grand, consummate, unparalleled, and integrated undergraduate
education, with whatever other graduate and professional programs we can afford, is a reputation I
confess to coveting. That is the mission we wrote
for BYU eight years ago, and it is our mission still.
Then why aren’t we doing better than we are?
Well, in many ways we are doing superbly. I am
thrilled, for example, with the increasingly vigorous contributions in Religious Education. Our
colleagues there have developed a strong core
curriculum founded on the standard works, have
been very diligent in not letting it get watered
down, have a truly dramatic array of symposia
and publications coming out of the Religious
Studies Center, and perhaps most gratifying of all
have designed an absolutely scintillating Book of
Mormon seminar for transfer faculty who teach
that course. A whole fistful of our finest faculty
around the campus have written to tell me that
this seminar ranks among the most stimulating
and rewarding faculty experiences they have ever
had. That is wonderful news to me, to Religious
Education, to the students who take those classes,
and to the integrating general education climate
on our campus. Indeed, our fourteen hours of
religious education ought to be seen as the very
heart of our general education experience. I have
always viewed it that way in the years I have been
an administrator at BYU. I commend and applaud
all those who are helping to make that happen.
As for the Honors and General Education
programs themselves, I consider them to be crown
jewels at the very heart of the most important
contributions BYU can make to the world of higher
education. A great deal that is very exciting to me
is happening in these university-wide programs,
and more will happen. Our sisterhood and brotherhood and gospel-based goodwill here give us a
distinct GE advantage at BYU in our ability to
cross disciplinary and departmental lines. We
simply have a very muscular leg up on the rest
of the academic world that way. We must seize
that advantage. Having focused for several years
primarily on structural arrangements, curricular
issues, and winning faculty support, we should
be free to pursue informed, inspired, liberating
education.
To do so, we must organize, encourage, evaluate, and reward good teaching. You will have
noted that in addition to our Alcuin awards, we
have recently awarded professorships to strong
scholar-teachers who have made a major commitment to undergraduate education. I have
announced today the creation of a Distinguished
Teacher Award to be one of the university’s two
highest faculty honors. Exciting, demanding,
stretching, challenging, well-organized, and welltaught courses are at the heart of what we do here.
No amount of structural fussing or regulatory tinkering will compensate for stale, sterile lectures.
In the curriculum we must constantly resist the
centrifugal force that habitually plagues GE programs and target our limited resources on a relatively small number of very significant offerings.
Furthermore, we need to guard carefully against
the tendency to let general education offerings
become mere introductory courses to a discipline.
They simply must remain more universal than that.
May I suggest that we also must do a better
job of communicating the very practical value
of general education—to our students and to the
public. I think it is very important for us not to
create an unnecessary cleavage between the world
of the academy and the world of work, especially
not in the minds of tuition-paying parents and
higher education’s increasing number of critics.
We need to do a better job of showing the crucial
link between general education and vocation.
Professor Steven M. Cahn writes:
If . . . members of a democracy are to be . . . effective
contributors [to the community], each should be
provided with the necessary skills, social orientation,
and intellectual perspective to succeed in some
wide field of occupational endeavor. But such [true]
vocational education must not be confused with narrowjob-training. Animals are broken in and trained; human
beings ought to be enlightened and educated. An
individual [trained but not educated] . . . is unable
to adjust in the face of changing conditions and is thus
stymied by a world in flux. Sidney Hook has observed:
“There is a paradox connected with vocational training.
The more vocational it is, the narrower it is; the
narrower it is, the less likely it is to serve usefully in
earning a living.” . . . [Therefore] broadened vocational
preparation is not only of use to the future worker
himself; its benefit to society is apparent to anyone who
has ever been forced to deal with the mechanized mind
of a bureaucrat.
Professor Douglas F. Tobler once said to me, “A
good general education is the most practical thing
I know. How to use the mind may be the ultimate
vocational skill.”
Lastly, across the breadth of our university
effort we must respect and elevate the status of the
students themselves. They must be seen as more
than what Henry Rosovsky called at Harvard
“the lumpenproletariat.” She is someone’s perfect daughter, he is someone’s precious son, and
they are certainly brothers and sisters to us all.
Furthermore, they are coming to us better prepared than ever before, so we need to expect more
of them and of ourselves while they are here.
Missionary-like, we need to make this the best
four years of their lives. We need to give them personal attention and treat them with great respect,
not only in class but in administrative and staff
contacts as well. We need to advise them thoughtfully and mentor them professionally as an earlier
generation of educators used to do. That may be
difficult with some of our larger classes and challenging student-teacher ratios, but a good experience in a large class surely beats a bad experience
in a small one. I speak from personal experience.
I have always loved Elder Marion D. Hanks’
telling of the John Trebonius story. John Trebonius
used to take off his hat on entering the classroom
when it was the Germanic custom of the day for
professors to keep them on. When asked why he
was so needlessly kind to his pupils, he replied,
“These little boys will some day be men, and I do
not know but that there sits among them one who
will change the destiny of mankind. I take off
my hat in deference to what they may become.”
Sitting in his classroom, watching the ways of
that gentle man, was the young and future Martin
Luther.
A fourth and, for today, last reason for “a school
in Zion” is essentially a symbolic one, but a symbol with genuine substance. Elder John A. Widtsoe
once wrote:
The whole of life is education. . . . No wonder,
therefore, that in the correct philosophy of life, schools
and other devices for the training of man’s powers are
foremost. Education is and must be carried onward
fully and abundantly in the Church of Christ. The support of education is, indeed, one test of the truth of the
Church.
That is a stunning affirmation of our earlier
comments about the LDS doctrine of learning.
But what happens when the true Church grows
so large and has such call upon its resources that
it can perhaps support only the idea, only the
concept of education, rather than actual schools in
which to provide it?
In such a time of growth and need, could not
the one true Church profit magnificently from
at least one gleaming evidence of the Church’s
“support of education”—one university sparkling,
however distantly, for those Saints who now cluster in their localities with a somewhat altered sense
of gathering than Zion once had? Could not BYU,
both symbolically and substantially, be an unparalleled, incomparable blessing to every one of those
Saints, from Nigeria to Newfoundland, who may
never, ever set foot on BYU soil, let alone dream of
having one of their own? Could it not be a house
of hope and glory to every member of the Church
everywhere who is trying to grow, trying to learn,
trying to be strong and safe and spiritual in a very
secular world? I should surely think so. We could,
for the whole Church, provide what the doughboys
called “pride in the outfit.” And we could provide
for them an increasing array of leadership, example, service, and protection in the process.
Without deifying him prematurely, consider
what our own Hugh Nibley has done to strengthen faith for people far, far away from
Provo—a place from which he almost never
travels. And consider, if you will, his fairly biting
indictment of some of the rest of us as he praises
the university’s namesake:
[We are] only too glad to settle for the outward
show, the easy and flattering forms, trappings and
ceremonies of education. . . .
As a result, whenever we move out of our tiny, busy
orbits of administration and display, we find ourselves
in a terrifying intellectual vacuum. Terrifying, of
course, only because we might be found out. But that is
just the trouble: having defaulted drastically in terms of
President Young’s instructions, [some of us] stand as a
brainless giant, a pushover for any smart kid or cultist
or faddist or crank who even pretends to have read a few
books. . . . We . . . stand helplessly and foolishly by dangling our bonnet and plume while hundreds of students
and missionaries, [hundreds] of members and enemies
of the Church alike, presume to challenge and reject the
teachings of Joseph Smith on evidence so flimsy that no
half-educated person would give it a second thought. . . .
No one has ever told them what it means to lay a proper
foundation essential to any serious discussion of the
things they treat so glibly and triumphantly. . . .
. . . Whether we like it or not, we are going to have to
return to Brigham Young’s ideals of education; we may
fight it all the way, but in the end God will keep us after
school until we learn our lesson.
And defending the faith intelligently is only one
kind of aid we might offer our far-flung brothers
and sisters, albeit surely the most important one.
There are, it seems to me, scores of other kinds as
well, in virtually every discipline of the university.
And it will not require our physically going to
them or bringing them physically here to us. We
cannot do much of that. No, in most cases it means
writing—good writing, strong writing, in all of our
disciplines. Please let us never, ever separate “skillful writing” from “good teaching” at BYU.
Let me close by returning to that original
“school in Zion” and, in so doing, come full circle.
To do that, we have to go to the upper room just
moments before Gethsemane and Golgotha.As part of the strengthening preparation the
Savior provided for his apostles—apostles who
did not and could not comprehend what lay
immediately ahead of them—Christ rose from
that paschal meal and, girding himself with a
towel, poured water into a basin. He then knelt,
alone, and washed the feet of the Twelve.
There is, of course, a profound gesture of
humility and love in this act on the very face of
it. During what would be the most anguished
evening in human history, when someone might
well have attended a bit more to him, the Prince
of Peace knelt serving others, leaving an unforgettable lesson on the real meaning of “Master.”
But there was something else going on in the
performance of that ordinance, hinted at when
Peter tried to resist the Lord’s selflessness. “Thou
shalt never wash my feet,” he recoiled—to which
Jesus simply replied, “If I wash thee not, thou hast
no part with me.” And, of course, marvelous Peter
then pleaded, “Lord, not [then] my feet only, but
also my hands and my head” (John 13:8–9).
“If I wash thee not, thou hast no part with me.”
What could that possibly have to do with schools
and education and learning? Maybe everything.
As the Lord issued the commandment to
organize the School of the Prophets, he prefaced
it all with what must have been the first of these
worthiness interviews that are still a part of the
BYU tradition for faculty, staff, administrators,
and students. You must “sanctify yourselves,” the
Lord said, “yea, purify your hearts, and cleanse
your hands and your feet before me, that I may
make you clean” (D&C 88:74).
No one was to be in this apostolic academy
unworthily.
Ye shall not receive any among you into this school save
he is clean from the blood of this generation;
And he shall be received by the ordinance of the
washing of feet, for unto this end was the ordinance of
the washing of feet instituted. [D&C 88:138–39]
Commenting on that experience, the Prophet
Joseph Smith said:We have not desired as much from the hand of the
Lord through faith and obedience, as we ought to have
done. . . . We must . . . call our solemn assembly as
the Lord has commanded us, that we may be able to
accomplish His great work, and it must be done in
God’s own way. [Remember, he is speaking, at least
in part, of an educational work.] . . . It [the washing
of the feet] is calculated to unite our hearts, that we
may be one in feeling and sentiment, . . . that our faith
may be strong, so that Satan cannot overthrow us, nor
have any power over us here.
Gathering, uniting, learning. Community,
cleanliness, communion. One in feeling and
sentiment and purpose—a basin, a circle, a bond.
Humility and service. Strong faith and order. The
house of the Lord. A school.
Why have a temple of learning? How dare I ask
Why? I will tell you why: “So that Satan cannot
overthrow us, nor have any power over us here.”
Remember: “The glory of God is intelligence, or, in
other words, light and truth. [And] light and truth
forsake that evil one” (D&C 93:36–37).
May it be so for us this year and always, I pray
in the name of Jesus Christ. Amen.

OF SOULS, SYMBOLS,AND SACRAMENTS

This responsibility to speak to you never gets
any easier for me. I think it gets more difficult as the years go by. I grow a little older, the
world and its litany of problems get a little more
complex, and your hopes and dreams become
evermore important to me the longer I am at BYU.
Indeed, your growth and happiness and development in the life you are now living and in the life
you will be living in the days and decades ahead
are the central and most compelling motivation in
my daily professional life. I care very much about
you now and forever. Everything I know to do at
BYU is being done with an eye toward who and
what you are, and who and what you can become.
The future of this world’s history will be quite
fully in your hands very soon—at least your portion of it will be—and an education at an institution sponsored and guided by The Church of Jesus
Christ of Latter-day Saints is the greatest academic
advantage I can imagine in preparation for such a
serious and significant responsibility.
But that future, at least any qualitative aspect
of it, must be vigorously fought for. It won’t “just
happen” to your advantage. Someone said once
that the future is waiting to be seized, and if we do
not grasp it firmly, then other hands, more determined and bloody than our own, will wrench it
from us and follow a different course.
It is with an eye to that future—your future—
and an awareness of this immense sense of
responsibility I feel for you, that I approach this
annual midyear devotional message. I always
need the help and sustaining Spirit of the Lord
to succeed at such times, but I especially feel the
need for that spiritual help today.
Human Intimacy
My topic is that of human intimacy, a topic
as sacred as any I know and more sacred than
anything I have ever addressed from this podium.
If I am not careful and you are not supportive, this
subject can slide quickly from the sacred into the
merely sensational, and I would be devastated if
that happened. It would be better not to address
the topic at all than to damage it with casualness
or carelessness. Indeed, it is against such casualness and carelessness that I wish to speak. So I ask
for your faith and your prayers and your respect.
You may feel this is a topic you hear addressed
too frequently at this time in your life, but given
the world in which we live, you may not be
hearing it enough. All of the prophets, past and
present, have spoken on it, and President Benson
himself addressed this very subject in his annual
message to this student body last fall.
I am thrilled that most of you are doing wonderfully well in the matter of personal purity.
There isn’t as worthy and faithful a group of
university students anywhere else on the face of
the earth. You are an inspiration to me. I acknowledge your devotion to the gospel and applaud it.
Like Jacob of old, I would prefer for the sake of the
innocent not to need to discuss such topics. But a
few of you are not doing so well, and much of the
world around us is not doing well at all.
The national press recently noted,
In America 3,000 adolescents become pregnant each
day. A million a year. Four out of five are unmarried.
More than half get abortions. “Babies having babies.”
[Babies] killing [babies]. [“What’s Gone Wrong
with Teen Sex,” People, 13 April 1987, p. 111]
That same national poll indicated nearly 60
percent of high school students in “mainstream”
America had lost their virginity, and 80 percent
of college students had. The Wall Street Journal
(hardly in a class with the National Enquirer)
recently wrote,
AIDS [appears to be reaching] plague[like] proportions. Even now it is claiming innocent victims:
newborn babies and recipients of blood transfusions.
It is only a matter of time before it becomes widespread
among heterosexuals. . . .
AIDS should remind us that ours is a hostile world.
. . . The more we pass ourselves around, the larger the
likelihood of our picking something up. . . .
Whether on clinical or moral grounds, it seems
clear that promiscuity has its price. [Wall Street
Journal, 21 May 1987, p. 28]
Of course, more widespread in our society than
the indulgence of personal sexual activity are the
printed and photographed descriptions of those
who do. Of that lustful environment a contemporary observer says,
We live in an age in which voyeurism is no longer the
side line of the solitary deviate, but rather a national
pastime, fully institutionalized and [circularized] in
the mass media. [William F. May, quoted by Henry
Fairlie, The Seven Deadly Sins Today (Notre Dame:
University of Notre Dame Press, 1978), p. 178]
In fact, the rise of civilization seems, ironically
enough, to have made actual or fantasized promiscuity a greater, not a lesser, problem. Edward
Gibbon, the distinguished British historian of the
eighteenth century who wrote one of the most
intimidating works of history in our language (The
Decline and Fall of the Roman Empire), said simply,
Although the progress of civilisation has undoubtedly contributed to assuage the fiercer passions of
human nature, it seems to have been less favourable to
the virtue of chastity. . . . The refinements of life [seem
to] corrupt, [even as] they polish the [relationship]
of the sexes. [Edward Gibbon, The Decline and Fall
of the Roman Empire, vol. 40 of Great Books of the
Western World, 1952, p. 92]
I do not wish us to spend this hour documenting social problems nor wringing our hands over
the dangers that such outside influences may hold
for us. As serious as such contemporary realities
are, I wish to discuss this topic in quite a different
way, discuss it specifically for Latter-day Saints—
primarily young, unmarried Latter-day Saints,
even those attending Brigham Young University.
So I conspicuously set aside the horrors of AIDS
and national statistics on illegitimate pregnancies
and speak rather to a gospel-based view of personal purity.
Indeed, I wish to do something even a bit more
difficult than listing the do’s and don’ts of personal purity. I wish to speak, to the best of my
ability, on why we should be clean, on why moral
discipline is such a significant matter in God’s
eyes. I know that may sound presumptuous, but
a philosopher once said, tell me sufficiently why
a thing should be done, and I will move heaven
and earth to do it. Hoping you will feel the same
way as he and fully recognizing my limitations,
I wish to try to give at least a partial answer to
“Why be morally clean?” I will need first to pose
briefly what I see as the doctrinal seriousness of
the matter before then offering just three reasons
for such seriousness.
The Significance and Sanctity
May I begin with half of a nine-line poem by
Robert Frost. (The other half is worth a sermon
also, but it will have to wait for another day.) Here
are the first four lines of Frost’s “Fire and Ice.”
Some say the world will end in fire,
Some say in ice.
From what I’ve tasted of desire
I hold with those who favor fire.
A second, less poetic but more specific opinion
is offered by the writer of Proverbs:
Can a man take fire in his bosom, and his clothes not
be burned?
Can one go upon hot coals, and his feet not be
burned? . . .
But whoso committeth adultery with a woman lacketh understanding: he that doeth it destroyeth his own
soul.
A wound and dishonour shall he get; and his
reproach shall not be wiped away. [Proverbs 6:27–33]
In getting at the doctrinal seriousness, why is
this matter of sexual relationships so severe that
fire is almost always the metaphor, with passion
pictured vividly in flames? What is there in the
potentially hurtful heat of this that leaves one’s
soul—or perhaps the whole world, according to
Frost—destroyed, if that flame is left unchecked
and those passions unrestrained? What is there
in all of this that prompts Alma to warn his son
Corianton that sexual transgression is “an abomination in the sight of the Lord; yea, most abominable above all sins save it be the shedding of
innocent blood or denying the Holy Ghost” (Alma
39:5; emphasis added)?
Setting aside sins against the Holy Ghost for
a moment as a special category unto themselves,
it is LDS doctrine that sexual transgression is
second only to murder in the Lord’s list of life’s
most serious sins. By assigning such rank to a
physical appetite so conspicuously evident in all
of us, what is God trying to tell us about its place
in his plan for all men and women in mortality?
I submit to you he is doing precisely that—commenting about the very plan of life itself. Clearly
God’s greatest concerns regarding mortality are
how one gets into this world and how one gets out
of it. These two most important issues in our very
personal and carefully supervised progress are the
two issues that he as our Creator and Father and
Guide wishes most to reserve to himself. These are
the two matters that he has repeatedly told us he
wants us never to take illegally, illicitly, unfaithfully, without sanction.
As for the taking of life, we are generally quite
responsible. Most people, it seems to me, readily
sense the sanctity of life and as a rule do not run
up to friends, put a loaded revolver to their heads,
and cavalierly pull the trigger. Furthermore,
when there is a click of the hammer rather than an
explosion of lead, and a possible tragedy seems to
have been averted, no one in such a circumstance
would be so stupid as to sigh, “Oh, good. I didn’t
go all the way.”
No, “all the way” or not, the insanity of such
action with fatal powder and steel is obvious on
the face of it. Such a person running about this
campus with an arsenal of loaded handguns
or military weaponry aimed at fellow students
would be apprehended, prosecuted, and institutionalized if in fact such a lunatic would not
himself have been killed in all the pandemonium.
After such a fictitious moment of horror on this
campus (and you are too young to remember my
college years when the sniper wasn’t fictitious, killing twelve of his fellow students at the University
of Texas), we would undoubtedly sit in our dorms
or classrooms with terror on our minds for many
months to come, wondering how such a thing
could possibly happen—especially here at BYU.
No, fortunately, in the case of how life is taken, I
think we seem to be quite responsible. The seriousness of that does not often have to be spelled out,
and not many sermons need to be devoted to it.
But in the significance and sanctity of giving life,
some of us are not so responsible, and in the larger
world swirling around us we find near-criminal
irresponsibility. What would in the case of taking
life bring absolute horror and demand grim justice, in the case of giving life brings dirty jokes and
four-letter lyrics and crass carnality on the silver
screen, home-owned or downtown.
Is such moral turpitude so wrong? That question has always been asked, usually by the guilty.
“Such is the way of an adulterous woman; she
eateth, and wipeth her mouth, and saith, I have
done no wickedness” (Proverbs 30:20). No murder here. Well, maybe not. But sexual transgression? “He that doeth it destroyeth his own soul.”
Sounds near fatal to me.
So much for the doctrinal seriousness. Now,
with a desire to prevent such painful moments, to
avoid what Alma called the “inexpressible horror”
of standing in the presence of God unworthily,
and to permit the intimacy it is your right and
privilege and delight to enjoy in marriage to be
untainted by such crushing remorse and guilt—
I wish to give those three reasons I mentioned
earlier as to why I believe this is an issue of such
magnitude and consequence.
The Doctrine of the Soul
First, we simply must understand the revealed,
restored Latter-day Saint doctrine of the soul, and
the high and inextricable part the body plays in
that doctrine. One of the “plain and precious”
truths restored to this dispensation is that “the
spirit and the body are the soul of man” (D&C
88:15; emphasis added) and that when the spirit
and body are separated, men and women “cannot
receive a fulness of joy” (D&C 93:34). Certainly
that suggests something of the reason why obtaining a body is so fundamentally important to the
plan of salvation in the first place, why sin of any
kind is such a serious matter (namely because its
automatic consequence is death, the separation of
the spirit from the body and the separation of the
spirit and the body from God), and why the resurrection of the body is so central to the great abiding and eternal triumph of Christ’s atonement. We
do not have to be a herd of demonically possessed
swine charging down the Gadarene slopes toward
the sea to understand that a body is the great prize
of mortal life, and that even a pig’s will do for
those frenzied spirits that rebelled, and to this day
remain dispossessed, in their first, unembodied
estate.
May I quote a 1913 sermon by Elder James E.
Talmage on this doctrinal point:
We have been taught . . . to look upon these bodies of
ours as gifts from God. We Latter-day Saints do not
regard the body as something to be condemned, something to be abhorred. . . . We regard [the body] as the
sign of our royal birthright. . . . We recognize . . . that
those who kept not their first estate. . . were denied that
inestimable blessing. . . . We believe that these bodies
. . . may be made, in very truth, the temple of the Holy
Ghost. . . .
It is peculiar to the theology of the Latter-day Saints
that we regard the body as an essential part of the soul.
Read your dictionaries, the lexicons, and encyclopedias, and you will find that nowhere [in Christianity],
outside of the Church of Jesus Christ, is the solemn and
eternal truth taught that the soul of man is the body
and the spirit combined. [CR, October 1913, p. 117]
So partly in answer to why such seriousness, we
answer that one toying with the God-given—and
satanically coveted—body of another, toys with the
very soul of that individual, toys with the central
purpose and product of life, “the very key” to life,
as Elder Boyd K. Packer once called it. In trivializing the soul of another (please include the word
body there), we trivialize the Atonement that saved
that soul and guaranteed its continued existence.
And when one toys with the Son of Righteousness,
the Day Star himself, one toys with white heat
and a flame hotter and holier than the noonday
sun. You cannot do so and not be burned. You
cannot with impunity “crucify Christ afresh” (see
Hebrews 6:6). Exploitation of the body (please
include the word soul there) is, in the last analysis,
an exploitation of him who is the Light and the Life
of the world. Perhaps here Paul’s warning to the
Corinthians takes on newer, higher meaning:
Now the body is not for fornication, but for the Lord;
and the Lord for the body. . . .
Know ye not that your bodies are the members of
Christ? shall I then take the members of Christ, and
make them the members of an harlot? God forbid. . . .
Flee fornication. . . . He that committeth fornication
sinneth against his own body. . . .
. . . Know ye not that your body is the temple of the
Holy Ghost which is in you, which ye have of God, and
ye are not your own?
For ye are bought with a price: therefore glorify God
in your body, and in your spirit, which are God’s.
[1 Corinthians 6:13–20; emphasis added]
Our soul is what’s at stake here—our spirit and
our body. Paul understood that doctrine of the
soul every bit as well as James E. Talmage did,
because it is gospel truth. The purchase price for
our fullness of joy—body and spirit eternally
united—is the pure and innocent blood of the
Savior of this world. We cannot then say in ignorance or defiance, “Well, it’s my life,” or worse
yet, “It’s my body.” It is not. “Ye are not your
own,” Paul said. “Ye are bought with a price.”
So in answer to the question, “Why does God
care so much about sexual transgression?” it is
partly because of the precious gift offered by and
through his Only Begotten Son to redeem the
souls—bodies and spirits—we too often share and
abuse in cheap and tawdry ways. Christ restored
the very seeds of eternal lives (see D&C 132:19,
24), and we desecrate them at our peril. The first
key reason for personal purity? Our very souls are
involved and at stake.
A Symbol of Total Union
Second, may I suggest that human intimacy,
that sacred, physical union ordained of God for a
married couple, deals with a symbol that demands
special sanctity. Such an act of love between a
man and a woman is—or certainly was ordained
to be—a symbol of total union: union of their
hearts, their hopes, their lives, their love, their
family, their future, their everything. It is a symbol
that we try to suggest in the temple with a word
like seal. The Prophet Joseph Smith once said we
perhaps ought to render such a sacred bond as
“welding”—that those united in matrimony and
eternal families are “welded” together, inseparable if you will, to withstand the temptations
of the adversary and the afflictions of mortality.
(See D&C 128:18.)
But such a total, virtually unbreakable union,
such an unyielding commitment between a man
and a woman, can only come with the proximity
and permanence afforded in a marriage covenant,
with the union of all that they possess—their
very hearts and minds, all their days and all their
dreams. They work together, they cry together,
they enjoy Brahms and Beethoven and breakfast
together, they sacrifice and save and live together
for all the abundance that such a totally intimate
life provides such a couple. And the external
symbol of that union, the physical manifestation
of what is a far deeper spiritual and metaphysical
bonding, is the physical blending that is part of—
indeed, a most beautiful and gratifying expression
of—that larger, more complete union of eternal
purpose and promise.
As delicate as it is to mention in such a setting,
I nevertheless trust your maturity to understand
that physiologically we are created as men and
women to fit together in such a union. In this
ultimate physical expression of one man and one
woman they are as nearly and as literally “one”
as two separate physical bodies can ever be. It is
in that act of ultimate physical intimacy we most
nearly fulfill the commandment of the Lord given
to Adam and Eve, living symbols for all married
couples, when he invited them to cleave unto
one another only, and thus become “one flesh”
(Genesis 2:24).
Obviously, such a commandment to these two,
the first husband and wife of the human family,
has unlimited implications—social, cultural, and
religious as well as physical—but that is exactly
my point. As all couples come to that moment
of bonding in mortality, it is to be just such a
complete union. That commandment cannot
be fulfilled, and that symbolism of “one flesh”
cannot be preserved, if we hastily and guiltily
and surreptitiously share intimacy in a darkened
corner of a darkened hour, then just as hastily
and guiltily and surreptitiously retreat to our
separate worlds—not to eat or live or cry or laugh
together, not to do the laundry and the dishes and
the homework, not to manage a budget and pay
the bills and tend the children and plan together
for the future. No, we cannot do that until we are
truly one—united, bound, linked, tied, welded,
sealed, married.
Can you see then the moral schizophrenia
that comes from pretending we are one, sharing
the physical symbols and physical intimacy of our
union, but then fleeing, retreating, severing all
such other aspects—and symbols—of what was
meant to be a total obligation, only to unite again
furtively some other night or, worse yet, furtively
unite (and you can tell how cynically I use that
word) with some other partner who is no more
bound to us, no more one with us than the last
was or than the one that will come next week or
next month or next year or anytime before the
binding commitments of marriage?
You must wait—you must wait until you can
give everything, and you cannot give everything
until you are at least legally and, for Latter-day
Saint purposes, eternally pronounced as one.
To give illicitly that which is not yours to give
(remember—”you are not your own”) and to
give only part of that which cannot be followed
with the gift of your whole heart and your whole
life and your whole self is its own form of emotional Russian roulette. If you persist in sharing
part without the whole, in pursuing satisfaction
devoid of symbolism, in giving parts and pieces
and inflamed fragments only, you run the terrible
risk of such spiritual, psychic damage that you
may undermine both your physical intimacy and
your wholehearted devotion to a truer, later love.
You may come to that moment of real love, of total
union, only to discover to your horror that what
you should have saved has been spent, and—mark
my words—only God’s grace can recover that
piecemeal dissipation of your virtue.
A good Latter-day Saint friend, Dr. Victor L.
Brown, Jr., has written of this issue:
Fragmentation enables its users to counterfeit
intimacy. . . .
If we relate to each other in fragments, at best we
miss full relationships. At worst, we manipulate and
exploit others for our gratification. Sexual fragmentation can be particularly harmful because it gives powerful physiological rewards which, though illusory, can
temporarily persuade us to overlook the serious deficits
in the overall relationship. Two people may marry for
physical gratification and then discover that the illusion of union collapses under the weight of intellectual,
social, and spiritual incompatibilities. . . .
Sexual fragmentation is particularly harmful
because it is particularly deceptive. The intense human
intimacy that should be enjoyed in and symbolized
by sexual union is counterfeited by sensual episodes
which suggest—but cannot deliver—acceptance,
understanding, and love. Such encounters mistake
the end for the means as lonely, desperate people seek
a common denominator which will permit the easiest,
quickest gratification. [Victor L. Brown, Jr., Human
Intimacy: Illusion and Reality (Salt Lake City, Utah:
Parliament Publishers, 1981), pp. 5–6]
Listen to a far more biting observation by a
non-Latter-day Saint regarding such acts devoid
of both the soul and symbolism we have been
discussing. He writes:
Our sexuality has been animalized, stripped of the
intricacy of feeling with which human beings have
endowed it, leaving us to contemplate only the act, and
to fear our impotence in it. It is this animalization from
which the sexual manuals cannot escape, even when
they try to do so, because they are reflections of it. They
might [as well] be textbooks for veterinarians. [Fairlie,
Seven Deadly Sins, p. 182]
In this matter of counterfeit intimacy and
deceptive gratification, I express particular caution
to the men who hear this message. I have heard
all my life that it is the young woman who has to
assume the responsibility for controlling the limits
of intimacy in courtship because a young man
cannot. What an unacceptable response to such a
serious issue! What kind of man is he, what priesthood or power or strength or self-control does
this man have that lets him develop in society,
grow to the age of mature accountability, perhaps
even pursue a university education and prepare
to affect the future of colleagues and kingdoms
and the course of the world, but yet does not have
the mental capacity or the moral will to say, “I
will not do that thing”? No, this sorry drugstore
psychology would have us say, “He just can’t help
himself. His glands have complete control over his
life—his mind, his will, his entire future.”
To say that a young woman in such a relationship has to bear her responsibility and that of
the young man’s too is the least fair assertion I
can imagine. In most instances if there is sexual
transgression, I lay the burden squarely on the
shoulders of the young man—for our purposes
probably a priesthood bearer—and that’s where
I believe God intended responsibility to be. In
saying that I do not excuse young women who
exercise no restraint and have not the character or
conviction to demand intimacy only in its rightful
role. I have had enough experience in Church callings to know that women as well as men can be
predatory. But I refuse to buy some young man’s
feigned innocence who wants to sin and call it
psychology.
Indeed, most tragically, it is the young woman
who is most often the victim, it is the young
woman who most often suffers the greater pain,
it is the young woman who most often feels used
and abused and terribly unclean. And for that
imposed uncleanliness a man will pay, as surely as
the sun sets and rivers run to the sea.
Note the prophet Jacob’s straightforward
language on this account in the Book of Mormon.
After a bold confrontation on the subject of sexual
transgression among the Nephites, he quotes
Jehovah:
For behold, I, the Lord, have seen the sorrow, and
heard the mourning of the daughters of my people in
the land. . . .
And I will not suffer, saith the Lord of Hosts, that
the cries of the fair daughters of this people. . . shall
come up unto me against the men of my people, saith
the Lord of Hosts.
For they shall not lead away captive the daughters
of my people because of their tenderness, save I shall
visit them with a sore curse, even unto destruction.
[Jacob 2:31–33; emphasis added]
Don’t be deceived and don’t be destroyed.
Unless such fire is controlled, your clothes and
your future will be burned. And your world, short
of painful and perfect repentance, will go up in
flames. I give that to you on good word—I give it
to you on God’s word.
A Holy Sacrament
That leads me to my last reason, a third effort
to say why. After soul and symbol, the word is
sacrament, a term closely related to the other two.
Sexual intimacy is not only a symbolic union
between a man and a woman—the uniting of
their very souls—but it is also symbolic of a union
between mortals and deity, between otherwise
ordinary and fallible humans uniting for a rare
and special moment with God himself and all the
powers by which he gives life in this wide universe of ours.
In this latter sense, human intimacy is a sacrament, a very special kind of symbol. For our
purpose here today, a sacrament could be any
one of a number of gestures or acts or ordinances
that unite us with God and his limitless powers.
We are imperfect and mortal; he is perfect and
immortal. But from time to time—indeed, as often
as is possible and appropriate—we find ways and
go to places and create circumstances where we
can unite symbolically with him, and in so doing
gain access to his power. Those special moments
of union with God are sacramental moments—
such as kneeling at a marriage altar, or blessing a
newborn baby, or partaking of the emblems of the
Lord’s supper. This latter ordinance is the one we
in the Church have come to associate most traditionally with the word sacrament, though it is technically only one of many such moments when we
formally take the hand of God and feel his divine
power.
These are moments when we quite literally
unite our will with God’s will, our spirit with
his spirit, where communion through the veil
becomes very real. At such moments we not only
acknowledge his divinity, but we quite literally
take something of that divinity to ourselves. Such
are the holy sacraments.
Now, once again, I know of no one who would,
for example, rush into the middle of a sacramental
service, grab the linen from the tables, throw the
bread the full length of the room, tip the water
trays onto the floor, and laughingly retreat from
the building to await an opportunity to do the
same thing at another worship service the next
Sunday. No one within the sound of my voice
would do that during one of the truly sacred
moments of our religious worship. Nor would
anyone here violate any of the other sacramental moments in our lives, those times when we
consciously claim God’s power and by invitation
stand with him in privilege and principality.
But I wish to stress with you this morning, as
my third of three reasons to be clean, that sexual
union is also, in its own profound way, a very real
sacrament of the highest order, a union not only
of a man and a woman but very much the union
of that man and woman with God. Indeed, if our
definition of sacrament is that act of claiming and
sharing and exercising God’s own inestimable
power, then I know of virtually no other divine
privilege so routinely given to us all—women or
men, ordained or unordained, Latter-day Saint or
non-Latter-day Saint—than the miraculous and
majestic power of transmitting life, the unspeakable, unfathomable, unbroken power of procreation. There are those special moments in your
lives when the other, more formal ordinances of
the gospel—the sacraments, if you will—allow
you to feel the grace and grandeur of God’s
power. Many are one-time experiences (such as
our own confirmation or our own marriage), and
some are repeatable (such as administering to the
sick or doing ordinance work for others in the
temple). But I know of nothing so earth-shatteringly powerful and yet so universally and unstintingly given to us as the God-given power available
in every one of us from our early teen years on to
create a human body, that wonder of all wonders,
a genetically and spiritually unique being never
seen before in the history of the world and never
to be duplicated again in all the ages of eternity—
a child, your child—with eyes and ears and fingers
and toes and a future of unspeakable grandeur.
Imagine that, if you will. Veritable teenagers—
and all of us for many decades thereafter—carrying daily, hourly, minute-to-minute, virtually
every waking and sleeping moment of our lives,
the power and the chemistry and the eternally
transmitted seeds of life to grant someone else her
second estate, someone else his next level of development in the divine plan of salvation. I submit
to you that no power, priesthood or otherwise,
is given by God so universally to so many with
virtually no control over its use except self-control.
And I submit to you that you will never be more
like God at any other time in this life than when you
are expressing that particular power. Of all the titles
he has chosen for himself, Father is the one he
declares, and Creation is his watchword—especially human creation, creation in his image. His
glory isn’t a mountain, as stunning as mountains
are. It isn’t in sea or sky or snow or sunrise, as
beautiful as they all are. It isn’t in art or technology, be that a concerto or computer. No, his
glory—and his grief—is in his children. You and
I, we are his prized possessions, and we are the
earthly evidence, however inadequate, of what he
truly is. Human life—that is the greatest of God’s
powers, the most mysterious and magnificent
chemistry of it all—and you and I have been given
it, but under the most serious and sacred of restrictions. You and I who can make neither mountain
nor moonlight, not one raindrop nor a single
rose—yet we have this greater gift in an absolutely
unlimited way. And the only control placed on us
is self-control—self-control born of respect for the
divine sacramental power it is.
Surely God’s trust in us to respect this futureforming gift is awesomely staggering. We who
may not be able to repair a bicycle nor assemble
an average jigsaw puzzle—yet with all our
weaknesses and imperfections, we carry this
procreative power that makes us very much like
God in at least one grand and majestic way.
A Serious Matter
Souls. Symbols. Sacraments. Does any of this
help you understand why human intimacy is such
a serious matter? Why it is so right and rewarding and stunningly beautiful when it is within
marriage and approved of God (not just “good”
but “very good,” he declared to Adam and Eve),
and so blasphemously wrong—like unto murder—when it is outside such a covenant? It is my
understanding that we park and pet and sleep
over and sleep with at the peril of our very lives.
Our penalty may not come on the precise day of
our transgression, but it comes surely and certainly enough, and were it not for a merciful God
and the treasured privilege of personal repentance, far too many would even now be feeling
that hellish pain, which (like the passion we have
been discussing) is also always described in the
metaphor of fire. Someday, somewhere, sometime
the morally unclean will, until they repent, pray
like the rich man, wishing Lazarus to “dip . . .
his finger in water, and cool my tongue; for I am
tormented in this flame” (Luke 16:24).
Some say the world will end in fire,
Some say in ice.
From what I’ve tasted of desire
I hold with those who favor fire.
In closing, consider this from two students of
civilization’s long, instructive story:
No one man [or woman], however brilliant or wellinformed, can come in one lifetime to such fullness
of understanding as to safely judge and dismiss the
customs or institutions of his society, for these are the
wisdom of generations after centuries of experiment in
the laboratory of history. A youth boiling with hormones will wonder why he should not give full freedom
to his sexual desires; and if he is unchecked by custom,
morals, or laws, he may ruin his life [or hers] before he
matures sufficiently to understand that sex is a river
of fire that must be banked and cooled by a hundred
restraints if it is not to consume in chaos both the individual and the group. [Will and Ariel Durant, The
Lessons of History (New York: Simon and Schuster,
1968), pp. 35–36]
Or, in the more ecclesiastical words of James E.
Talmage:
It has been declared in the solemn word of revelation, that the spirit and the body constitute the soul of
man; and, therefore, we should look upon this body as
something that shall endure in the resurrected state,
beyond the grave, something to be kept pure and holy.
Be not afraid of soiling its hands; be not afraid of scars
that may come to it if won in earnest effort, or [won]
in honest fight, but beware of scars that disfigure, that
have come to you in places where you ought not have
gone, that have befallen you in unworthy undertakings
[pursued where you ought not have been]; beware
of the wounds of battles in which you have been fighting on the wrong side. [Talmage, CR, October 1913,
p. 117]
I love you for wanting to be on the right side
of the gospel of Jesus Christ. I express my pride in
and appreciation for your faithfulness. As I said
earlier, you are an absolute inspiration to me. I
consider it the greatest of all professional privileges to be associated with you at this university
at a time in your lives when you are finalizing
what you believe and forging what your future
will be.
If some few of you are feeling the “scars . . . that
have come to you in places where you ought not
have gone,” I wish to extend to you the special
peace and promise available through the atoning sacrifice of the Lord Jesus Christ. I testify of
his love and of the restored gospel principles and
ordinances which make that love available to us
with all their cleansing and healing power. I testify
of the power of these principles and ordinances,
including complete and redeeming repentance,
which are only fully realized in this the true and
living church of the true and living God. That we
may “come unto Christ” for the fullness of soul
and symbol and sacrament he offers us, I pray in
the name of Jesus Christ. Amen.

WHO WE ARE

Sister Holland and I are delighted to welcome you back to BYU for a new school
year. We especially welcome those who are
with us for the first time, whether as freshman, transfer students, or those simply seeking
good, solid catastrophic insurance coverage.
Welcome one and all. We want you to have the
best year ever.
Reminders from the Past
Even as we greet you at the university,
however, I am aware that at least one writer
believes most of what you need to know was
suggested to you more than a dozen years ago.
Given the costs of a university education, such
an assertion is worth investigating. Consider
his argument.
Most of what I really need to know about how
to live, and what to do, and how to be I learned
in kindergarten. Wisdom was not at the top of
the graduate-school mountain, but there in the
sandbox.
These are the things I learned: Share everything.
Play fair. Don’t hit people. Put things back where
you found them. Clean up your own mess. Don’t
take things that aren’t yours. Say you’re sorry
when you hurt somebody. Wash your hands before
you eat. Live a balanced life. Learn some and think
some, and draw and sing and dance and play and
work every day some.
Take a nap in the afternoon. When you go out
into the world, watch for traffic, hold hands and
stick together. Be aware of wonder. Remember the
little seed in the plastic cup. The roots go down and
the plant goes up, and nobody really knows why,
but we are all like that.
Goldfish and hamsters and white mice and
even the little seed in the plastic cup—they all die.
So do we.
And then remember the book about Dick and
Jane and the first word you learned, the biggest
word of all: look. Everything you need to know is
in there somewhere. The golden rule and love and
basic sanitation. Ecology and politics and sane
living.
Think of what a better world it would be if we
all had cookies and milk about three o’clock every
afternoon and then lay down with our blankets for
a nap. Or if we had a basic policy in our nation and
other nations always to put things back where we
found them and cleaned up our own messes. And it
is still true, no matter how old you are, when you
go out into the world, it is best to hold hands and
stick together. [Robert Fulghum, “We Learned It
All in Kindergarten,” Reader’s Digest, October
1987, p. 115]
I admit that is a pretty good beginning-ofthe-school-year speech, whether you are five
or fifty or a university student at BYU. In fact,
maybe most of the important things we need
to hear in life have long since been said to us—
probably many times. The inestimable Samuel
Johnson once said that people needed reminding far more than they needed instructing, so
my few moments with you this morning will
be devoted to reminders largely drawn from
the past.
Our Tradition
But preserving our past without compromising the present is often no easy matter—it
can put us in a precarious position, something
like, well, a fiddler on the roof. In fact, for this
morning’s message I wish to invoke Tevye’s
help in recounting and reminding very briefly
truths taught to most of us since kindergarten
and before. Here’s Tevye on “tradition.” When
he says “Anatevka,” think “Provo.”
A fiddler on the roof. Sounds crazy, no? But in
our little village of Anatevka, you might say every
one of us is a fiddler on the roof, trying to scratch
out a pleasant, simple tune without breaking his
neck. It isn’t easy. You may ask, why do we stay up
here if it’s so dangerous? We stay because Anatevka
is our home. And how do we keep our balance? That
I can tell you in a word—tradition!
Because of our traditions, we’ve kept our balance
for many, many years. Here in Anatevka we have
traditions for everything—how to eat, how to sleep,
how to wear clothes. For instance, we always keep
our heads covered and always wear a little prayer
shawl. This shows our constant devotion to God.
You may ask, how did this tradition start? I’ll tell
you—I don’t know! But it’s a tradition. Because of
our traditions, everyone knows who he is and what
God expects him to do. [“Fiddler on the Roof,”
in Great Musicals of the American Theatre, ed.
Stanley Richards, vol. 1 (Radnor, Pennsylvania:
Chilton Book Company, 1973), p. 393]
“Because of our traditions, everyone knows
who he is and what God expects him to do.”
Who are we, then, here at BYU? And what
does God expect us to do? For one thing,
he expects us to remember we are heirs of a
gospel dispensation that had among its earliest commandments the challenge to “seek
. . . diligently and teach one another words of
wisdom; yea, [to] seek . . . out of the best books
. . . learning, even by study and also by faith”
(D&C 88:118; see also D&C 88:78). This crucial
commandment was inextricably linked with the
profound restored truth that taught us we are
literally sons and daughters of God and that we
can someday become like him. Restored truth
taught that God’s glory is his intelligence and
that it is to be our glory as well.
That inestimable doctrine, restored to a
darkened world more than a century and a
half ago, has in that length of time developed
into a strong tradition for Latter-day Saints,
the earliest of whom labored by day and read
books by night in an effort to become more like
God “by study and also by faith.”
It is not significant that the central symbol
and only tract of their early faith was a book,
a written record that would give meaning to
all they did and to everything they believed.
No one had to tell them the importance of
reading; it was a “habit of the heart.” Later
they would gather in the upper room of their
Ohio temple to study not only theology but
also mathematics, philosophy, English grammar, geography, and Hebrew. And on the
banks of the Mississippi they would plan
Nauvoo, the City Beautiful, their Zion-like city/
state, around two great centers of learning—
a temple and a university. Even when driven
from their homes, the Saints kept the dream
alive. In dugouts and cabins, handcarts and
Conestogas, school kept. It was not easy but it
was doctrine. “It is impossible. . . to be saved
in ignorance,” their prophet-teacher had told
them, and “Whatever principle of intelligence
we attain unto in this life, it will rise with us in
the resurrection” (D&C 131:6, 130:18–19). They
believed him. They were as hungry as Erasmus,
who said, “When I get a little money, I buy
books; and if any is left [over], I buy [bread]”
(in Distilled Wisdom, ed. by Alfred Armand
Montapert [Englewood Cliffs, New Jersey:
Prentice-Hall, 1964], p. 39).
“Wherever Mormon settlements have
sprung up, the village school has been among
the first things thought of and provided for,”
said future president of the Church Lorenzo
Snow. In those parts of the new Mormon
territory where buildings were not available,
schoolteachers simply did the best they could.
Said Apostle George A. Smith of his experience
in southern Utah,
My wicky-up is a very important establishment,
composed of brush, a few slabs and 3 wagons. [It
has a] fire in the center and a lot of milking stools,
benches and logs placed around, two of which are
fashioned with buffalo robes . . . . [It was, however,
unpleasant] to see my school some of the cold nights
in February, scholars standing round my huge
camp fire, the wind broken off by the brush and the
whole canopy of heaven for covering. Thermometer
standing at 7 . . . . I would stand with my grammar book, the only one in school, would give out
a sentence at a time and pass it around. [Ernest
L. Wilkinson and W. Cleon Skousen, Brigham
Young University: A School of Destiny (Provo,
Utah: Brigham Young University Press, 1976),
p. 15]
Out of that tradition for learning, that nearunquenchable thirst for knowledge, has come
this university—a far cry from milking stools,
buffalo robes, and one text; a far cry from what
a century of our pioneer ancestors fought for
and dreamed of but for the most part did not
live long enough to see.
We owe them something. We who are the
beneficiaries of their sacrifice and their faith—
we owe them the best effort we can put forward in obtaining a truly edifying and liberating and spirit-soaring education. Work hard
this year. Take advantage of every opportunity. Play a lot less and study a lot more. Learn
to write and speak well. Make an investment in
yourself the way the tithe payers of the Church
have made one in you and see that bread cast
upon academic waters come back to you and
your posterity a hundredfold. Load your handcart full of books and start off for Zion. Take
this university forward in the same way your
ancestors took it forward—often with nothing more tangible to sustain them than their
dreams and their traditions.
“The glory of God.” “Light and truth.”
Most of you have heard all of that since kindergarten or before. The question for us now,
this year, at BYU, is, “What will we do with
this ideal?” Remember Anatevka. “Everyone
knows who he is and what God expects him
to do.” Tradition!
A Two-Fold Mission
Closely linked with that latter-day pursuit
of learning is another tradition at BYU. The
first year I came to the university as president
I coined a homely Latin phrase, virtus et veritas,
to define a twofold mission at BYU. I added to
the search for veritas (truth)—a motto from the
Harvards and Yales of the world—a second
task, virtus (virtue), believing with all my heart
that how one lived was the ultimate test of an
education, that truth standing undefended or
unexercised was unworthy of the investment
that had gone into her discovery.
In doing so I knew I had not only the
philosophers but also the prophets of God on
my side, past and present. Indeed, a modern
First Presidency of the Church said this in a
better way than most professional educators
would ever say it. Said Brigham Young, Heber
C. Kimball, and Willard Richards:
If men [and we would add women] would be
great in goodness, they must be intelligent, for
no man can do good unless he knows how;
therefore seek after knowledge, all knowledge, and
especially that which is from above, which is wisdom to direct in all things, and if you find any thing
that God does not know, you need not learn that
thing; but strive to know what God knows, and
use that knowledge as God uses it, and then
you will be like him; [you] will . . . have charity,
love one another, and do each other good continually, and for ever . . . .
But if a man have all knowledge, and does not
use it for good, it will prove a curse instead of a
blessing as it did to Lucifer, the Son of the Morning.
[Millennial Star 14:22, 15 January 1852; emphasis added]
What a striking educational philosophy!
It sounds so simple: learn and love, strive to
know what God knows, use that knowledge
as God uses it, and you will be like him. Strive
for education to do each other good continually and forever. But of course that was first
taught to you in your kindergarten years.
Play fair. Don’t hit. Clean up your own mess.
Hold hands and stick together. Our education
has always carried with it ineluctable moral
obligations.
How important is all of this in 1987 as we
balance precariously on the BYU roof? Very
important, I think. As a nation we are swirling in—and seemingly overwhelmed by—
ethical and cultural and political chaos. The
moral implications for our society, as severe
as any America has faced, are serious partly
because they threaten the very idea of society so
directly. These violations of the commonweal
damage our efforts to live together in trust and
reciprocity.
“The United States needs to recover some
idealism,” read one recent newspaper headline (commentary by George R. Plagenz,
Newspaper Enterprise Association).
“Universities are turning out highly skilled
barbarians,” trumpets a national news magazine (U.S. News & World Report, 10 November
1980, p. 57).
We are a “nation without honor,” declares
a monthly periodical; a “nation of liars,” cries
another. Even the Pope travels to America to
remind us of our lost virtues. And no less an
arbiter of national virtue than Time magazine
runs a cover story on “sleaze, scandals and
hypocrisy,” documenting the nation’s frenzied search for its values, a mad scramble for
bearings in a time of stunning moral disarray (Time, 25 May 1987, cover). I say stunning
because I simply can’t quite keep it all straight
lately. Was it Gary Hart and Fawn Hall or
was it Jessica Hahn and Michael Deaver? Ivan
Boesky was trading something—was it arms
for hostages or a fake blessing given to Joseph
Smith III? And which were the good marines
and which were the bad? Were the call girls
in the Russian embassy or in the recreational
theme park? Was it a PTL boat that landed
in Nicaragua? Or have I got Tammy Bakker
mixed up with Howard? Forgive me if I seem
to grope.
But lest we smile, university students have
also contributed their share to the general
morass. Consider this from a recent educational quarterly:
Popular literature has painted today’s generation of college students as a cynical bunch of
money-grubbers, willing to stoop to any level to
“get ahead.” . . . Sadly enough, . . . students [today
do] not cherish or even understand the basic principles of academic honesty.
The evidence, based almost entirely on selfreporting, shows clearly that the levels of [university] cheating are high . . . .
The picture . . . is of a self-centered, competitive, insecure, and cynical generation of students,
committed to getting the most out of the present
[regardless of the cost to others]. In this context,
it is not surprising that colleges and universities
are becoming concerned about the ethical standards
of their students. [Richard A. Fass, “By Honor
Bound: Encouraging Academic Honesty,”
Educational Record, Fall 1986, p.32]
Becoming concerned? “The ethical standards of their students” is not just a trendy
issue at BYU; it is our heritage, our tradition.
And it should be a tradition at every university.
But quite frankly, universities as universities
only can’t do it. As Hitler rose to power and
forged the infamy of the Third Reich, Germany
had the finest university tradition in all of
continental Europe. And most of the truly
desperate and severe problems I have referred
to in America—whether moral, political, or cultural—have come at the hands of universitytrained men and women. (I intentionally use
the word “trained” rather than “educated.”)
No, “full and fair intellectual inquiry” alone
won’t do it. Academic instruction unmeasured
and untempered by integrity, instruction unenlightened by the civilizing forces and moral
obligations that go with the truth will simply
produce ever more “highly skilled barbarians.” And almost any newspaper or nightly
news broadcast can show us plenty of those.
Remember, “If a man have all knowledge, and
does not use it for good, it will prove a curse
instead of a blessing as it did to Lucifer, the
Son of the Morning.”
Of course, the saddest element in all of this
for me is not that the world doesn’t understand
civilizing values or, worse yet, that educationists often don’t, but saddest of all is that
each year a few of us at BYU don’t seem to
get it either—even with long-established and
frequently repeated LDS traditions to guide
us. The infractions of those very few then often
damage the experience and opportunity of the
rest of you. You are a remarkable generation
in every sense of the word. I salute you and
admire you and love you.
A Shared Sense of Responsibility
It goes without saying that at BYU we do
bear a special burden because we point out we
are different here, because we say we stand for
something traditional and spiritually worthwhile. Of course the moment we say that, we
are marked women and men—there are multitudes who would love to bring us down. But
that’s all right; it’s just all the more reason for
us, after cookie and milk time, to hold hands
and stick together.
By the time we come to a university
we’ve had adequate time to consider this
shared sense of responsibility we have for life
lived together. This bicentennial year of the
U.S. Constitution is a good time to consider
that earlier pledge from the Declaration of
Independence—that democracy rightly lived
requires a commitment no less than “our
lives, our fortunes, and our sacred honor,” as
Jefferson finally phrased it. I’d like to think in
some modest way that BYU’s “gamble” in the
twentieth century on the virtue and morality
and integrity of young men and women is not
unlike America’s gamble in the eighteenth.
Ben Franklin spoke for all of us at BYU when
he said at that fateful signing, “We must all
hang together, or assuredly we shall all hang
separately” (to John Hancock, on signing the
Declaration of Independence, July 4, 1776).
We don’t have to quote John Donne at this
point to remember that no man is an island.
“Ask not for whom the BYU carillon bell tower
chimes, it chimes for thee.” Everyone who
enters this university has, in a rather literal
way, entered a covenantal society. When
we come to BYU we come to take our position on the roof, with violin in hand, and we
declare to the rest of the world, “Tradition.”
Our tradition. BYU tradition. And that doesn’t
just mean ringing the victory bell after a ball
game or lighting the Y at Homecoming, as fun
and rewarding as those lesser traditions are.
Indeed, lighting the Y doesn’t mean one thing,
doesn’t justify the electricity it takes to do it, if
the meaning behind that mountaintop symbol,
“the spirit of the Y,” is not manifest in each of
our lives.
In covenantal societies, everyone has to help,
everyone has to help, everyone is accountable
because one theft of a piece of art (or bicycle or
backpack), or one abuse of drugs (prescription
or otherwise), or one sexual transgression seemingly pursued in darkened secrecy and the light
on that hillside Y grows a little dimmer. It isn’t
just the flame of education that flickers then; it
is the even more serious faltering of covenants
that have been compromised.
Tradition? Tradition! A lot of it, dearly
earned and even more dearly defended. It’s
tough keeping our footing on a slippery roof,
but there we are, determined to stay so long
as there’s a BYU. I am just biased enough to
believe it is the best university in all the world
for you to attend. That is why we care about
your lives, including how you look as well as
how you act. Be well groomed and modest as
an outward statement of an inner grace. Shorts
and miniskirts are not acceptable dress on this
campus, and we ask you not to wear them.
Please be aware that far more important than
(but not unrelated to) outward appearance
is the integrity and the disciplined behavior
displayed by a citizen voluntarily choosing
to live in a rigorously disciplined society. Be
true to Christ and your covenants. In an age
when culture is about five miles wide and
three-sixteenths of an inch deep, I am asking
for something deeper. I want an inspiring past,
present, and future—in short, a tradition—that
will give depth and height and millennia of
meaning to your relatively short time at BYU.
It will only come from our understanding of
the glory of God and our determination to
enjoy fully his blessings to us.
Do you remember the seed and the cup
from the kindergarten story? “The roots go
down and the plant goes up, and nobody
really knows why.” At BYU I want our roots
down and our plants up—and the more visible
those stems and branches and blossoms are,
the deeper our roots will have to go to sustain
them. Please don’t get caught in shallow soil,
intellectually or spiritually. The Savior taught
powerful parables about seeds needing to be
planted deeply and houses needing to be built
on strong foundations.
I want you to know that I love you and that
I care very much about you—about your hopes
and your dreams and your future. You—and
your experience while attending BYU—mean
everything in the world to me. Let me close
with a BYU story. It is a story about our tradition here. The account is nearly one hundred
years old, which makes it about the time you
were in kindergarten.
Fulfilling a Destiny
Karl G. Maeser was certainly one of the
most refined and educated men to join this
Church in the first fifty years of its restored
existence. Trained in the great classical tradition and distinguished in Saxony for his
breadth of learning, he gave up virtually
everything he had to enter the waters of baptism. Ostracized in his community and with no
way to make a living, he brought his wife and
two children to America, serving missions as
he came and finally joining the Saints in these
valleys of the Rocky Mountains. Once here
he gave the rest of his life to the educational
efforts of the Church, including fifteen years in
abject poverty as the first and greatest principal
of the then new and struggling Brigham Young
Academy located in Provo, Utah.
In December of 1900, two months before he
died, Brother Maeser was brought back to see
once more the modest single-building campus
on University Avenue he had built and loved
and defended. He was helped up the stairs
and into one of the classrooms where all of
the students instinctively stood as he entered.
Not a word was spoken. He looked at them
slowly, then made his way to the chalkboard.
With is bold script he wrote four statements on
the board, turned, and walked out of the BYA
forever, closing as he did so perhaps one of
the most distinguished educational lives this
university has ever known.
Several years after Brother Maeser’s death
a proposal was made to construct a memorial building in his name, not downtown on
University Avenue but high atop Temple Hill,
where a new campus might be built consisting
of as many as three or perhaps four buildings
someday. The cost would be an astronomical
$100,000, but the Maeser Building would be
a symbol of the past, a statement of aspiring
tradition, an anchor to the university’s future.
In spite of a staggering financial crisis
clouding the very future of the university at
the time, the faculty and student body took
heart that in 1912 the Maeser Building was
at least partially complete and the university
would give diplomas to its first four-year
graduating class. But even as graduation plans
were being made, equally urgent plans were
underway to sell the remainder of Temple Hill
for the development of a new Provo suburb.
The university simply had to have the money
to survive. Eighteen members were graduating in this first four-year class, but even if the
student body tripled in the years ahead, surely
there would be more than enough room to
accommodate them on the space now occupied
by the Maeser, Brimhall, and Grant buildings
on our present campus. Yes, the rest of the
space on the hill should be sold. The graduation services would conclude with a sales pitch
to the community leaders in attendance.
When Alfred Kelly was introduced that
morning as the student graduation speaker,
he rose and stood absolutely silent for several
moments. Some in the audience thought he
had lost the power of speech. Slowly he began
to speak, explaining that he had been much
concerned over his remarks, that he had written several versions and discarded every one
of them.
Then, early one morning, he said, with a
feeling of desperation regarding his approaching assignment, he walked north from his
downtown apartment to where the partially
completed Maeser Building stood (as Horace
Cummings would later describe it) as an “air
castle” come to earth on Temple Hill. He
wanted to gain inspiration from this hope of
a new campus, but he felt only grim disappointment. The sky was starting to glow from
the morning light, but the darkly silhouetted
Maeser Building seemed only a symbol of
gloom.
Kelly then turned his eyes to view the
valley below that was also still in shadow. The
light from the rising sun was just beginning
to illuminate the western hills back of Utah
Lake with an unusual golden glow. As morning came, the light gradually worked down
from the hilltops, moved across the valley
floor, and slowly advanced to the spot where
Kelly stood.
He said he partially closed his eyes as the
light approached and was startled by what he
could still see. He stood as if transfixed. In the
advancing sunlight everything he saw took
on the appearance of people, young people
about his age moving toward Temple Hill. He
saw hundreds of them, thousands of young
people coming into view. He knew they were
students, he said, because they carried books
in their arms as they came.
Then Temple Hill was bathed in sunlight,
and the whole of the present campus was
illuminated not with one partially completed
building, nor with homes in a modern subdivision, but rather what Kelly described to
that graduating class as “temples of learning,”
large buildings, beautiful buildings, hundreds
of buildings covering the top of that hill and
stretching clear to the mouth of Rock Canyon.
The students then entered these temples
of learning with their books in hand. As they
came out of them, Kelly said their countenances
bore smiles of hope and of faith. He observed
that they seemed cheerful and very confident.
Their walk was light but firm as they again
became a part of the sunlight as it moved to
the top of Y Mountain, and then they gradually
disappeared from view.
Kelly sat down to what was absolutely
stone-deaf silence. Not a word was spoken.
What about the sales pitch? No one moved
or whispered. Then longtime BYU benefactor
Jesse Knight jumped to his feet and shouted,
“We won’t sell an acre. We won’t sell a single
lot.” And he turned to President George
Brimhall and pledged several thousand dollars
to the future of the university. Soon others
stood up and joined in, some offering only a
widow’s mite, but all believing in the dream of
a Provo schoolboy, all believing the destiny of
a great university which that day had scarcely
begun. (See B. F. Larsen, “Fifty Years Ago,”
speech given at a BYU Alumni meeting, 25
May 1962, B.F. Larsen biographical file, BYU
Archives, pp. 4–5.)
When you leave here today, consider a
campus that now stretches from that newly
renovated Maeser Building to the very mouth
of Rock Canyon itself where a special temple
of learning (built on BYU property) watches
by night and day over this very pleasant valley. Think of the buildings and think of the
lives and think of the tradition. It is now your
tradition.
Oh, yes. I suppose you are wondering
about those four things Karl G. Maeser wrote
on that board that day. They are part of the
tradition, too.
1. [To love] God is the beginning of all
wisdom.
2. This life is one great [homework] assignment . . . in the principles of immortality and
eternal life.
3. Man grows only with his higher goals.
4. Never let anything impure enter here.
A fiddler on the roof? It’s a tough
assignment, but we are all up there together,
defending that inheritance. Welcome to our
precarious and beautiful place. I express my
love for every one of you and my conviction
of the restored gospel of Jesus Christ. It is true
and gives eternal meaning to our work here.
With Tevye I invite you to discover in our
BYU tradition of learning and love and purity
“who you really are and what God expects
you to do,” in the blessed name of Jesus
Christ. Amen.

THE BITTER CUP

The Duration of the War
	 In the final few weeks of 1944 I was bundled
up and taken, at about six in the morning as I
recall, down to the Big Hand Cafe on the corner
of Main Street and Highway 91 in St. George,
Utah. That’s where the Greyhound bus stopped
in our little town, and that morning my Uncle
Herb, all of seventeen years of age, was leaving
for San Diego, California—wherever that was.
Apparently in 1944 there was a war on somewhere, and he was now deemed old enough to
go and do his part. He had joined the United
States Navy, and we were there to say good-bye.
	 Actually, I had a rather formal part in this
bus stop program. I had practiced and was now
supposed to sing in my four-year-old solo voice
a little ditty that celebrated sailors with lyrics
beginning “Bell-bottom trousers / Coat of navy
blue. / She loves her sailor boy / And he loves
her too.” However, as with other assignments
later in my life, I panicked in the public eye and
went stone silent. I refused to sing a note.
	 But my silence seemed to work out all right
anyway because my mother and my grandmother and my aunts were all crying and
nobody cared much whether I sang or not.
I asked why they were crying, and they said
it was because Uncle Herb was going to war.
I asked, “How long will he be gone?”—not
knowing then that some of the boys were never
coming home. Through her tears my grandmother said, “He will be gone as long as it takes.
He will be gone for the duration of the war.”
	 Well, I had no idea whatsoever of her meaning. “As long as it takes to do what?” for crying
out loud—which is exactly what they were
doing. And what was “the duration of the
war”? I was totally confused and very glad
I didn’t sing my song. That would only have
added to the confusion, and the Big Hand
Cafe never could stand much confusion.
	 As you might suppose, I have thought a
lot more about my grandmother’s words later
in my life than I ever thought about them in
my youth. Lately they have been on my mind
again, and I hope they might have some significance for you this morning.
	 The longer I live the more I come to realize
that some things in life are very true and very
permanent and very important. They are, I suppose, matters that might collectively be labeled
© by Intellectual Reserve, Inc. All rights reserved. SPEECHES.BYU.EDU 1
The Bitter Cup
and the Bloody Baptism
JEFFREY R. HOLLAND
Jeffrey R. Holland was president of Brigham Young
University when this devotional address was given
on 13 January 1987.
2 Brigham Young University 1986–87 Speeches
“eternal” things. Without listing a whole
catalog of these good and permanent possessions, let me say that all of them are included
collectively, in some way or another, in the
gospel of Jesus Christ. As Mormon told his son,
“In Christ there . . . come[s]” every good thing”
(Moroni 7:22). So, as time goes by, we ought—as
a matter of personal maturity and growth in
the gospel—to spend more of our time with
and devote more of our energy to the good
things, the best things, the things that endure
and bless and prevail.
	 This is why, I believe, family and true friends
become increasingly important the older we
get, and so does knowledge and so do simple
acts of kindness and concern for the circumstances of others. Peter lists a whole handful
of these virtues and calls them “the divine
nature,” and he promises us “divine power”
in possessing and sharing them (see 2 Peter
1:3–8). These gospel qualities and principles,
as I understand them, are the most important
as well as the most permanent of life’s acquisitions. But there is a war going on over such
personal possessions, and there will yet be a
bazooka shell or two falling into your life that
will prompt—indeed, will require—careful
examination of what you say you believe, what
you assume you hold dear, and what you trust
is of permanent worth.
	 When difficult times come upon us or when
temptation seems all around, will we be—are
we now?—prepared to stand our ground and
outlast the intruder? Are we equipped for combat, to stay loyal for as long as it takes, to stay
true for the duration of the war? Can we hold
fast to the principles and the people who truly
matter eternally to us?
	 It is, I suppose, this quality of your faith, the
determination of your purpose, that I wish so
much to stress this morning. I am asking you
to reexamine and more clearly understand the
commitment you made when you were baptized not only into Christ’s church, but into his
life and his death and his resurrection, into all
that he is and stands for in time and in eternity.
Nearly 98 percent of this audience are baptized
and confirmed members of the LDS Church.
Virtually that same percentage of the men are
also ordained priesthood bearers, and many of
the men and women here have already taken
upon themselves the highest covenants and
holiest ordinances available in mortality—those
of the holy temple.
	 So surely we have as a congregation already
thrust ourselves into the most serious and
most eternal of issues. The war is on, and we
have conspicuously enlisted. And certainly
it is a war worth waging. But we are foolish,
fatally foolish, if we believe it will be a casual or
convenient thing. We are foolish if we think it
will demand nothing of us. Indeed, as the chief
figure, the great commander in this struggle,
Christ has warned us about treating the new
testament of his body and his blood trivially.
We are told emphatically not to pilfer and profane, prevaricate and fornicate, satiate ourselves
in every indulgence or violation that strikes our
fancy and then suppose that we are still “pretty
darn good soldiers.” No, not in this army, not in
defending the kingdom of God.
	 More is expected than that. Much more is
needed. And in a very real sense eternity hangs
in the balance. I truly believe there can be no
casual Christians, for if we are not watchful
and resolute, we will become in the heat of
battle a Christian “casual-ty.” And each of us
knows some of those. Perhaps we ourselves
have at sometime been wounded. We weren’t
strong enough. We hadn’t cared enough. We
didn’t stop to think. The war was more dangerous than we had supposed. The temptation
to transgress, to compromise, is all around
us, and too many of us, even as members of
the Church, have fallen victim. We partook of
Christ’s “flesh and blood unworthily,” and we
ate and drank damnation to our soul (3 Nephi
18:28–29).
	 Some of us may still be taking such transgression lightly, but at least the Master understands the significance of the side we say we
have chosen. Let me use just one example.”
Jeffrey R. Holland  3
“Are Ye Able?”
	 At the conclusion of his Perean ministry,
Jesus and the Twelve were making their way
back to Jerusalem for that last, prophetically
foretold week leading up to his arrest, trial, and
crucifixion. In that most sober and foreboding sequence of events, the Savior—who singly
and solitarily alone knew what lay ahead of
him and just how difficult the commitments of
his final hours would be—was approached by
the mother of two of his chief disciples, James
and John. She rather straightforwardly asked
a favor of the Son of God. She said, “Grant that
these my two sons may sit, the one on thy right
hand, and the other on the left, in thy kingdom”
(Matthew 20:21).
	 This good mother, and perhaps most of the
little band who had faithfully followed Jesus,
were obviously preoccupied by the dream and
expectation of that time when this, their Messiah,
would rule and reign in splendor, when, as the
scripture says, “the kingdom of God should
immediately appear” (Luke 19:11). The question
was one more of ignorance than impropriety, and
Christ uttered not a word of rebuke. He gently
answered as one who always considered the
consequence of any commitment.
	 “Ye know not,” he said quietly, “what ye ask.
Are ye able to drink of the cup that I shall drink of?”
(Matthew 20:22; emphasis added). This startling
question did not seem to take James and John
bysurprise. Promptly and firmly they replied,
“We are able.” And Jesus’s response to them
was, “Ye shall drink indeed of my cup, and be
baptized with the baptism that I am baptized
with” (Matthew 20:23).
	 Without any reference to the glory or special
privilege they seem to have been seeking, this
may strike one as a strange favor the Lord was
granting James and John. But he was not mocking
them by offering the cup of his suffering rather
than a throne in his kingdom. No, he had never
been more serious. The cup and the throne were
inextricably linked and could not be given separately.
	 I am sure that you and I, being not only less
worthy than Christ but also less worthy than
apostles like James and John, would leave such
troublesome issues alone if they would only
leave us alone. As a rule we usually do not
seek the bitter cup and the bloody baptism, but
sometimes they seek us. The fact of the ­matter
is God does draft men and women into the
spiritual warfare of this world, and if any of us
come to genuine religious faith and conviction
as a result of that—as many a drafted soldier
has done—it will nevertheless be a faith and a
conviction that in the first flames of the battle
we did not enjoy and certainly did not expect.
(See A. B. Bruce, The Training of the Twelve [New
York: Richard R. Smith, 1930].)
Stand Firmly By Your Faith
	 I am asking this morning that we put
ourselves in the place of James and John, put
ourselves in the place of seemingly committed, believing, faithful Latter-day Saints, and
ask ourselves, “If we are Christ’s and he is
ours, are we willing to stand firm forever?
Are we in this church for keeps, for the duration, until it’s over? Are we in it through the
bitter cup, the bloody baptism, and all?” And
please understand that I am not asking if you
can simply endure your years at BYU or serve
out your term as gospel doctrine teacher.
I am asking questions of a far deeper and
more fundamental sort. I am asking about
the purity of your heart. How cherished are
our covenants? Have we—perhaps beginning
our life in the Church as a result of parental
insistence or geographic happenstance—have
we yet thought about a life that is ultimately
to be tempted and tried and purified by fire?
Have we cared about our convictions enough
and are we ­regularly reinforcing them in a way
that will help us do the right thing at the right
time for the right reason, especially when it is
unpopular or unprofitable or nearly unbearable
to do so?
4   Brigham Young University 1986–87 Speeches
	 Indeed, you may one day be released as
the glamorous gospel doctrine teacher and be
called to that much vacated post of gospel doctrine believer and obeyer. That will test your
strength! Surely our sometimes clichéd expressions of testimony and latter-day privilege don’t
amount to much until we have had open invitation to test them in the heat of battle and have
in such spiritual combat found ourselves to be
faithful. We may speak glibly in those Sunday
services of having the truth or even of knowing
the truth, but only one who is ­confronting error
and conquering it, however painfully or however slowly, can properly speak of loving the
truth. And I believe Christ intends us someday
to truly, honestly love him—the way, the truth,
and the life.
	 Tragically enough, the temptation to compromise standards or be less valiant before
God often comes from another member of the
Church. Elder Grant Bangerter wrote of his
experience years ago in the military shortly
after he had returned from his mission. “I realized,” he concluded, “throughout those years
that I was considered different. . . . [But] I never
found it necessary to break my standards, to
remove my garments, or to apologize for being
a Latter-day Saint.” Then came this very telling
observation:
I can honestly say that no nonmember of the
Church has ever tried to induce me to discard my
[LDS] standards. The only people I remember trying
to coerce me to abandon my principles or who ridiculed me for my standards have been non-practicing
members of [my own] Church. [William Grant
Bangerter, “Don’t Mind Being Square,” New Era,
July 1982, p. 6]
	 What a painful observation if we were to
apply it at a place like BYU, where the temptation to compromise may come from a “practicing” member of the Church.
	 Even here—maybe especially here, because
we have been given so much—we must be
prepared to stand by principle and act on
conviction, even if that seems to leave us standing alone. Remember these lines from Paradise
Lost:
I alone
Seemed in thy world erroneous to dissent
From all; my sect thou seest. Now learn too late
How few sometimes may know, when thousands err.
[Book VI, lines 145–48]
	 I do not think thousands err at BYU, but
some do, and I believe that you will leave here
to work and live in a world where many do,
more than Milton’s thousands. So my call—
especially while we are in an environment that
requires and expects it—is to live by the highest
principles and to stand firmly by your faith. I
ask it however difficult or lonely that may seem,
even at a place as beautiful as BYU. You may be
tempted, you undoubtedly are tempted. But be
strong. The cup and the throne are inextricably
linked.
Our Christian Challenge
	 I think perhaps so far I have made you think
only of the rather obvious transgressions young
Latter-day Saints face, the temptations Satan
never seems to keep very subtle. But what
about the gospel-living that isn’t so obvious and
may be of a higher order still? Let me shift both
the tone and the temptations just slightly and
cite other examples of our Christian challenge.
	 On the night of March 24, 1832, a dozen men
stormed the Hiram, Ohio, home where Joseph
and Emma Smith were staying. Both were
physically and emotionally spent, not only from
all the travails of the young Church at the time
but also because on this particular evening
they had been up caring for their two adopted
twins, born eleven months earlier on the same
day that Emma had given birth to—and then
lost—their own twins. Emma had gone to bed
first while Joseph stayed up with the children;
then she had arisen to take her turn, encouraging her husband to get some sleep. No sooner
had he begun to doze than he heard his wife
Jeffrey R. Holland  5
give a terrifying scream and found himself
being torn from the house and very nearly
being torn limb from limb.
	 Cursing as they went, the mob that had
seized him were swearing to kill Joseph if he
resisted. One man grabbed him by the throat
until he lost consciousness from lack of breath.
He came to only to overhear part of their conversation on whether he should be murdered. It
was determined that for now he would simply
be stripped naked, beaten senseless, tarred and
feathered, and left to fend for himself in the
bitter March night. Stripped of his clothing,
fighting off fists and tar paddles on every side,
and resisting a vial of some liquid—perhaps
poison—which he shattered with his teeth as
it was forced into his mouth, he miraculously
managed to fight off the entire mob and eventually made his way back to the house. In the dim
light his wife thought the tar stains covering
his body were blood stains, and she fainted at
the sight.
	 Friends spent the entire night scraping and
removing the tar and applying liniments to
his scratched and battered body. I now quote
directly from the Prophet Joseph’s record:
By morning I was ready to be clothed again. This
being the Sabbath morning, the people assembled
for meeting at the usual hour of worship, and among
them came also the mobbers [of the night before.
Then he names them.] With my flesh all scarified
and defaced, I preached to the congregation as usual,
and in the afternoon of the same day baptized three
individuals. [HC 1:264]
	 Unfortunately, one of the adopted twins,
growing worse from the exposure and turmoil
of the night, died the following Friday. “With
my flesh all scarified and defaced, I preached
to the congregation as usual”! To that slimy
band of cowards who by Friday next will quite
literally be the murderers of your child? Stand
there hurting from the hair of your head that
was pulled and then tarred into a mat, hurting right down to your foot that was nearly
torn off being wrenched out the door of your
own home? Preach the gospel to that damnable
bunch of sniveling reprobates? Surely this is no
time to stand by principle. It is daylight now
and the odds aren’t twelve to one anymore.
Let’s just conclude this Sunday service right
now and go outside to finish last evening’s
business. It was, after all, a fairly long night
for Joseph and Emma; maybe it should be an
equally short morning for this dirty dozen who
have snickeringly shown up for church.
	 But those feelings that I have even now just
reading about this experience 150 years later—
and feelings I know that would have raged in
my Irish blood that morning—mark only one
of the differences between me and the Prophet
Joseph Smith. You see, a disciple of Christ—
which I testify to you Joseph was and is—
always has to be a disciple; the judge does not
give any time off for bad behavior. A Christian
always stands on principle, even as old Holland
is out there swinging a pitchfork and screaming an eye for an eye, and a tooth for a tooth—
forgetting, as dispensation after dispensation
has forgotten, that this only leaves everyone
blind and toothless.
	 No, the good people, the strong people,
dig down deeper and find a better way. Like
Christ, they know that when it is hardest to
be so is precisely the time you have to be at
your best. As another confession to you, I have
always feared that I could not have said at
Calvary’s cross, “Father, forgive them; for they
know not what they do” (Luke 23:34). Not after
the spitting, and the cursing, and the thorns,
and the nails. Not if they don’t care or understand that this horrible price in personal pain
is being paid for them. But that’s just the time
when the fiercest kind of integrity and loyalty
to high purpose must take over. That’s just the
time when it matters the very most and when
everything else hangs in the balance—for
surely it did that day. You and I won’t ever
find ourselves on that cross, but we repeatedly
find ourselves at the foot of it. And how we act
there will speak volumes about what we think
6   Brigham Young University 1986–87 Speeches
of Christ’s character and his call for us to be
his disciples.
Tested in the Heat of Battle
	 Yes, our challenges will be a lot less dramatic
than a tar-and-feathering; certainly they won’t
involve a crucifixion. And maybe they won’t
even be very personal matters at all. Maybe
they will involve someone else—perhaps an
injustice done to a neighbor, a ­person much less
popular and privileged than ­yourself.
	 In cataloging life’s little battles, this may
be the least attractive kind of war for you, a
bitter cup you especially don’t wish to drink
because there seems to be so little advantage
in it for you. After all, it’s really someone else’s
problem, and like Hamlet you may well lament
that “time is out of joint; O cursed spite, / That
ever [you were] born to set it right!” (William
Shakespeare, Hamlet, act 1, sc. 5, lines 187–88).
But set it right you must, for “Inasmuch as ye
have done it unto one of the least of these my
brethren, ye have done it unto me” (Matthew
25:40). And in times of such Doniphan-like
defense, it may be risky, even dangerous, to
stand true.
	 Martin Luther King, Jr., once said:
The ultimate measure of a man is not where he
stands in moments of comfort and convenience, but
where he stands at times of challenge and controversy. The true neighbor will risk his position, his
prestige, and even his life for the welfare of others.
In dangerous valleys and hazardous pathways, he
will lift some bruised and beaten brother to a higher
and more noble life. [Martin Luther King, Jr., “On
Being a Good Neighbor,” Strength to Love (New
York: Harper and Row, 1963), pp. 20–21]
	 But what if in this war it is neither a neighbor
nor yourself at risk, but someone desperately,
dearly loved by you who is hurt or defamed
or perhaps even taken in death? How might
we prepare for that distant day when our own
child, or our own spouse, is found in mortal
danger? One marvelously gifted man, a convert
to Christianity, slowly watched his wife dying
of cancer. As he observed her slipping away
from him with all that she had meant and had
given him, his newfound faith about which he
had written so much and with which he had
strengthened so many others now began to
waver. In times of such grief, C. S. Lewis wrote,
one runs the risk of asking:
Where is God? . . . When you are happy, . . . [you]
turn to Him with gratitude and praise, [and] you
will be . . . welcomed with open arms. But go to
Him when your need is desperate, when all other
help is vain, and what do you find? A door slammed
in your face, and a sound of bolting and double bolting on the inside. After that, silence. You [might]
as well turn away. The longer you wait, the more
emphatic the silence will become. There are no lights
in the windows. It might be an empty house. . . .
[Yet he was once there.] What can this mean?
Why is [God] so present a commander in our time
of prosperity and so very absent a help in time of
trouble? [C. S. Lewis, A Grief Observed (New
York: Seabury Press, Inc., 1961), pp. 4–5]
	 Those feelings of abandonment, written in
the midst of a terrible grief, slowly passed, and
the comfort of Lewis’ faith returned, stronger
and purer for the test. But note what selfrevelation this bitter cup, this bloody baptism,
had for him. In an obligation of quite a different
kind, he, too, now realized that enlisting for the
duration of the war is not a trivial matter, and
in the heat of battle he hadn’t been so heroic as
he had encouraged millions of his readers to be.
	 “You never know how much you really
believe anything,” he confesses,
until its truth or falsehood becomes a matter of life
and death to you. It is easy to say you believe a rope
to be strong and sound as long as you are merely
using it to [tie] a box. But suppose you had to hang
by that rope over a precipice. Wouldn’t you then first
discover how much you really trusted it? . . . Only
Jeffrey R. Holland  7
a real risk tests the reality of a belief. [Lewis, Grief,
p. 25]
. . . Your [view of] . . . eternal life . . . will not be
[very] serious if nothing much is [at stake]. . . . A
man . . . has to be knocked silly before he comes to his
senses. [p. 43]
. . . I had been warned—[indeed,] I had warned
myself. . . . [I knew] we were . . . promised sufferings.
[That was] part of the program. We were even told,
“Blessed are they that mourn,” and I accepted it. I’ve
got nothing that I hadn’t [agreed to]. . . . [So] if my
house . . . collapsed at one blow, that is because it was
a house of cards. The faith which “took these things
into account” was not [an adequate] faith. . . . If I
had really cared, as I thought I did [care], about the
sorrows of [others in this] world, [then] I should
not have been so overwhelmed when my own sorrow
came. . . . I thought I trusted the rope until it mattered. . . . [And when it indeed mattered, I found
that it wasn’t strong enough.]
. . . You will never discover how serious it [is]
until the stakes are raised horribly high; [and God
has a way of raising the stakes] . . . [sometimes]
only suffering [can] do [that]. [pp. 41–44]
	 [So God is, then, something like a divine
physician.] A cruel man might be bribed—might
grow tired of his vile sport—might have a temporary
fit of mercy, as alcoholics have [temporary] fits of
sobriety. But suppose that what you are up against is
a [wonderfully skilled] surgeon whose intentions
are [solely and absolutely] good. [Then], the kinder
and more conscientious he is, [the more he cares
about you,] the more inexorably he will go on cutting [in spite of the suffering it may cause. And]
if he yielded to your entreaties, if he stopped before
the operation was complete, all the pain up to that
point would have been useless. . . . [pp. 49–50]
	 [So I am, you see, one] of God’s patients, not
yet cured. I know there are not only tears [yet] to be
dried but stains [yet] to be scoured. [My] sword will
be made even brighter. [p. 49]
	 God wants us to be stronger than we are—
more fixed in our purpose, more certain of our
commitments, eventually needing less coddling
from him, showing more willingness to shoulder
some of the burden of his heavy load. In short,
he wants us to be more like he is and, if you
haven’t noticed, some of us are not like that yet.
	 The question then, for all of us milling
around the Greyhound bus depot about to
report for duty, is: When gospel principles get
unpopular or unprofitable or very difficult to
live, will we stand by them “for the duration”?
That is the question our experiences in Latterday Saint life seem most determined to answer.
What do we really believe, and how true to
that are we really willing to live? As university
students—bright and blessed and eager and
prosperous—do we yet know what faith—
specifically, faith in the Lord Jesus Christ—
really is, what it requires in human behavior,
and what it may yet demand of us before our
souls are finally saved?
	 May I close by telling you how much I love
you and how much I care about what you
become at BYU and beyond. I think about
you day and night, and I pray for your brightest possible future. My testimony to you this
morning is that God does live and good does
triumph. This is the true and living Church of
the true and living Christ. And because of him
and the restored gospel and the work of living prophets—including President Ezra Taft
Benson—there is for each of us individually
and for all of us collectively, if we stay fixed and
faithful in our purpose, a great final moment
somewhere when we will stand with the angels
“in the presence of God, on a globe like a sea of
glass and fire, where all things for [our] glory
are manifest, past, present, and future” (D&C
130:7). That is a triumphant day for which I
dearly long, and for which I earnestly pray for
all of you. To earn the right to be there may we,
as Alma said, “stand as witnesses of God at all
times and in all things, and in all places that
[we] may be in, even until death” (Mosiah 18:9),
I pray in the name of Jesus Christ. Amen.

OH, LORD KEEP MY RUDDER TRUE

Matters of Loyalty
A recent event on our campus helps set the
stage for my remarks today. It was covered
thoroughly by the press, including an excellent
editorial published in the Daily Universe.
The date was November 16, 1985—just over two
months ago. We made history. Television covered
it, the print media published it, and in the best
Clint Eastwood fashion, we made Beano Cook’s
day. BYU booed its own quarterback.
One of America’s truly distinguished philosophers, Josiah Royce, wrote:
Loyalty is for the loyal man not only a good, but for him
chief amongst all the moral goods of his life, because it
furnishes . . . him a personal solution [to] the hardest
of [all] human . . . problems, the problem: “For what
do I live?” [The Philosophy of Loyalty (New York:
Macmillan Co., 1908), p. 57]
It is loyalty—loyalty to true principles and true
people and honorable institutions and worthy
­ideals—that unifies our purpose in life and
defines our morality. Where we have no such loyalties or convictions, no standards against which
to measure our acts and their consequences, we
are unanchored and adrift, “driven with the wind
and tossed,” says the scripture (James 1:6), until
some other storm or problem or appetite takes us
another direction for an equally short and unstable period of time. The older I get—which isn’t old
enough yet—the more I believe Professor Royce
must have been right. “For what do I live?” is, in
a sense, the inquiry every LDS missionary invites
his or her investigator to make. If there is honest
consideration of that question, then eternal truth
has a fighting chance to bless the children of God.
And such matters of loyalty and honor are important at BYU, for “to make [young people] capable
of honesty,” according to John Ruskin, “is the
beginning of education.” Samuel Johnson said it
even better: “Integrity without knowledge is weak
and useless, and knowledge without integrity is
dangerous and dreadful” (Emerson Roy West,
Vital Quotations [Salt Lake City: Bookcraft, 1968],
p. 177).
Let me go back to Robbie Bosco. There are a lot
of reasons why that booing incident bothers me.
First of all it bothers me that any BYU fan would
boo anybody for any reason. If someone can
explain to me the Christianity of that, I invite you
to do so quickly. Obviously it bothers me that such
an experience would be seared by Mr. Cook into
the entire national memory as the most regrettable
moment of the entire collegiate football season.
It bothers me that we would do this to a fellow student, a neighbor, a friend, a convert to the
Church in this case. Not to mention, of course,
that he also led us to two of our greatest years in
BYU football history, including two conference
championships, two post-season bowl games, a
victory in the famed Kick-Off Classic, one undefeated season, and a national championship.
It bothers me that a very small handful of
­individuals could cast a cloud over a very fine
game (which, by the way, we went on to win
against a team that would end up fifth in the
nation) and also cast something of a cloud over
the whole season and, at least for me, cast a bit of
a cloud over BYU football itself. At the same time
I’m confident that this small handful of rabid fans
on virtually every other day of the week are probably pretty decent folks who wouldn’t think of
speaking so shamefully to anyone’s face but who
somehow get caught up—or get caught down,
as the case may be—in the fever of a game and
watch their boorish behavior increase in direct
proportion to the anonymity of the crowd and
their own safe distance from a blitzing linebacker.
Someone once said that no individual snowflake
ever felt any responsibility for an avalanche.
Maybe that is true in some activities on our
campus as well.
What I wish to ask of you today is to be the
kind of person who stands loyally by the principles and people and institutions to which you
have declared allegiance and that probably have
given you most of the blessings you enjoy. In that
sense, what I say here has very little to do with
fans or football or Beano Cook, whoever he is.
The booing of a fellow human being is probably
soon forgotten (except, perhaps, by the booee), so
we apologize to Robbie and all others who have
received unchristian treatment at our hands and
move on to ask the larger question: “If every BYU
student had exactly the same sense of loyalty I
have, what kind of school or church or nation or
world would ours be?”
How much pressure is too much pressure to
remain true? How much disappointment is too
much disappointment to stand firm? How far is
too far to walk with a discouraged friend or a
struggling spouse or a troubled child? When the
opposition heats up and the going gets tough, how
much of what we thought was important to us
will we defend and how much, in that inevitable
tug and pull of life, will we find it convenient to
give away?
As with so many abstractions that need to be
made concrete, our homes and families are very
good settings for an initial application. Would
we, for example, stand by a younger brother or
an older sister in times of despair or pain? Would
we defend to the death our parents if they really
needed our help? Even if our prayers are embarrassingly skimpy, don’t we at least pray for the
members of our family? I assume that those questions are easy to answer, because we say something like “Well, I love them” or “I owe it to them”
or “They would do the same thing for me.”
Yet what we so often fail to remember is that
we should feel that way about everyone, that
“family” is the true Christian appellation for the
entire human race. Have we made the Sunday
greeting of “Brother Jones and Sister Brown” too
common to remember why we say it? Has our
hasty reference to “Father in Heaven” grown stale
and insignificant? Will we ever widen our circle
of influence beyond that already claimed by the
Pharisees, who even in their benighted state did
not boo other Pharisees? “What reward have ye?
. . . And if ye salute your brethren only, what do ye
more than others? do not even the publicans so?”
(Matthew 5:46–47). In matters of loyalty we all
have a long way yet to go.
Your Brother’s Brother
The late Alvin R. Dyer faced something of
this challenge when he was a bishop many years
ago. He had a member of his ward who said that
smoking was the greatest single enjoyment he got
out of life. He said, “At night I set my alarm every
hour on the hour and wake up to smoke a cigarette. Bishop, I love smoking just too much to give
it up.”
A few evenings later the man’s doorbell rang at
10:00 p.m. There on the doorstep was Bishop Dyer.
“Well, Bishop, what on earth are you doing here
at this hour? I’m ready to go to bed.”
“I know,” said Bishop Dyer. “I want to see
you set that alarm and watch you wake up and
smoke.”
“Good heavens, I can’t do that in front of you,”
the man said.
“Oh, sure you can. Don’t worry about me.
I’ll just sit in the corner somewhere and be very
quiet.”
The man invited him in, and they talked about
everything Bishop Dyer could conjure up to hold
the man’s interest. “I pursued every idea and
conversation I could think of to keep him speaking. I thought he was going to throw me out a
number of times, but shortly after three o’clock in
the morning I said, ‘Well, heavenly days! You’ve
missed five alarms already. Please forgive me! I
have ruined your evening’s enjoyment. The night
is such a disappointment now that you might
as well just go to bed and forget the rest of the
alarms this once!’”
 Then note this language:
At that moment [I] felt [in him] a sense of honor
and a dignity. . . . He looked at me with a peculiar smile
. . . , and he said, “All right, I will.” [And] he never
touched another cigarette [for the rest of his life]. [See
Alvin R. Dyer, Conference Report, 5 April 1965, p. 85]
How would you describe Brother Dyer’s loyalty?
Was it loyalty to that inactive man or loyalty to the
members of his ward generally or loyalty to his
office as bishop or loyalty to the Word of Wisdom
or loyalty to the principle of revelation or loyalty
to the Church or loyalty to God or—well, you get
my point.
His Father in Heaven asks Cain, “Where is Abel
thy brother?” and Cain fires back, “I know not: Am
I my brother’s keeper?” (Genesis 4:9; emphasis
added). Maybe the answer to that question is—as
Professor Chauncey Riddle once said to me—”No,
Cain, you are not expected to be your brother’s
keeper. But you are expected to be your brother’s
brother.”
Consider for a moment the kind of treachery
Cain introduced into the world—the betrayal of
family, friends, and fellow citizens. His legacy is a
chilling one, and his colleagues are legion.
Dante reserve[d] the innermost circle of hell [for this
crowd,] for those who [turn against their own].
There he has placed Judas, Brutus, and Cassius—the
most notorious of traitors—in the three mouths of Satan
himself. Revealingly, the poet does not rely on the image
of fire for his description of their plight. The souls of
traitors are held fast in a lake of ice. Clearly, the worst
of sins against [one’s] brother [or sister] are those of the
frozen heart. Those who are disloyal to others have chosen a life isolated and immobile, a life, in effect, hostile
to life, for which the only adequate image is a sunless
waste of ice. [William F. May, A Catalogue of Sins
(New York: Holt, Rinehart and Winston, 1967),
pp. 111–12]
Well, if we are not called upon to defend a
member of the family quite so openly as Cain
was, perhaps we will have opportunities to defend
the Church.
“True Blue, Through and Through”
After four years of missionary service in the
Hawaiian Islands (begun at age fifteen, by the
way), young Joseph F. Smith returned to the
mainland and began making his way back to
the Salt Lake Valley. But these were difficult
times. Feelings toward the Latter-day Saints were
running very high. The terrible experience at
Mountain Meadows was fresh in the minds of
many people. Polygamy had become a national
political issue, and at that very hour Albert Sidney
Johnston’s army was on its way to the Utah territory under orders from the president of the United
States. Less disciplined than the U.S. Army were
many frontiersmen scattered abroad who vowed
openly they would murder every Mormon anywhere they could be found.
It was back into that world that nineteen-yearold Joseph F. Smith drove his team and wagon.
One evening the little company with which he
traveled had barely made camp before a company
of drunken men rode in on horseback, cursing
and swearing and threatening to kill. Some of the
older men, when they heard the riders coming,
had gone down into the brush by the creek, waiting out of sight for the band to pass. But young
Joseph F. had been out a distance from the camp
gathering wood for the fire and so was not aware
of the potential problem. With the openness of
youth he walked back toward the camp, only to
realize too late the difficult circumstance he now
faced almost totally alone.
His first thought was to drop the wood and run
toward the creek, seeking shelter in the trees in his
flight. Then the thought came to him, “Why should
I run from [my faith]?” With that compelling sense
of loyalty firmly in his mind, he continued to carry
his armful of wood to the edge of the fire. As he
was about to deposit his load, one of the ruffians,
pistol cocked and pointed squarely at the young
man’s head, cursed as only a drunken rascal can
and demanded in a loud, angry voice, “I’m a killer
of Mormons, boy. Are you a Mormon?”
Without a moment of hesitation and looking the
heathen directly in the eye, Joseph F., scarcely old
enough to be entering the MTC, boldly answered,
“Yes, siree; died in the wool; true blue, through
and through.”
The answer was given so boldly and without
any sign of fear that it completely disarmed this
belligerent man. In his bewilderment he put down
his pistol, grasped the young missionary by the
hand, and said, “Well, you are the — — bravest
man I ever met! Shake, young fellow, I’m glad to
see a lad that stands up for his convictions.”
Years later, while serving as the president of
the Church, Joseph F. Smith said that he truly
expected to take at point-blank range the full
charge from the barrel of that man’s pistol. But he
also said that after his initial inclination to run, it
never again entered his mind to do anything but
stand up for his beliefs and face the death that
appeared to be the inevitable result of such conviction. (Taken from Joseph Fielding Smith, Life of
Joseph F. Smith [Salt Lake City: Deseret News Press,
1938], pp. 188–89.)
Montaigne’s ancient cry of the storm-tossed
sailor comes to mind: “Oh, Lord, thou shalt save
me if thou please; if not, thou shalt lose me; yet
Lord will I keep my rudder true” (see Michel
Eyquem de Montaigne, Essays, book II, chapter 16).
But of course it is not enough to be loyal to
just any cause. What carried nineteen-year-old
Joseph F. Smith so courageously was his answer to
the question “For what do I live?” It was for gospel
truth that he stood up to be counted and for which
he was willing to die.
They Did Not Falter
Brigham Young certainly had repeated opportunities to hold a steady course, particularly in
those early and difficult years at the side of the
Prophet Joseph Smith. While the First Presidency
was away from Kirtland attempting to stabilize
the difficult financial circumstances they faced
in the winter of 1836–37, a council was called by
those who were opposed to Joseph Smith’s continuing in his office as prophet and president of
the Church.
On this occasion [Brigham Young] “rose up . . . in a
plain and forcible manner” and told them “that Joseph
was a Prophet, and I knew it, and that they might rail
and slander him as much as they pleased; they could
not destroy the appointment of the Prophet of God, they
could only destroy their own authority, cut the thread
that bound them to the Prophet and to God, and sink
themselves to hell.”
Some of those present reacted violently [toward
Brigham]. One Jacob Bump . . . fancied himself a
pugilist. While several held him back, he twisted and
turned, shouting, “How can I keep my hands off that
man?” “Lay them on,” responded Brigham, “if it will
give you any relief!”
But the man didn’t lay them on. A few nights
later Brigham heard a man running through the
Kirtland streets at midnight shouting loudly and
denouncing the Prophet Joseph. Even at that late
hour Brigham jumped out of bed, went into the
street and
jerked [the man] round, and assured him that if he
did not stop his noise, and let the people enjoy their
sleep . . . I would cowhide him on the spot, for we had
the Lord’s Prophet right here, and we did not want the
devil’s prophet yelling [up and down] the streets.
These were days of genuine “crisis,” he reported,
“when earth and hell seemed leagued to overthrow
the Prophet and the Church of God. The knees of
many of the strongest men in the Church faltered.”
But Brigham Young did not falter, yet before that
year was over his own life was in jeopardy for such
loyalty. On December 22 he said:
I had to leave to save my life. . . .
. . . I left Kirtland in consequence of the fury of the
mob, and the spirit that prevailed in the apostates, who
had threatened to destroy me because I would proclaim,
publicly and privately, that I knew by the power of the
Holy Ghost, that Joseph Smith was a Prophet of the
Most High God. [In Leonard Arrington, Brigham
Young: American Moses (New York: Alfred A.
Knopf, 1985), pp. 56–61 passim]
And what of Joseph Smith himself? Even as he
was being dragged away from his wife and children one more time, he said:
I am exposed to far greater danger from traitors among
ourselves than from enemies without. . . . All the
enemies upon the face of the earth may roar and exert
all their power to bring about my death, but they can
accomplish nothing, unless some who are among us and
enjoy our society . . . bring their united vengeance upon
our heads. [HC 6:152]
And bring their united vengeance they did.
Does a prophet of God deserve that from his
“friends?” What does one have a right to expect
from those who “enjoy our society?” (Remember
that Macbeth’s crime against his king is all the
more treacherous because Duncan was a guest
in Macbeth’s house.) Is it possible that each of
us who claims the privileges and benefits of the
kingdom of God will have our own fiery furnace
to pass through in which our loyalty is purified as
dramatically as it was for Shadrach, Meshach, and
Abed-nego? Is there some kind of battleground
out there ahead of us, some kind of moral Kirtland
or metaphysical Carthage that will yet give us our
chance to stand up and be counted, like the 2,000
stripling warriors of whom it was said, “They
were . . . true at all times in whatsoever thing they
were entrusted” (Alma 53:20)?
Your Word of Honor
With so much that so many have loyally given
to provide us with what we have, perhaps you can
imagine my disappointment when from time to
time a few who accept the university’s opportunity
and the Church’s significant financial contribution
then violate those standards of behavior and propriety and integrity to which each has voluntarily
agreed. And lest anyone be mistaken, please be
assured that I am not speaking just now of crowd
behavior at a ball game. I speak of a few clubs and
club members and others who brag of drinking
beer and partying like would-be prostitutes and
then seem absolutely amazed that they and their
groups are in terminal jeopardy at the university. I
speak of returned missionaries who violate temple
covenants, of a faculty member who violates the
tender testimony of a youth, of thieves on a campus that now must post warning signs in “high
theft areas” that are a disgrace to everything BYU
stands for. I speak of off-campus housing violations that see flagrant abuse of our moral standards where neither those guilty participants nor
their roommates display enough integrity to make
a wrong circumstance right. Though these may not
be committed on the field of battle nor result in the
death of a famous figure, they seem to me nevertheless villainy and treachery indeed—dishonesty
of a terribly destructive kind.
Karl G. Maeser, the first president of this
university, once wrote:
[My young friends,] I have been asked what I mean by
word of honor. I will tell you. Place me behind prison
walls—walls of stone ever so high, ever so thick, reaching ever so far into the ground—there is a possibility
that in some way or another I may be able to escape;
but stand me on the floor and draw a chalk line around
me and have me give my word of honor never to cross
it. Can I get out of that circle? No, never! I’d die first!
[West, Vital Quotations, p. 167]
At the start of a new calendar year and the
beginning of another important academic semester, may I invite you to examine your very soul,
to look deeply within your habits and inclinations and measure your loyalties against the
divine standard of our Savior, Jesus Christ. How
prepared are you for the difficult things you may
yet face in acquiring an education or serving a
mission or raising a family or defending your
beliefs? As preparation for the assault that will yet
be made upon your character and convictions, is it
hoping too much to see you cherish clear language
and clean entertainment and hard work and
disciplined behavior? If we were, this very hour,
in a fictional foxhole somewhere against an enemy
who put our eternal lives at risk, would I be safe
in your hands? Would you be safe in mine?
Sergeant Stewart
More than thirty years ago, about fifteen LDS
soldiers crowded into a frontline bunker in Korea
to hold a Sunday service. They used their canteen
cups and C-ration crackers to bless and partake of
the sacrament. Then they held a testimony meeting. One young man introduced himself simply
as Sergeant Stewart from Idaho. He was a short,
small man about 5 feet 5 inches tall and weighing
about 150 pounds. His great ambition had been
to become a good athlete, but coaches considered
him too small for most team sports. So he had
concentrated on individual competition and had
gained some success as a wrestler and a distance
runner. Sergeant Stewart related to his fourteen
battle-weary brethren an experience he had just
had with his company commander, a giant of a
man named Lieutenant Jackson who was 6 feet
7 inches tall and weighed 245 pounds; an outstanding college athlete. The sergeant spoke of
him in glowing terms as a tremendous officer and
a Christian gentleman, inspiring those who were
fortunate enough to serve under his command.
Shortly before the Church service in which
they now found themselves, Sergeant Stewart had
been assigned to a patrol under the direction of
Lieutenant Jackson. As they moved down near the
base of a hill they held, they were ambushed by
enemy fire. The lieutenant out in front was
riddled . . . by automatic small-arms fire. As he fell he
managed to drag himself to the shelter of a nearby rock
. . . while the rest of the patrol scrambled up the hill
to regroup.
Since he was next in command, the responsibility
now fell upon Sergeant Stewart. He [sent the] largest
and seemingly strongest man . . . down the hill to rescue
the lieutenant. The others would provide him with cover.
The man was gone for approximately half an hour,
only to return and report that he could not budge
the wounded officer—he was too heavy. . . . The men
started grumbling about getting out of there before
somebody else got hit. [Then] someone was heard to
say, “Let’s forget about the lieutenant; after all, he’s just
a [******]!” At this point Sergeant Stewart turned to his
men, and pulling himself up to his full 65-inch stature,
he spoke in very matter-of-fact tones: “I don’t care if
he’s black or green or any other color. We’re not leaving
without him. He wouldn’t leave any of us in similar
circumstances. Besides, he’s our commanding officer
and I love him like my own brother.”
Then he headed down the hill alone.
. . . When he finally reached [the lieutenant, the
officer] was weak from loss of blood, and he assured the
sergeant that it was a hopeless cause—there would be
no way to get him back to the aid station in time. It was
then that Sergeant Stewart’s great faith in his Heavenly
Father came to his assistance. He took off his helmet,
knelt beside his fallen leader and said, “Pray with me,
Lieutenant.” . . .
“Dear Lord,” he pleaded, “I need strength—far
beyond the capacity of my physical body. This great
man, thy son, who lies critically wounded here beside
me, must have medical attention soon. I need the power
to carry him up this hill to an aid station where he can
receive the treatment he needs to preserve his life. I
know, Father, that thou hast promised the strength of
ten to him whose heart and hands are clean and pure.
I feel that I can qualify. Please, Dear Lord, grant me
this blessing.”
Then he thanked his Father in Heaven for the
power of prayer and the privilege of holding the
priesthood. He then put on his helmet, reached
down and picked up his fallen friend, cradled him
over his shoulders, and carried him back up the
hill to safety. (From Ben F. Mortensen, “Sergeant
Stewart,” The Instructor, March 1969, pp. 82–83.)
Remaining True
Someone else ascended a difficult hill once—
with us cradled carefully on his shoulders. But
as Christ moved closer and closer to Calvary, his
defenders became fewer and fewer in number. As
the pressure mounted and the troubles increased,
he said:
There are some of you that believe not. For Jesus knew
from the beginning who they were that believed not, and
who should betray him. . . .
From that time many of his disciples went back, and
walked no more with him. [John 6:64]
Later, the Roman soldiers and the chief priests
came to capture him, “a great multitude with
swords and staves,” Matthew says. “Then all the
disciples forsook him, and fled” (Matthew 26:47,
56; emphasis added).
Enter Judas with the calculated kiss of betrayal.
We cannot know exactly what Judas was thinking nor why he chose the path he did. Perhaps he
did not think it would end that way. As William F.
May said:
[One who is disloyal] may not [have intended
malice]. . . . He may even be convinced that he accomplishes a certain good by his actions. In these cases, it
is well to be reminded that [some kinds of] betrayal
ha[ve] a way of producing results [far] beyond [our] . . .
control. [A sequence] more savage than [we] intended.
[I take a certain stand or make a certain speech
toward another], only wanting to see him cut down
to size, but I may live to see him get cut to ribbons. . . .
“When Judas, his betrayer, saw that he was condemned,
he repented and brought back the thirty pieces of silver
to the chief priests and the elders, saying, ‘I have sinned
in betraying innocent blood.’ They said, ‘What is that
to us? See to it yourself’” (Matthew 27:3–4). Precisely
because everything has been placed beyond the traitor’s
reach . . . , the sense of the irreversibility of it all is overwhelming. There is nothing left to be done. Judas hangs
himself, [perhaps] as an act of atonement . . . , but
[also perhaps] because no [act] of atonement—from
Judas—is [any longer] possible. [May, A Catalogue of
Sins, pp. 118–19]
Yet it is also here in this hour, in absolute and
utter loneliness, that loyalty to principle and love
for one’s brothers and sisters reaches its most
exalted and eternal manifestation. Sweating great
drops of blood from every pore and pleading
that the cup might pass, yet Jesus remains true,
submitting his will to that of his father and determined to do the work of the kingdom. Moments
later, with taunts and spit and scorn and jeers,
and spikes rending his perfect flesh, principle
triumphs over both passion and pain as the saving
sibling of us all prays for his brothers and sisters:
“Father, forgive them; for they know not what
they do” (Luke 23:34).
At this crucial time in your life, I urge you to
give your deepest loyalties to the highest causes in
eternity—those contained in the life and mission
and message of the Only Begotten Son of God. If
we can remain true there, with an eye single to
that standard, all other loyalties will fall naturally
into place. Inasmuch as we do not sing at the close
of these devotionals, perhaps you will forgive me
if I quote two verses from two hymns before our
benediction.
To all who wish to know heaven’s determination to stand by them in difficult times, we sing:
The soul that on Jesus hath leaned for repose
I will not, I cannot, desert to his foes;
That soul, though all hell should endeavor to shake,
I’ll never, no never, no never forsake!
[“How Firm a Foundation,” Hymns, 1985, no. 85]
And for the personal strength to stand true,
even in such times of personal pain, we sing more
privately to ourselves:
He has sounded forth the trumpet that shall never
call retreat;
He is sifting out the hearts of men before his
judgment seat.
Oh, be swift, my soul, to answer him; be jubilant
my feet!
Our God is marching on.
I say this in the name of Jesus Christ. Amen.

NAILING OUR COLORS

Man-Made Magic
We live in a most remarkable age. The scope
and magnificence of the daily events that swirl
around us are now so commonplace that we
scarcely note their presence or their passing.
Consider for example two events of this past
week. One week ago this morning, on Tuesday,
September 3, the space shuttle Discovery came
riding out of a desert sky barely tinted with the
light of sunrise and landed smoothly, silently on
the sands of Edwards Air Force Base, concluding
a weeklong experience that now seems almost
routine in space travel.
Does it impress anyone (besides me) that this
ninety-nine-ton spaceship has orbited the earth
before, that it repeatedly comes back to land safely,
picks up yet another payload, and will again be
launched beyond the earth’s gravity in the days
that lie just ahead? Ho hum.
Does it matter to anyone that this piece of
man-made magic—after traveling three million
miles in space—can touch down on a postage
stamp sketched in the dry lake bed of a California
desert, a landing strip totally invisible from
the Santa Monica freeway and the Carson City,
Nevada, frozen yogurt station? May I remind
you that there are 197 million square miles of
surface on the face of this planet onto which you
can mistakenly land—or sink, as the case may be.
What kind of a world is it—or should I say what
kind of worlds are we about to find—in which
that kind of technology, that kind of human
genius, that kind of masterful, modern miracle
can send up such a piece of equipment, fly it
around, and bring it home with more accuracy
than you and I find our automobile with after a
BYU football game?
Is anyone impressed that on this particular
flight James van Hoften and William F. Fisher
spent a casual weekend dangling in space
and repairing with their screwdrivers, pliers,
baling wire, and rubber bands an $85 million
Syncom IV‑3 satellite that had moved lifelessly in
orbit since its abortive launch four months ago?
“Never mind that there is an errant satellite up
there, Chief. E.T. and I will just Buck Rogers it up
into orbit, find that twenty-foot canister somewhere in all the grand immensity of space, sidle
up alongside with the old jet pack, and have her
beeping and flashing again in no time.” Easier
than a trip to the corner gas station. Columbus
I know and Balboa I know, but who are James
van Hoften and William F. Fisher?
Perhaps the amazement in all of this is greater
for me than it is for you—and maybe is for most—
because I am so mystified and unhandy at technical things. The only project I ever fully completed
in my high school shop class was a one-quart tin
cup, which, by the time I was through making it,
unfortunately had a large slash running down
the full length of it. It’s very awkward to hold a
quart of anything in a tin cup if it is running out
onto your pant leg more rapidly than you are able
to pour the new contents in. I did not get a good
grade on that cup, and I did not get a good grade
in the class. Very early on I left all technically
related matters to other folks.
So I invite your sense of awe and wonder and
appreciation for such a time in which we live, and,
as we start a new school year at Brigham Young
University, I also invite you to give thanks for the
God-given blessings and benefits we enjoy routinely, day after day, week after week, in a way
that has never been known by anyone, anywhere,
in any other era of the history of all mankind.
Who Would Have Dreamed?
It is in that spirit and with that sense of privilege and advantage that I comment on the rather
remarkable circumstances we presently enjoy
right here in good old Provo, Utah—Happy Valley,
U.S.A. Who would have dreamed in a thousand
years of dreaming—that takes us back squarely
into the shadow of the Dark Ages—that Brigham
Young University would ever have a national
championship football team and an overall athletic program ranked every year among the top
ten in the nation? Where else does a university
routinely enter its undergraduate coeds—year
after year—in the Miss America contest and, this
past year, claim the reigning queen? Where else—
and the answer is, of course, nowhere else—has
the Egyptian government chosen to work with
an American university to exhibit the legendary Ramses II materials? What will it mean for
you to be the students to see what your parents
never saw and your grandparents never dreamed
of seeing—artifacts from one of the richest and
most regal political and cultural dynasties in all of
ancient history, a dynasty linked with the wrenching exodus of the children of Israel from the grasp
of just such a pharaoh as this? What does it mean
for you to have the world’s attention focused on
your university as we strive to build world peace
and enhance international understanding in
Jerusalem—perhaps the most war-torn and brutalized piece of geography per square inch on the
face of the globe? And, of course, all of this says
nothing of the less publicized but often far more
important progress being made by the university
in every aspect and area of our academic life here.
Who would have dreamed this? Not I as a student
even twenty years ago, to say nothing of our academic forefathers who struggled just to keep the
university alive one hundred years ago.
But some dreamed the dreams, and a few saw
the visions.
“I Have Seen It All”
On Founders Day, five weeks from now, we will
have a commemorative reopening of the Karl G.
Maeser Building on this campus. If you have not
had a chance to walk to that lovely corner of our
hilltop acreage and see the spectacular job our own
physical plant and the construction companies
have done with this grand old building, please
do so. It was the first building built on what an
earlier generation called Temple Hill, built when
the dreams of a real university and all that it might
become were only dreams and indeed seemed to
some only fantasies those many, many years ago.
Where once only that building alone stood on this
hill, now think of nearly five hundred buildings
and the absolute splendor of every one of them.
Think of the beauty and capacity and availability and cleanliness of any one of the buildings
in which we meet, including this one, and then
remember this from our struggling first president.
With nothing but makeshift facilities and
depleted supplies, President Karl G. Maeser wrote:
“I am worn out and sick in spirit, . . . and with all
my love for this Academy, I feel that I owe it to my
very life, which is needlessly wearing itself out here
in an apparently hopeless task, to accept any change
that will promise me opportunities for permanent
usefulness.” . . .
[With] that he told his wife and daughter that
[because there seemed to be no real support for a
school here and] because he couldn’t earn enough . . .
to provide food and raiment for them and pay his debts
he was going to accept a position at the University
of Deseret, where he could get a regular salary and
adequately provide for his family. Accordingly his wife
and daughter got things packed—and then sat on their
trunks for [several] days, until his daughter finally
mustered enough courage to ask her father when they
were moving. His response . . . was, “I have changed
my mind. [We are not moving.] I have had a dream—
I have seen Temple Hill filled with buildings—great
temples of learning, and I have decided to remain and
do my part.”
Through the generosity of friends such as
Abraham O. Smoot, work eventually began for a
building on University Avenue and Fifth North.
Of this period Karl G. Maeser’s son wrote:
While the foundation of the new building had been
in course of construction, it had been a custom of [my
father], when at home on a Sabbath morning, to walk
up to the grounds and stand and gaze upon the work
so far done. . . .
. . . Once when he took [my sister] Eva with him
they stood upon the unfinished foundation, and the
child noticing some portions of the wall crumbling,
remarked, “Papa, do you think they will ever finish
this building?”
“My child,” answered the father, “not only this
building but others will stand upon this ground, and
not only here but also upon that hill yonder,” pointing
to Temple Hill. “Yes, my child, I have seen it all.“
The new academy building was dedicated on
the day on which Dr. Maeser was to sever his . . .
connection with the school [to become the commissioner of education in Salt Lake City]. There was
probably never a more impressive sight in the history of
the school than the triumphal march of students from
[the temporary quarters of] the old ZCMI warehouse
[downtown] to the new building. Before leaving the
warehouse, Professor Maeser called the students around
him, prayed with them, and told them that if they would
carry the spirit of their alma mater [not only into their
new school but] into all the walks of life, the Lord
would greatly multiply their joys.
Following the dedicatory prayer that day,
Brother Maeser gave a short farewell address that
included this simple statement of the educational
philosophy at Brigham Young Academy:
When to the students at the beginning of the experimental term, April 24, 1876, the words of the Prophet
Joseph Smith—that he taught his people correct principles and they governed themselves accordingly—were
given as the leading principle of discipline, and the
words of President Brigham Young—that neither the
alphabet nor the multiplication table was to be taught
without the Spirit of God—were given as the mainspring of all teaching, the orientation for the course of
the educational system inaugurated by the foundation
of this academy was made, and any deviation from
it would lead inevitably to disastrous results, and,
therefore, the Brigham Young Academy has nailed her
colors to the mast.
In a month when we pay tribute to Karl G.
Maeser, and in a year when we take on even
greater visibility as a university, I say again that
we have “nailed [our] colors to the mast.” We have
stated our principles of education based on the
gospel of Jesus Christ, “and any deviation from it
would lead . . . to disastrous results.” As we take
our increasingly significant and important place
in the world, it is absolutely imperative that we not
be of it. We have begun a space-age conversation
with a national and international audience that
earlier generations of students and faculty would
not have believed possible. In telling that story
we must not and will not forget those principles
and traditions and truths that have made Brigham
Young University what it is and that have brought
us to this moment.
Be Your Very Best
In my occasional locker-room contact with
Coach Edwards, I have heard him say something
time and time again to his players. He said it last
Saturday, and he will say it this Saturday. What
he says in effect is this: “Do not forget what got
you here. Don’t abandon the fundamentals we’ve
practiced for so long. Don’t let success or adversity
overwhelm you. Remain steady, play it our way.
That’s how we got where we are.” In that same
spirit we have to be Brigham Young University
and not any other. “Any deviation from [that]
would lead . . . to disastrous results.” Our majesty
and our mission is in our unique and special heritage. Please stand with me, as I stand with you, in
again nailing those colors to the mast—for another
magnificent year.
Work hard. With the background of our religious convictions there is no encouragement I
could give you at the start of a school year that
would matter more than for you to take your
academic work seriously and to study hard. It is a
more competitive time at BYU than it was twenty
years ago and certainly more than it was a century ago. There is so much to learn and so much
to be done. There are worlds out there waiting to
be explored. You must not come here to play. Too
much tithing is spent, too much sacrifice has been
given, and too many people are watching. “Eat the
bread [and] wear the garments of the laborer.”
Please learn to write well and to speak the
language with some precision. If it is not too
startling to you, may I announce, for example,
that at BYU the verb “go” is not synonymous
with the verb “say,” as in the conversation “I go,
‘Watcha doin’?’ and she goes, ‘Nothin’,’ and I go,
‘Let’s do somethin’,’ and she goes, ‘Sure.’“ That’s
too much goin’ and not enough saying. And the
writing from some of us is too often worse than
the speaking. If I have one overwhelming disappointment in my professional life as an educator,
it is the general inability I find in college-educated
people to write well. Edward R. Murrow once said
that Winston Churchill won the Second World
War by “mobiliz[ing] the English language and
send[ing] it into battle.” Perhaps it will help you
win your battles, or get a job, or change a nation.
The prophets of God have known that the impact
of the inspired, compelling word, spoken or written, is among the most powerful forces on earth.
You should discover that too. It has moved their
mountains. It will move some of yours. It will
illuminate your path. “In the beginning was the
Word,” and “God said, Let there be light: and
there was light.”
Be well groomed and dress appropriately. Our
dress and grooming standards are legendary
at BYU. In the six years I have been giving this
speech, I have tried not to harp on that or to make
it seem this was the only thing that mattered
here. It is, after all, only a small part of our very
important Code of Honor that you have all signed.
But your appearance is for us as some explain
baptism: ”it is an outward sign of an inward
grace.” I always notice carefully the comings and
goings on campus during these first few days
of each year, and I think almost all of you look
absolutely beautiful. But a very few need an early
reminder. Now all of you know that shorts, or
skimpy skirts, or grubby jeans, or extreme hairstyles, or sweat suits, or tank tops, or whatever are
simply not acceptable apparel on this campus. Be
modest, be dignified, and be your very best. More
and more, what it means to be at BYU is to be your
very best.
And now may I say that far more important
than looking clean is being clean. Perhaps no challenge is greater for your generation. As someone
recently wrote, “It is as if America is down on all
fours sniffing, and what she smells is a glandular
stench.” There is too much sexual transgression in
our society. There are too many exploitive movies seen and prurient videos watched and smutty
magazines read. There is too much obscene
language used, by men and women. It should
not surprise you that a university that sweeps its
walks and scrubs its floors and paints its buildings and shines its glass expects its students to be
clean—inside as well as out. I want to think we
are better in these matters than any other university in the world, but sometimes we are not; we
frequently fall too short. Any compromise tears a
piece of our flag from that mast. Any blemish on
one student’s behavior is a stain on us all. For your
sake and for Karl G. Maeser’s and for BYU’s, I ask
you to be clean.
The World’s Safest Ship
Now as I began, I spoke of two events during the
past week, and I mentioned one—the Discovery’s
successful flight. May I close with the second
reference, to another journey not so successful. A
week ago last Sunday, on September 1, 1985, Robert
Ballard, chief scientist for a joint U.S./French venture, became the first person in seventy-three years
to view the grave site of more than fifteen hundred
people whose final resting place lay on the cavernous floor two and a half miles below the surface
of the Atlantic Ocean. The Titanic was the biggest,
most luxurious, and supposedly the safest ocean
liner of all time—unsinkable, they advertised,
because of its double steel hull and waterproof
compartments.
The first-class register on that maiden voyage
read like a Who’s Who of American and European
society. The net worth of those passengers was estimated (in 1912) to be $250 million. And on the night
of April 14, 1912, nearly three-fourths of the trip
from Southampton was completed. New York was,
figuratively speaking, just a hop, skip, and a jump
away. It had been a great party on the high seas.
Now an iceberg is relatively small and occupies
so little space in comparison with the broad ocean
on which it floats. The chances of another small
object like a ship colliding with it and being sunk
are minute. Chances are, as a matter of fact, one in
a million. That’s not just a figure of speech. That
was the actual risk for total loss by collision with
an iceberg as accepted by insurance companies
in 1912. That one-in-a-million accident was what
sunk the Titanic. On the night of the collision she
was undoubtedly the safest ship afloat on any
of the world’s oceans. But her captain and her
crew were careless, perhaps simply too confident.
And so were her designers and her owners. The
result was that when the unbelievable had to be
believed, only seven hundred were saved. One
thousand five hundred thirteen of the others
rode the world’s safest ship two and a half miles
straight down—and then waited seventy-three
years to have Robert Ballard finally identify their
burial site for posterity.
Institutionally—and I suppose individually—
we have at our disposal the superb skills that in
their day fashioned the Titanic and in our own day
have fashioned the space shuttle Discovery. We
have before us a year in which each of us gets to
captain not only our own individual craft but we
also get to help steer the Good Ship BYU. I don’t
know about you, but in light of these two reminders from the week’s news, I vote clearly for the
option of navigating all the dimensions of our
dreams and all the outer reaches of our capability
with the care and caution and loyalty to basic principles that will, when our exploration is complete,
land us dead center, right on time, exactly where
we ought to be. I prefer that greatly to the equal
magnificence, splendor, and technical ability of
that other vessel now resting thirteen thousand
feet below the surface of the sea five hundred
miles south of Newfoundland, filled with people
who were led to believe it couldn’t happen to them.
This year and every year we intend to have
the best of all possible worlds at BYU. We intend
to exercise every privilege and pursue every
opportunity, but we will do it with discipline and
with care, with attention to detail, with everyone
helping, with no one compromising. We will nail
our “colors to the mast” and make gospel-centered
education work because it has to work; any deviation from our prophetic heritage “would lead . . .
to disastrous results.” We will, in this and every
year ahead, reach out and reach up, explore all we
can of the truth, and still safely land filled with
greater learning and faith on this narrow strip of
BYU soil under Y Mountain in Provo, Utah. We
will do our work successfully—and some of it we
will have to do with the whole world watching.
Know that I love you with all of my heart, and
God bless you to have a superb school year, in the
name of Jesus Christ, amen.

ON THE LORD'S ERRAND

My remarks this morning will be a little
different from those I have given in
years past. Each fall in this setting I have given
a report on several aspects of our university
work or discussed the ongoing cycle of our
administrative review or explained the allocation of resources or on and on and on. And
usually I have gone on and on and on.
My mood and my feelings lie in another
direction this morning, so I ask your indulgence if I just “chat” with you for a while about
matters that in some cases you yourselves have
suggested. For the first time, a reasonable portion of my remarks will come from your pen
rather than from mine. I have chosen to make
no reports today nor to discuss any of the substantial accomplishments or programs or areas
of improvement that we are pursuing. I do,
however, commend you for your devoted service and for the significant strides being made.
It is an absolutely thrilling time to be at BYU,
and I hope some of that joy marks every single
day of the year that lies before us—certainly it
is a joy for me to anticipate that year in your
company. I love you all very much and am so
thankful for your presence here, this morning
and always. I am stunned at the size and significance of the turnout every year. That, perhaps
more than anything else, is the most humbling
and most emotional ingredient in this weighty
responsibility that I feel every fall. I pray for
the ability to adequately represent you, not
only in these remarks, but for as long as I am
asked to serve in my present capacity.
Our theme for this year’s conference is taken
from section 64 of the Doctrine and Covenants,
verse 29:
Wherefore, as ye are agents, ye are on the Lord’s
errand; and whatever ye do according to the will of
the Lord is the Lord’s business.
I believe it is most significant and very
instructive that the first recorded words attributed to the Son of God in his mortality are
“Wist ye not that I must be about my Father’s
business?” (Luke 2:49). We probably would
do well to pause here, perhaps conclude, and
let that single line serve as a message for the
morning. That question (another of “the Lord’s
questions,” as Professor Dennis Rasmussen’s
recent book might suggest) surely must speak
volumes about who he is, what lies ahead of
him, and the ultimate measurement of his mission. And it just as surely must speak something of us, who have been invited to be about
the same business.The idea of the errand, the journey, the
odyssey, the assignment, is of course a most
significant one in the literary legacy that is
ours at a university.
. . . all experience is an arch wherethro’
Gleams that untravell’d world whose margin fades
For ever and for ever when I move.
How dull it is to pause, to make an end,
To rust unburnish’d, not to shine in use!
[Alfred, Lord Tennyson; Ulysses]
Whether it is slightly more pagan account of
Ulysses on his travels or the more traditionally
Christian pursuit of the Holy Grail, we have a
rich heritage of making the quest, of shouldering the task and seeking the prize, of pursuing the blessings that await the faithful and
persistent.
One of the seminal twentieth-century figures
in my field of American studies was Professor
Perry Miller, who seemed to capture the quintessential ingredient in the Puritan mission to
the New World in his magnificent lecture cum
essay given thirty years ago entitled “Errand
into the Wilderness.” In our own experience
we have been anxious to see the pioneer migration westward as an extension of that “errand”
(and that “wilderness”), believing very much
that in coming to these valleys we were doing
so with purpose, that our dreams would be
realized, that God’s promises to this dispensation would be fulfilled. And we still believe so.
I suppose, then, in the selection of our theme
this year I have wanted to suggest that BYU
could and rightfully should continue to ask
questions and set goals and assess progress
regarding that errand today, and do so believing that the start of another school year, at least
at this school, lets us be about one significant
part of the Lord’s business in this last quarter
of the twentieth century.
After five years (this is the start of our sixth
together) of wrestling and struggling and praying over ways—and the ability—to convey
to the university family the highest and best
purposes of our service together, at least as I
could be allowed to glimpse them, I thought
to expand both the blessings and the responsibility of such an opportunity regarding the
errand we are on at BYU. In an effort to do that
I invited you to write about the unique purposes and the possibilities of Brigham Young
University.
Part of my intention in doing that was to
broaden my own vision by reading of yours
and, if at all possible, to see where those shared
hopes and expectations come together for
many of us—ideally all of us—giving even
more community, and indeed more urgency, to
the magnificent opportunity I believe is ours.
Russ Osguthorpe began his essay, a fictitious
exchange of letters between two LDS faculty
members, one at BYU and one elsewhere, with
this preface: “Personal dreams are windows
into the soul. Dreams held in common are windows into the future.” I like that, Russ, and it
is dreams held in common that give unusual
strength to our future at BYU.
I am greatly heartened that there is a wonderful sense of community here—in the best
and most literal sense of that word—which
shares not only Russ Osguthorpe’s idea of
collective hopes but also draws on something
higher in that Latin root, something akin to
communion. I have, of course, always felt that,
and perhaps you have too. For many, that is
why you have chosen to be here when money
and professional advantage might well have
drawn you to so many other places. Certainly
these essays have reminded me of how very
much we value here and, in spite of our may
challenges, how sweet our association here
really is.
Lael Woodbury wrote of his return to BYU
after having once thought he couldn’t get far
enough away. In one of his paragraphs he said:
It is fashionable [with] some . . . to lament the
level of student and faculty curiosity, to characterize our conversation as trivial, implying, of course,
that the ambience is more intellectual [elsewhere].
That may be so. But I find here a peerless student
habit of discussing—and feeling free to discuss—
the question in class that [other] students discuss
only among themselves, if at all. It is startling, to
be sure, to have a student ask whether I think God
agrees with Aristotle, and whether Oedipus is a
good man. And my opinion changes from year to
year, I confess, perhaps because I change. But I’m
delighted with the question, and I laud students
who use that standard for discussion in my class.
Jay Fox wrote a delightful, at times even
rollicking, essay about his experience at a
Princeton seminar where thirty academic
colleagues from around the country were to
discuss what values the humanities should
espouse. Very early in the two-week period
Jay sensed the difficulty and disagreement that
was to pervade and ultimately doom their discussions in spite of the urging of leaders like
Harvey Cox who pled that college teachers be
“moral examples to their students,” leading to
a state wherein all educated people were citizens in the best Greek sense of the word, where
ideals were espoused, and every member of
the community assumed responsibility for
their protection and perpetuation.
But the haggling over what was worth
protecting and perpetuating was constant
and finally fatal. In the end nothing seemed
to qualify. Jay then writes:
As difficult a task as it might be to translate the
skillful teaching of moral reasoning into a humanities curriculum, I was reminded of the significant
position of strength that we at BYU bring to the
task: at least we have a fundamental belief in what
is and what is not moral. We start from a point of
reference, from a standard that transcends merely
human reasoning. As much as we take that simple
position for granted at BYU, it became apparent
[for those] two weeks at Princeton that that position is a luxury . . . not enjoyed by most of the other
members of the workshop. My observation is that
it is more difficult to foster faith than reason. The
universities of the world today abound with skillful
people of reason, but where are the people of faith?
. . . The group felt, as it were, “between two worlds,
one dead, the other powerless to be born,” a situation Matthew Arnold accurately described in the
nineteenth century as he saw the decline of a world
of traditional values with no empowered replacement evident.
The experience ended after two weeks
with a cocktail party that went on and on.
Jay, the only teetotaler present, played out the
humanities role to the end as the sole sober
chauffeur carting the other philosophers
home—somehow reaffirming for that group
A.E. Houseman’s early opinion that “Malt does
more than Molton can/To justify God’s ways
to man” (A Shropshire Lad, no. 62).
Reed Blake made and impassioned case
for the school of social work. Lee Farnsworth
wrote movingly of “Education as a Sacred
Activity.” Jim Allen shared the struggle of
reinforcing a student’s testimony with dependable pillars of faith. Wilfried Decoo, for whom
English is not a first language, made a marvelous case for the unique international perspective that we probably take for granted at BYU,
but which may not be reproducible to any
comparable degree on any other campus in
the world.
Ron Malan wrote a fine essay on some
“correct principles” by which we might
“govern ourselves” at a place like BYU. William
Andersen prodded the administration a little
in his essay “Faith and Education.” Glade
Hunsaker wrote in that lilting prose of his a
truly fine essay entitled “At BYU: A Secular
Profession or a Sacred Professing”—an essay,
by the way, which significantly influenced my
decision regarding the coming year’s topic. His
departmental colleague Doug Thayer wrote
an equally important piece, and so did Gerald
Haslam and Gary Bryner. Ron Simpson wrote a rather stunning appeal
for better music and entertainment to offset the
pervasively negative impact of so much that
our high school and college-age students face
at the present time. Just because it is such a
skillful first page, let me share with you Ron’s
first few paragraphs.
When I go over the story of Joseph West, my
grandfather, courting his reluctant Arizona beauty,
Lois Hunt, my grandmother, I always smile as I
visualize him bowing, helping her to her feet, and
dancing with her to the strains of “Put Your Little
Foot Right Out.”
And when I remember the story of Venice West,
my mother, telling Jerry Simpson, my father, that
he’d been something of a dummy assuming she
was in love with that other guy—and as I visualize
the summer night and the Los Angeles front porch
where it is supposed to have happened—much as I
try, I really can’t play the scene without the ukulele,
and without my mother’s voice singing, “Gimme a
Little Kiss, Will Ya, Huh?”
Of if I should remember Kristen, my eighteenyear-old daughter, rebounding last year from the
heartbreaking end of her first infatuation, the image
wouldn’t be complete without the top-forty hit that
helped her sing her way through it: “Ain’t Nothin’
Gonna Break My Stride,” and I feel so glad we’ve
had these little popular songs that mirror our emotions, chronicle the events of our lives, and express
our feelings when words alone are inadequate.
Then the smile disappears and he tackles
the problem: “How sad it is that the entertainment industry has allowed its product to go so
wrong so often.”
Rick Brimhall gave a moving review of
the work of the Benson Institute and Reed
Bradford wrote so lovingly of his life and his
faith in a remarkable career at BYU Because
I have loved him for so long and because of
some of the present circumstances, I guess
Brother Bradford’s essay was most poignant
of all for me.
Perhaps no essays should have been mentioned in this way because all were so deserving of citation and of reward. I note these very
few—thinking even now of others I should
mention—just to share something of the rich
experience this was for me, and for what it
does say about our “dreams held in common”
here. From Sister Helen Andreason’s one-page
impression of an early morning moment in the
empty Harris Fine Arts Center to Bruce Brown
and Warren Icke’s twenty-one-page piece, all
were provocative and appreciated, whatever
the length and whatever the lesson. Let me
share just a few more excerpts for a collective
view of the Lord’s errand here.
The first is from Robert Goodall, who speaks
today, at least in part, for an entire roomful of
you who serve so quietly and so well as supportive staff to the classroom and laboratory
experience. As I noted earlier, Robert is assistant supervisor of custodial services at BYU.
He writes:
Our faculty should be commended [for its excellence. Surely there can’t be a finer academic
group anywhere.] But the challenge [to excel]
was not given to the faculty alone. Even those of
us who are not educators per se have accepted the
challenge to strive for that admirable goal. They
are the custodians, grounds keepers, electricians,
carpenters, painters, plumbers, and auto mechanics. They work in the heating plant. They are the
architects, accountants, upholsterers, and so many
others who often contribute above and beyond the
call of duty. These are physical contributions, seen
immediately and evident to all. As visitors arrive on
our campus, they often comment on the beauty of
the grounds. As they view the building, they marvel
at the architecture, and time later time they refer to
the cleanliness of the building. The care given these
surroundings makes these buildings temples of
learning, [often] named for apostles and prophets of
the Lord. Here, of all places on earth, we should be
able to observe how the world might be if excellence
were its goal. . . [I was taught the gospel by two missionaries and was baptized into] a small branch of the
Church in northwestern Ontario. . . .
I dreamed of a faraway Zion, a place In the West
called Utah, and I hoped that one day I would see
that place so important to me as a new convert. In
the Church magazines I would read of a university
owned and operated by our church, a university
dedicated to the same gospel ideals that those missionaries taught. How would it be to live in such a
place? Pictures of templed hills, chapels, universities, and well-kept homes flashed unceasingly before
my eyes. But mine was to be a much different experience, for we met in the modest surroundings of a
house [which served as our] chapel. . . . There was
no beautiful architecture making the building conducive to the attitude of worship and [there was]
no steeple drawing the gaze heavenward. . . .
What I would have given at that time to have
met in a lovely edifice built with worship in mind,
where my non-LDS friends could have come and
been awed by the Church I belonged to. As years go
by I find myself embarrassed by [those] presumptuous desires [then] for something far better than that
which we had.
[Now, looking back on that experience, I
realize that] though our church house may have
been small and plain, I cherish the fond memories of
that sacred spot. . . . I reflect on the care we gave to
the grounds, the edging, the mowing, the planting
of flowers. Inside we dusted and cleaned. The smell
of furniture polish floated freely on the cool spring
breeze making it all so clean and fresh. The windows
sparkled like crystal in the sunlight. No temple custodians could care for their grounds with any more
affection than did we. . . .
. . . In retrospect . . . I am now grateful for
having had that experience which allows me to
appreciate even more profoundly the buildings on
this campus and give them that special treatment
I could only dream of giving as a youth.
In this important hour opening a new school
year, let me seize on Robert’s introduction to
thank all of you, including those in plain and
unheralded positions, who provide the support
for the massive educational mechanism that
the modern BYU has become. We love every
one of you and could not succeed without you.
And because Robert spoke of his own
dreams, may I add two more excerpts noting
other visions of our task.
First this from Bruce Brown and Warren
Icke:
In December of 1910, some BYU students told
George Brimhall, the third president of the university, that they “had quit praying because they
had learned in school that there was no real God
to hear them.” Soon after that President Brimhall
dreamed a dream of “snow-white birds circling
among the clouds.” He watched as the birds were
attracted to baited hooks, which were attached to a
large machine being operated by some BYU professors. As the birds were pulled to the ground, they
were transformed into grieving students garbed in
ancient Greek costumes. He went to the students
and asked them why they were so unhappy. They
told him they were sad because they would never
fly again.
Then after discussing the unique challenge
of that moment in BYU’s history, the writers
say:
There is a world of difference between apprenticeship and discipleship. We don’t need academic
discipleship. We are already disciples of Jesus
and believers in his words through the prophets.
Personality cults and academic discipleship are
always a constriction of the scholarly community.
The problem with the crusade of the Petersons and
the Chamberlins was not that it taught the students
too much but . . . too little. It focused on only one
of many possible approaches to the “science and
religion” question, and with an air of authority and
finality that won many over. But there was little
independence of thought. . . .
Truly, a little knowledge is a dangerous thing.
There is much less chance of this kind of error in a community of scholars that ranges broadly in the
world of ideas with access to a diversity of sources.
Making a broader sweep in our research and reading allows us to extend the dialogue of our academic
community to the world’s greatest minds, beyond
the barriers of continents and centuries. . . .
[At the same time] one must be cautious in
advocating excellence. Zion will not be built by the
drive to surpass one’s neighbor. This kind of excelling has a secular ring to it. It implies interpersonal
comparison, achievement primarily in relative terms
by outperforming some implied group of others. If
one is seeking knowledge or scholarsly excellence for
the purpose of gaining power, wealth, or recognition,
that work will fail. The laborer in Zion shall labor
for Zion. If he labors for money he shall perish. And
laboring for scholarly recognition is no more noble.
“Keep your riches,” said Brigham Young, “and
with them I promise you leanness of soul, darkness
of mind, narrow and contracted hearts.” Likewise a
dullness of spirit comes upon one who has begun to
learn the mysteries of the kingdom and then turns
away to devote his whole soul to academic achievement. The search for truth is much bigger than that.
And this from Gene England. After
comparing Brigham Young’s thought with
the lamentable circumstances facing much of
higher education today, he writes:
To succumb, at BYU, to our critics’ insistence
that we “grow up,” come into the “wonderful”
twentieth century, and become a “real university” is to sell our birthright for a mess of national
rankings—and for a depreciated one-sided view of
the possibilities of education. One commentator
recently asserted, “BYU can claim to be a university only if it acts as one and follows a basic rule of
inquiry: no truth claim is so absolutely final and
certain that it cannot be exposed to the process of
rational inquiry.” [Despite the] trouble [some
leaders at BYU and the Church have had and
still might have] with that assertion . . . , I am
convinced Brigham Young would accept it with
alacrity. [But] he would also insist on the other side
of the paradox [as] something like this: “No process
of rational inquiry is so certain or complete that it
cannot be exposed to the challenge of absolute truth
claims and processes of verification given from
God.” Despite the opposition of modern secularist
educators, in and out of the Church, Brigham Young
would insist that a complete higher education worthy of that name—and of the consecrated tithing
resources of the Church—must try, however difficult it will always be, to maintain both values. . . .
Brigham Young, I believe, cares about this institution and continues to watch over it—patient,
perhaps amused by our struggles, hoping we can
slowly come up to his vision. Most of you know that
despite his close supervision of he building of the
St. George Temple, he was not its designer and in
fact disliked acutely and vocally the small original
tower, which offended his carpenter’s eye as badly
out of proportion. He did not embarrass the local
craftsmen by directly insisting on a change, but on
August 16, 1878, about one year after Brigham’s
death, his voice seems to have been heard. The tower
was struck by lightning and, though the temple was
miraculously preserved from burning, the tower
was badly damaged—and was replaced by a much
larger one. [A few] of you may know that also in
1878, not long after Brigham’s death, he visited
Karl Maeser in a dream and took him on a tour
of a large building, with many rooms and a spacious assembly hall. Maeser, on waking, drew the
floor plans for the building in some notes about the
dream and put them away until six years later when
the old Academy building was destroyed by fire. He
remembered the notes and used the plans to design
the new Academy Building that became the center
of BYU for fifty years. Brother Brigham could still
be our best architect.
Perhaps the single most pervasive scriptural theme identified and quoted and finally
exalted by the Puritan fathers coming to the
New World was Matthew 5:14–15:
Ye are the light of the world. A city that is set on
a hill cannot be hid.Neither do men light a candle, and put it under a
bushel, but on a candlestick; and it giveth light unto
all that are in the house.
Using the latter of these two verses, William
Bradford said in that still remarkable piece of
Puritan writing Of Plymouth Plantation:
Thus out of small beginnings greater things
have been produced by His hand that made all
things of nothing, and gives being to all things that
are; and, as one small candle may light a thousand,
so the light here kindled hath shone unto many, yea
in some sort to our whole nation. [Chapter 21]
Governor John Winthrop, who followed
Bradford’s 1620 group to Massachusetts Bay
just ten years later, said from on board the
Arbella as they searched for a glimpse of the
New England coastline and anticipated the
errand they were now to begin:
For we must consider that we shall be a city
[set] upon a hill. The eyes of all people are upon
us, so that if we shall deal falsely with our God in
this work we have undertaken, and so cause Him
to withdraw His present help from us, we shall
be made a story and a byword through the world.
[A Model of Christian Charity (1630), a sermon
delivered on board the Arbella]
Now Brother H. Smith Broadbent did not
know that I was going to refer to people like
Bradford and Winthrop and their preoccupation with Matthew 5:14, but just the same he
conveniently entitled his essay “A City Set
Upon a Hill.”
There is something special in those near the
culmination of their careers passing the torch
on to the next generation. That, too, had meaning for the Puritans with their “Errand into the
wilderness.” Would the next generation be serious enough about the Lord’s business? That
one plaintive question shaped the nature and
course of that first century on New England
soil more than any other.
Writes Professor Miller:
[The election sermons of the seventeenth
century in New England] show by their titlepages alone—and, . . . infinitely more by their
contents—a deep disquietude. They are troubled
utterances, worried, fearful. Something has gone
wrong. As in 1662 Wigglesworth already was
saying in verse, God has a controversy with New
England; He has cause to be angry and to punish
it because of its innumerable defections. They say,
unanimously, that New England was sent on an
errand, and that it has failed.
To our ears these lamentations of the second
generation sound strange indeed. We think of the
founders as heroic men—of the towering stature
of Bradford, Winthrop, and Thomas Hooker—who
braved the ocean and the wilderness, who conquered
both, and left to their children a goodly heritage.
Why then this whimpering?
[Perhaps it was because] the second and third
generations suffered a failure of nerve; they weren’t
the men their fathers had been, and they knew it.
Where the founders could range over the vast body
of theology and ecclesiastical polity and produce
profound works like the treatises of John Cotton or
. . . [Thomas] Hooker, or . . . Nathaniel Ward . . .
[or] Roger Williams [while] all [their] children
could do was tell each other that they were on probation and that their chances of making good did not
seem very promising. [Perry Miller, Errand into
the Wilderness, an address (Williamsburg: The
William and Mary Quarterly for The Associates
of the John Carter Brown Library, 1952),
pp. 3–4]
I choose to see Smith Broadbent’s and Reed
Bradford’s and Bill Dyer’s and a half-dozen
other essays by our most senior colleagues as
a call to the next generation—“our” generation
so to speak—asking us not to lose our nerve.
We need to be the men and women these associates (and our LDS ancestors) were.In that spirit Brother Broadbent begins with
a personal experience:
My wife and I first met Trudi Hoffman [(not
her real name) when I was] spending six months
as a guest professor in a German university where
she was then working as a secretary. Trudi is a
very bright, well-educated, widely traveled, . . .
German woman of approximately our own age. She
was proud to have been personally, albeit adventitiously, recognized by Hitler in her youth as a
model German fraulein, and she was more than
a little chauvinistic. Nevertheless, she had married a Jewish-American diplomat and had lived
for ten years in the U.S. during her early married
years. Life for Trudi had provided its full share of
problems: family tragedies during and immediately
following World War II; her marriage and divorce;
her only child, a son, ungrateful and abusing drugs;
and exploitative male friends. Thus she acquired a
heavy, protective patina of cynicism and worldliness. A less likely candidate to be touched by the
Spirit could scarcely be imagined.
She came to visit us following several weeks
spent with her son in San Francisco and with
friends there and in Berkeley and Oregon. She
didn’t come to visit because of any interest in the
Church, although she knew, of course, that we
were LDS. She came because she had the typical
German love for nature. She knew we lived in the
relatively sparsely populated and unspoiled Central
Rockies, and we loved nature too. She was amiable, naturally, but she kept her guard up letting
us know diplomatically, but firmly, that she really
wasn’t interested in our culture or religion. She
maintained the barrier essentially intact through
nearly a week in spite of attending Sunday services,
which puzzled her, and enjoying a Labor Day family
reunion with us, complete with a multitude of small
grandchildren under foot, which offended her convictions about strict population control, although
she was solicitous of the tiny ones, and I think she
was secretly envious of our large family.
But all the barriers came tumbling down, precipitously—the worldliness and the cynicism—after
her tour of our campus in the company of my wife
and under the guidance of the Hosting Center. . . .
During lunch [with my wife and me] she decided
she wanted to repeat the tour, this time alone.
Perhaps she doubted her initial impressions or
feared the experience was just a fluke. . . . After all,
she wasn’t born yesterday. She had been on many
college campuses for extended periods in many
places. But the second tour confirmed the first. She
was truly impressed, almost against her will. There
were several factors: the personable young man at
the Hosting Center who happened to speak excellent German, the beautiful campus, the buildings
([she] is something of an authority on architecture
and once worked as secretary for Ludwig Mies
van der Rohe), the retrospective slideshow, but the
overwhelmingly dominant fact was the transparent
wholesomeness, love, and goodwill, truly the light
of Christ shining through the countenances of the
people she encountered. It permeates our environment and conditions every human relationship in
work, play, and worship. However imperfect, to a
considerable degree it does model those “Zion” societies celebrated in the scriptures, old and new. . . .
It made me half ashamed to realize that I had
become so accustomed to it that I had allowed
myself to become a little cynical, insensitive, and
unappreciative, and that it took a person from
“another world” to refocus my attention. It made
me proud once more to be a part of BYU. . . .
I first became overtly aware of the profound
influence of BYU in my life as a young high school
student in our small, isolated, predominantly
Latter-day Saint community in northern Arizona.
Most of our graduates attended Arizona colleges,
and indeed, as a result of winning a statewide
public speaking contest, I was offered a scholarship
to the University of Arizona, no mean inducement to an impoverished farm boy with few other
prospects. Scholarships were very scarce in those
days. Some of my teachers, and even my bishop,
who was one of them and a University of Utah
graduate, incidentally, counseled me to go to the
University of Arizona. But the teachers who had the
greatest influence upon me were BYU graduates, [they were] my science and my agricultural teachers, who had been students, respectively, of two of
BYU’s greatest teachers, Joseph K. Nicholes and
Thomas L. Martin. My consuming passion since
the seventh grade had been the study of chemistry,
and they arranged for me to acquire a full-year’s
credit in college chemistry at BYU by examination
and demonstration before I ever left home. Thus
it transpired in due time that I arrived in the back
of a pickup truck at the steps of the old Education
Building, green and scared, nearly penniless, but
eager to begin my college education. I endured the
trauma of poverty and homesickness, but I have
never regretted my decision to attend BYU.
When I left with my baccalaureate degree to
begin graduate study elsewhere, it was with no
thought that I might ever return. Consequently,
it was a considerable surprise when on the eve of
receiving my Ph.D. degree I received a telephone
call offering me a position on the BYU faculty. I had
already accepted an appointment as a Milton Fund
post-doctoral research fellow at Harvard University,
and I had several very tempting offers designed to
take effect at the end of that appointment, one to
the faculty of my graduate alma matter. All of them
by any standard of the world offered far more than
BYU—more than twice as much. I was ambitious
and prospects for professional achievement at BYU
seemed dim; yet we knew fellow Mormons on faculties of eastern universities who had lost their entire
families from the Church, partly at least, we felt,
due to lack of sufficient LDS influence in their lives.
Other factors were involved, of course, but one
could not lightly dismiss any major positive influence on a growing family. My wife was supportive,
as she has always been, of whatever major decision
of this kind I should make. I was torn. My graduate
professors regarded returning to BYU as professional suicide. On the other hand, it seemed to me,
none of my undergraduate college, high school, and
public school mentors, to whom I owed so much,
had chosen their place of employment primarily for
personal advantage. In retrospect, I think, I never
wavered in my emotional commitment to BYU, but
I could not escape the nagging feeling that rational
analysis dictated otherwise. In any event we did
finally choose to return to share the fortunes of a
BYU just emerging from the rigors of the World
War II years, and here we have remained to make
a career and to rear our family in spite of renewed
offers to go elsewhere. We will be eternally grateful
for having made those decisions. . . .
. . . Let it be stressed that inasmuch as our world
is becoming increasingly hostile to religious values,
there needs to be a place where these values can be
legally taught and supported in a “respectable” academic environment as well as in church and religion
classes. BYU is, and should become even more than
it now is, such a place. We need never be ashamed
of truth, however unpopular. Truth is academically
respectable because it will endure the most searching and academic analysis. Thereby the increasingly
fatuous, but nevertheless widely accepted, sophistries of the world may be combatted. Now, I fear, “the
world is too much with us; late and soon.” Focusing
too heavily on worldly values “we lay waste our
powers.”. . .
[And we have so very much in common
here.] Obviously, one would not expect [an athletic] coach to explain the intricacies of the Hundred
Years’ War to a player, but he might appropriately
suggest that the study of history has much to teach
about winning strategies and life in general besides
being just plain interesting. Moreover, I suggest
that the player, after overcoming his initial astonishment, would be more likely to believe his coach’s
assessment of the value of history than that of his
history professor. The example and the testimony of
either the coach or the history professor about the
value of sacrament meeting attendance is at least as
likely to influence the player as is that of his bishop.
Such suggestions could be easily multiplied far
beyond the possible scope of this essay. Suffice it to
say that ample possibilities exist for those in every
realm of the university to augment and sustain the
mission of those in every other realm and yet remain
within the province of one’s own knowledge and
experience. Such effort will naturally require a considerable measure of humility. One’s own realm is
obviously not necessarily more important than any
other, even if he. . . did choose it. It may not even be
as important—not all realms are inherently equally
important— but the esteem of all is vital so long
as they are part of the officially ordained university
program. None can say to the other, “I have no need
of thee.” God loves a humble heart. It will be a prerequisite to receiving the needed inspiration.
God grant that we receive it.
With just this brief sample of wonderful
expressions from so many of you, may I close
with just a personal thought or two of my own.
The last forty-five days have been as difficult
and demanding—hour in, hour out; day in,
day out—as any comparable period I’ve ever
known in my life. Some problems, inevitably
involving time and counsel with our trustees
in Salt Lake City, have consumed all day, every
day, and yet the mail still had to be answered,
the telephone calls returned, that portion of
the university’s work done that only I could
do. Occasionally the tasks through the night
seemed almost indistinguishable from those
through the day. Through a couple of the worst
of those periods I slept where I could, when I
could, and looked like it. The thought of school
starting was about as appealing as joining the
law faculty and the chemistry department in
their “fun run” and cholesterol chase. I wondered where the summer had gone, as many
of you have, and worried that I would not be
ready.
But then Dennis Rowley, our wonderfully
able colleague in the Harold B. Lee Library,
sent me a letter that Franklin S. Harris had
written to the faculty as they started school in
much this same kind of setting fifty-six years
ago. It suggested that other presidents had
chaotic schedules too, and surely they had.
President Harris was writing from his boat,
“On the Amur River between Siberia and
Manchuria,” under the date of August 25,
1929.
To the Faculty of BYU,
Dear Colleagues:
I am reminded that yesterday the Alpine
Summer school closed and that the autumn quarter
will be opening by the time a letter can arrive there.
Since I cannot be present at the opening of school I
am sending you this word of greeting. I should like
very much to write each of you an individual letter
in regard to your work and to tell you of some of the
interesting things regarding this far-away land, but
the pressure to finish our work here before the time
we must leave starts the day at 5 and continues it
well into the night. This leaves me very little time
for correspondence, but it is Sunday evening and
I am going to take time off to what I want to do—
visit with you.
As I look around the faculty room in my imagination I see you all in your places. Some who have
been way have returned to make us happy by their
presence. A few will be away this year, but even
these I see in their places. What a wonderful group
it is! How fortunate I feel myself in the opportunity to associate with you! How happy I shall be to
return to your midst.
I wish that we might have a little gathering of
the faculty members and our families here on the
boat this evening. The night is perfect, the moon is
just rising from behind the Hingan mountains out
across the Amur basin. . . .
. . . Day before yesterday we finished a 7 days
trip on horseback through [those] mountains most
of the way through little known areas without trails.
. . . Kiefer developed a good deal of skill in helping
his horse out of sphagnum swamps and over fallen
timber. I on the other hand, learned to talk Dutch
to Cossack guides who would put their instinct
for direction against the compass. In the end I
still believe in instruments of precision as against
guessing. . . .
Before the mountain trip we spent three weeks
exploring along the railroad using the private car
of the president of the railroad as our base. . . . We
have spent but one day in an automobile—a Dodge
truck—and it had to be pulled all the way by a
track-laying tractor. This is the rainy season hereand there are no hard roads, hence automobiles do
not function. . . .
Both Kiefer and I shall be glad to turn our faces
westward in less than a month. We already have
about 20,000 miles of travel to our credit on this
trip and we must travel more than halfway around
the world to get home. . . .
We keep in the best of health in spite of mosquitoes, gnats, and other pests. . . . Affectionately your
colleague,
F.S. Harris. [Letter, BYU Archives]
I took a wonderfully strange consolation in
that letter, realizing that I have had to endure
neither Cossack guides nor Dodge trucks in
my recent assignments. I have felt the stress of
unexpected travel, faced some serious questions at home and abroad, and dealt with BYU
problems—some of which you would know
much about and other problems about which
you probably know nothing. But I am free of
“mosquitoes, gnats, and other pests.” And
thanks to you, school keeps on with or without
much encouragement or even the personal
presence of the university president. But, like
President Harris, I say, “What a wonderful
group it is! How fortunate I feel myself in the
opportunity of associating with you! How
happy I shall be to return to your midst.”
With that democratizing reminder from
President Harris may I try to share a personal
feeling stemming from these recent and highly
publicized events in Jerusalem. There is no way
I can adequately share with you the details or
drama of such a confrontational and challenging experience. I’ve even tried to write something of it in a journal (a practice about which
I am sinfully haphazard) but I find myself
unable to write what was, for the most part,
an ineffable range of emotions and an undeniable sequence of revelations. May you today
and posterity hereafter forgive those kinds of
omissions in the BYU history of the 1980s.
Near the end of one of those periods to
which I have just referred in which most of
the working day was spent in Salt Lake City
receiving very sensitive incoming information
and trying to communicate equally sensitive
forms of response, I returned home at about
eight o’clock, as I recall, to have a bite of food
with my wife who had (as always) fed the
children and then waited to eat with me. We
talked briefly of my now inevitable trip to
Jerusalem within just a few days at best, and
then I opened my briefcase to yet another
day’s paperwork demanding attention. I was
somewhere in the midst of that at about 10:00
p.m. when a call came from Church headquarters asking if I could verify that David
Galbraith, resident director of our Jerusalem
Study Abroad Program, had in fact been shot
and killed. That kind of inquiry would, of
course, be stunning under any circumstances,
but given the sequence of experiences and
kinds of concerns we had been facing, I felt as
if I had been hit fully in the face with a pickax.
I muttered something about having absolutely
no knowledge of any such thing and asked
where or how it had been reported. I was told
that two international journalists had made
direct inquiry to the Church Office Building,
one call originating from Paris and the other
one in New York. My first thought was that
those journalists were far enough away from
Jerusalem and from each other to indicate that
something was on the wire services, news not
likely to be sent without some basis in fact. My
heart simply sank to the depths of my soul. I
said I would find out everything I could and
would try to get information back to President
Hinckley and the two other trustees who had
been informed.
And so I began a terribly urgent series of
phone calls, praying throughout that this early
information was in error. What I did not realize, or at least had not been conscious enough
to be concerned about, was that my youngest
son, on a summer’s night, was still awake and
playing nearby as I took that call and pursued
its question. From time to time it has not been an easy
thing for our children to lead the presidential
lifestyle I have thrust upon them. I suppose for
all the blessings that go with that—and there
have been a host of them, far outweighing any
occasional disadvantages—some of these concerns have nevertheless taken a bit of a toll on
this eleven-year-old. He has never, for example,
forgotten the time early in my administration
when my life was threatened on Homecoming
Day, and the precautions that had to be taken
to ride in a parade and move in a crowd and
participate in a football game without concern.
He is a bright child who watches the news and
reads the papers and knows of the problems
many children have faced, and often enough
the children of conspicuous parents. It has, on
some of those occasions, been hard for him to
sleep alone, a burden for which I feel a terrible
sense of responsibility. Now, without my being
sensitive enough to have realized it would be
so, the nightmare was starting for him again.
While I spent the next twenty or thirty minutes trying to locate David or anyone else in
Jerusalem who could (we prayed) disavow this
report, Duffy had been at my side and watched
my face and sensed the concern in my voice.
Slowly he had left the room, but it did not take
his quick little mind long to think and finally to
say that if David Galbraith had been shot and if
I were to leave within hours to go there myself,
they would surely be proud and planning to
shoot the president of the place. In an explosion of tears and fright, he ran up the stairs to
his room and fell sobbingly on his bed.
Pat went to attend to him while I stayed on
the phone long enough to find out that all was
indeed well and that somehow we had again
been victims of a cruel and calculated hoax. I
reported that to those who were concerned in
Salt Lake City and then took counsel with my
colleagues here about responding to the press.
By this time it was nearly midnight, and somehow I could not bring my mind back to that
stack of papers tumbling out of my briefcase.
I, too, headed upstairs, without the tears but
thinking it wasn’t a bad idea.
Duffy was long since asleep. Pat was, as
always, waiting for me, and we prepared for
bed in that rather sober silence couples know
when sleep is the best solution and talk—even
important talk—seems best postponed for a
better time.
Before we knelt together in prayer as we’ve
done for twenty-two years of marriage, I kept
alive another tradition, exhausted as I felt, by
opening the covers of the standards works to
read a passage of scripture—any passage—
which might suggest counsel and offer consolation through the dreams and deliverance of
the night. I opened the scriptures at random
and my eye was as instantly riveted to a single
passage of scripture as I had ever experienced
in my life. It was as if no other verse existed on
the page and as if there were no other pages. I
had only known section 25 of the Doctrine and
Covenants as revelation to Joseph Smith’s wife
Emma, principally regarding the writing of a
hymnal for the Church, but with a concentration as crisp as a heat-seeking missile I saw
these words alone before me on an otherwise
white page:
A revelation I give unto you concerning my will;
. . . if thou art faithful and walk in the paths of virtue before me, I will preserve thy life, and thou shalt
receive an inheritance in Zion. [D&C 25:2]
I knew in a flash of irrefutable revelation
that this had been given not for my reassurance
but for my son, and although quite literally the
thought of harm to myself had never seriously
crossed my mind, it had troubled me deeply
that it had so severely affected this child. I shot
out of the room, prayer still yet to be uttered,
my wife bedazzled, and went straight to the
side of my boy’s bed. The faint purity of his
youthful tears in my behalf were still on his
cheeks and his pillow. Although I’m not sure
he understood what I was doing (and for all intents and purposes remained sound asleep
through the whole conversation), I woke him
up with the zeal of a new convert and read him
the passage of scripture I’ve just read you. I
told him the revelation had come for him and
that little boys’ prayers are often more readily
heard than their dads’, perhaps because they
are more loyally and trustingly uttered. Then
I rocked him in my arms and talked aloud to
no one in particular about the faith of a child
and the promises of God and “an inheritance
in Zion.” I might have read him of the inherent
safety in these words: “Wherefore, as ye are
agents, ye are on the Lord’s errand; and whatever ye do according to the will of the Lord is
the Lord’s business” (D&C 64:29).
I’m conscious that being on the Lord’s
errand is not always an easy assignment, that
being about his business involves sorrows as
well as joys, discouragement, and pain, as well
as eternal life. I’m aware that on the Lord’s
errand some in that train of prairie schooners
are, as President J. Reuben Clark said, of the
“last wagon”:
Last [in part], because . . . father took a little longer
to yolk his cattle and to gird himself for the day’s
labor; last, because his morning prayers took a few
more minutes than the others spent,—he had so
many blessings to thank the Lord for and some special blessings to ask the Lord to grant, blessings of
health and strength, especially for his wife . . . and
for the rest, and then the blessings for himself that
his own courage would not fail, but most of all for
the blessing of faith. [J. Reuben Clark, Jr., To Them
of the Last Wagon (Salt Lake City: Deseret News
Press, 1947), p. 11]
To all of you who mean so much to me and
to Brigham Young University, please know that
I believe your prayers, your pleas, and your
faithful efforts are recorded by the very angels
of heaven and that there is peace at the end of
our “errand into the wilderness.”

A ROBE, A RING, AND A FATTED CALF

Recently I was invited by President Bishop
of the Missionary Training Center to
address the nearly two thousand missionaries
in residence there. I accepted because I always
assume it is impossible to give a poor talk at
the MTC. They will take notes and make scriptural cross-references if you read them the telephone directory. Plus I love to hear them sing.
So I went.
The Missionary
Following prayers, hymns, announcements
and introductions, I gave them a rousing fortyminute reading of the telephone directory,
proving that indeed one can give a poor talk
to these missionaries. But, generous Christians
that they are, several came up following my
remarks to visit briefly and discuss my message. (Actually most of them either wanted
tickets to a basketball game or to complain
about the parking ticket “hold” that Financial
Services had put on their temple recommends.)
I visited with many of them and the minutes
stretched into many minutes and then finally
into nearly an hour. During that time I noticed
one young elder hanging around the outer rim
of the circle as all the other missionaries came
and went.
Finally the traffic thinned out, and he
stepped forward. “Do you remember me?” he
asked.
“No,” I said, “I’m sorry I don’t. Tell me your
name.”
He replied, “My name is Elder ___________.”
His eyes searched mine for recognition, but I
just didn’t know who this young man was.
Summoning his courage for the ultimate
revelation he said, “Hinckley Hall—A Faithful
Friend Is a Strong Defense.” Then I knew who
he was. That little coded phrase may not ring
any bells for you, but it meant something to
him and he knew it meant something to me.
On September 7, 1982, I stood in this exact
spot and gave the only angry public spanking
I have ever given a group of BYU students.
The title of my remarks for that back-to-school
message was “A Faithful Friend Is a Strong
Defense.” I spoke of an offense, a felony—
falsifying government documents—which had
been committed in Hinckley Hall the April
before and which had been widely covered by
the press. Five months had passed but I was
still hurting. Time had not soothed me.
I spoke of that incident publicly—without
mentioning the names of the participants—
because I care about matters of morality and
honor and personal virtue at BYU. I wanted it
clear then (and now, if anyone is still wondering)
that the behavior of every student at Brigham
Young University matters very much to me and
to what this school stands for. So I said my piece
and, for all intents and purposes, forgot about it.
But, as you might guess, it was not easy for
the students involved. Not only were there the
burdens of university and Church actions, but
the civil laws made an indelible stroke across the
record of some of these young lives. There were
tears and courts and sentences and probations.
Legally it had been about as much of a nightmare as a college freshman could have foreseen.
Obviously it was more of a nightmare than they
could have foreseen because the sorrow and
remorse over their “prank”—I put the word in
quotation marks—was deep and rending.
I recall that very unsavory experience for
you this morning simply to put a happy ending on one young man’s very difficult experience. His father wrote me later and said how
much courage it had taken for him to come up
and talk with me at the MTC, but he said his
son wanted me to know of his effort to make
things right. It had not been easy for him to
get a mission call. Not only were there all the
court-imposed sanctions and Church restrictions, but there was the terrible personal
burden of guilt. But he wanted to serve a mission both because it was the right thing to do
and because it was a way for him to say to the
Church, the government, the university and all
who cared about him, “I’m back. I made a serious mistake but I’m back. I am making up lost
ground. I’ve still got a chance.”
The Prayer in My Heart
As you know, there are other painful stories
about transgressions and heartache on this
campus, stories involving very serious but
usually less public mistakes. The prayer in
my heart this morning is to help some of you,
any of you, even one of you, have a similarly
happy ending to your story, a story which you
may feel is pocked and blemished beyond
repair for some past mistake you have made.
In short, I wish to speak to you of the redeeming love of Christ and why His gospel is
indeed the “good news.” Because of Him we
can rise above past problems, blot them out,
watch them die if we are willing to have it so.
I am not sure what your most painful memories might be. I’m certain there are lots of problems we could all list. Some may be sins among
the most serious God Himself has listed. Others
may be less serious disappointments, including
a poor start in school, or a difficult relationship
with your family, or personal pain with a friend.
Whatever the list, it’s bound to be long when we
add up all the dumb things we’ve done. And
my greatest fear is that you will not believe in
other chances, that you will not understand
repentance, that on some days you will not
believe in any future at all.
Macbeth’s Guilt
In what may well be literature’s most
extreme and chilling observation of such debilitating, unassuaged guilt, we watch Macbeth—
cousin of the king, masterful, strong, honored,
and honorable—descend through a horrible
series of bloody deeds by which his very soul
is increasingly “tortured by an agony which
[knows no] . . . repose” (A. C. Bradley,
Shakespearean Tragedy, [New York: Fawcett,
1967], p. 276). Shapes of terror appear before
his eyes, and the sounds of hell clamor in his
ears.
His guilty heart and tormented conscience
rend his days and terrify his nights so incessantly that he says to his physician:
Canst thou not minister to a mind diseas’d,
Pluck from the memory a rooted sorrow,
2 Brigham Young University 1983–84 Speeches
Raze out the written troubles of the brain,
And with some sweet oblivious antidote
Cleanse the stuff’d bosom of that perilous stuff
Which weighs upon the heart?
The doctor shakes his head over such
diseases of the soul, and says:
Therein the patient
Must minister to himself.
[5.3.40–47]
But the anguish continues unabated until
Macbeth says on the day he will die:
Out, out, brief candle!
Life’s but a walking shadow, a poor player
That struts and frets his hour upon the stage,
And then is heard no more. It is a tale
Told by an idiot, full of sound and fury,
Signifying nothing. [5.5.23–28]
Macbeth’s murders are sins too strong for
the kind of transgression you and I might discuss at BYU. But I believe the despair of his
final hopelessness can be applied at least in
part to our own circumstances. Unless we
believe in repentance and restoration, unless
we believe there can be a way back from our
mistakes—whether those sins be sexual or
social or civil or academic, whether they be
great or small—unless we believe we can start
over on solid ground with our past put behind
us and genuine hope for the future—in short, if
we cannot believe in the compassion of Christ
and His redemptive love, then I think we in
our own way are as hopeless as Macbeth and
our view of life just as depressing. We do
become shadows, feeble players on a perverse
stage, in a tale told by an idiot. And unfortunately, in such a burdened state, we are the
idiots.
The Miracle of Forgiveness
As he began to write of what he would call
the “miracle of forgiveness,” President Kimball
said:
I had made up my mind that I would never
write a book [but] . . . when I come in contact
almost daily with broken homes, delinquent children, corrupt governments, and apostate groups,
and realize that all these problems are the result of
sin, I want to shout with Alma: “O . . . that I might
go forth . . . with a voice to shake the earth, and cry
repentance unto every people.” (Alma 29:1.)
Hence this book indicates the seriousness of
breaking God’s commandments; shows that sin can
bring only sorrow, remorse, disappointment, and
anguish; and warns that the small indiscretions
evolve into larger ones and finally into major transgressions which bring heavy penalties . . . .
[But] having come to recognize their deep
sin, many have tended to surrender hope, not
having a clear knowledge of the scriptures and
of the redeeming power of Christ.
[So I also] write to make the joyous affirmation
that man can be literally transformed by his own
repentance and by God’s forgiveness. . . .
It is my humble hope that . . . [those] who are
suffering the baleful effects of sin may be helped to
find the way from darkness to light, from suffering
to peace, from misery to hope, and from spiritual
death to eternal life. [Spencer W. Kimball,
Preface, The Miracle of Forgiveness, p. x–xii;
emphasis added]
That is what I want for you this year, this
new year and new semester, at BYU. Without
ever minimizing the seriousness of some of
our mistakes, I want to give to you today the
message that we can be washed and pronounced
clean if we will but honor the Lamb of God.
From relatively innocent mistakes or disadvantages in life to the most serious of spiritual sins,
the gospel of Jesus Christ gives us a way back.
We must believe in movement “from darkness
to light, from suffering to peace, from misery
to hope.”
Alma’s Return
What if Alma had not come back? He had
made serious mistakes, more serious perhaps
than we know. He is described as “a very
wicked and an idolatrous man,” one who
sought to “destroy the church” and who
delighted in “rebelling against God” (Mosiah
27:8, 10, 11). He was, in short, “the very vilest of
sinners” (Mosiah 28:4). The strongest denunciation comes from his own lips when he said to
his son Helaman,
I had rebelled against my God . . . .
. . . I had murdered many of his children, or
rather led them away unto destruction . . . . So great
had been my iniquities, that the very thought of
coming into the presence of my God did rack my
soul with inexpressible horror. [Alma 36:13–14]
He may not have been Macbeth, but that is a
frightening description of a man’s standing
before God. But he came back. Not without
anguish and suffering and fear, not without
“wandering through much tribulation, repenting nigh unto death.” But he paid the full price
and came back on the strength of Christ’s love.
And every life thereafter, both in the Book of
Mormon itself and in our generation, has been
enriched because of the life Alma then lived.
What if he had not had the courage to make
amends, however severe, and had remained at
the far end of a road he should never have
taken? What if, having found himself in such a
mess he had despairingly thrown his hands in
the air and said, “Out, brief candle. I am a poor
player upon a stage. My life is a tale told by an
idiot. It has been full of sound and fury, and
now it signifies nothing”?
Peter’s Strength
Or what if a mistake or two had so crippled
Peter that he had not come back, stronger than
ever, after the crucifixion and resurrection of
the Master? A few years ago President Gordon
B. Hinckley spoke of Peter’s struggle. After
recounting the events of Jesus’ ordeal in accusations, mock trials, and imprisonment, and
Peter’s remorseful acquiescence to it, he said:
As I have read this account my heart goes out
to Peter. So many of us are so much like him. We
pledge our loyalty; we affirm our determination to
be of good courage; we declare, sometimes even
publicly, that come what may we will do the right
thing, that we will stand for the right cause, that we
will be true to ourselves and to others.
Then the pressures begin to build. Sometimes
these are social pressures. Sometimes they are personal appetites. Sometimes they are false ambitions.
There is a weakening of the will. There is a softening
of discipline. There is capitulation. And then there
is remorse, self-accusation, and bitter tears of regret.
Well, if Peter’s story were to have ended
there, with him cursing and swearing and saying, “I know not the man,” surely his would be
among the most pathetic in all scripture.
But Peter came back.
He squared his shoulders and stiffened his
resolve and made up for lost ground. He took
command of a frightened little band of Church
members. He preached such a moving sermon
on the day of Pentecost that three thousand in
the audience applied for baptism. Days later
five thousand heard him and were baptized.
With John, he healed the lame man at the gate
of the temple. Faith in Peter’s faith brought the
sick into the streets on their beds of affliction
“that at least the shadow of Peter passing by
might overshadow some of them” (Acts 5:15).
He fearlessly spoke for his brethren when they
were arraigned before the Sanhedrin and when
they were cast into prison. He entertained
angels and received the vision that led to carrying the gospel to the Gentiles. He became in
every sense the rock Christ promised he would
be. Of such a life President Hinckley said:
I pray that you may draw comfort and resolution from the example of Peter who, though he had
walked daily with Jesus, in an hour of extremity
denied both the Lord and the testimony which he
carried in his own heart. But he rose above this, and
became a mighty defender and a powerful advocate.
So too, there is a way for you to turn about and . . .
[build] the kingdom of God. [“And Peter Went
Out and Wept Bitterly,” Ensign, May 1979,
pp. 65–67]
Help Is Needed
Of course, one of the added tragedies in
transgression is that even if we make the effort
to change, to try again, to come back, others
often insist upon leaving the old labels with us.
I grew up in the same town with a boy who
had no father and precious few of the other
blessings of life. The young men in our community found it easy to tease and taunt and
bully him. And in the process of it all he made
some mistakes, though I cannot believe his
mistakes were more serious than those of his
Latter-day Saint friends who made life so miserable for him. He began to drink and smoke,
and the gospel principles which had never
meant much to him now meant even less. He
had been cast in a role by LDS friends who
should have known better and he began to play
the part perfectly. Soon he drank even more,
went to school even less, and went to Church
not at all. Then one day he was gone. Some said
that they thought he had joined the army.
That was about 1959 or so. Fifteen or sixteen
years later he came home. At least he tried to
come home. He had found the significance of
the gospel in his life. He had married a wonderful girl, and they had a beautiful family. But
he discovered something upon his return.
He had changed, but some of his old friends
hadn’t—and they were unwilling to let him
escape his past.
This was hard for him and hard for his family. They bought a little home and started a small
business, but they struggled both personally and
professionally and finally moved away. For reasons that don’t need to be detailed here, the story
goes on to a very unhappy ending. He died a
year ago at age 44. That’s too young to die
these days, and it’s certainly too young to die
away from home.
When a battered, weary swimmer tries
valiantly to get back to shore, after having
fought strong winds and rough waves which
he should never have challenged in the first
place, those of us who might have had better
judgment, or perhaps just better luck, ought
not to row out to his side, beat him with our
oars, and shove his head back underwater.
That’s not what boats were made for. But some
of us do that to each other.
In general conference a few years ago Elder
David B. Haight told us that—
Arturo Toscanini, the late, famous conductor
of the New York Philharmonic Orchestra, received a
brief, crumpled letter from a lonely sheepherder in
the remote mountain area of Wyoming:
“Mr. Conductor: I have only two possessions—
a radio and an old violin. The batteries in my radio
are getting low and will soon die. My violin is so
out of tune I can’t use it. Please help me. Next
Sunday when you begin your concert, sound a loud
‘A’ so I can tune my ‘A’ string; then I can tune the
other strings. When my radio batteries are dead,
I’ll have my violin.
At the beginning of his next nationwide radio
concert from Carnegie Hall, Toscanini announced:
“For a dear friend and listener back in the
mountains of Wyoming the orchestra will now
sound an ‘A.’ ” The musicians all joined together in
a perfect “A.”
[That] lonely sheepherder only needed one note,
just a little help to get back in tune; . . . he needed
someone who cared to assist him with [just] one
string; [after that] the others would be easy.
[“People to People,” Ensign, November 1981, p.
54]
William Wines Phelps’s Way Back
In the early years of the Church the Prophet
Joseph Smith had no more faithful aide than
William Wines Phelps. Brother Phelps, a former
newspaper editor, had joined the Church in
Kirtland and was of such assistance to those
early leaders that they sent him as one of the
first Latter-day Saints to the New Jerusalem—
Jackson County, Missouri. There he was called
by the Lord to the stake presidency of that
“center stake of Zion.”
But then troubles developed. First they
were largely ecclesiastical aberrations but later
there were financial improprieties. Things
became so serious that the Lord revealed to
Joseph Smith that if Phelps did not repent, he
would be “removed out of [his] place” (HC
2:511). He did not repent and was excommunicated on March 10, 1838.
The Prophet Joseph and others immediately
tried to love Phelps back into the fold, but he
would have nothing of it. Then in the fall of that
violent year W. W. Phelps, along with others,
signed a deadly, damaging affidavit against the
Prophet and other leaders of the Church. The
result was quite simply that Joseph Smith was
sentenced to be publicly executed on the town
square in Far West, Missouri, Friday morning,
November 2, 1838. Through the monumental
courage of General Alexander Doniphan, the
Prophet was miraculously spared the execution
Phelps and others had precipitated, but he was
not spared spending five months—November
through April—in several Missouri prisons, the
most noted of which was the pit known ironically as Liberty Jail.
I do not need to recount for you the suffering
of the Saints through that period. The anguish
of those not captive was in many ways more
severe than those imprisoned. The persecution
intensified until the Saints sought yet again to
find another refuge from the storm. With
Joseph in chains, praying for their safety and
giving some direction by letter, they made their
way toward Commerce, Illinois, a malaria
swamp on the Mississippi River where they
would try once more to build the city of Zion.
And much of this travail, this torment and
heartache, was due to men of their own brotherhood like W. W. Phelps.
But we’re speaking today of happy endings. Two very difficult years later, with great
anguish and remorse of conscience, Phelps
wrote to Joseph Smith in Nauvoo.
Brother Joseph: . . . I am as the prodigal son. . . .
I have seen the folly of my way, and I tremble at
the gulf I have passed. . . . [I] ask my old brethren to
forgive me, and though they chasten me to death,
yet I will die with them, for their God is my God.
The least place with them is enough for me, yea, it is
bigger and better than all Babylon. . . .
I know my situation, you know it, and God
knows it, and I want to be saved if my friends will
help me. . . . I have done wrong and I am sorry. . . .
I ask forgiveness. . . . I want your fellowship; if you
cannot grant that, grant me your peace and friendship, for we are brethren, and our communion used
to be sweet.
In an instant the Prophet wrote back. I know
of no private document or personal response in
the life of Joseph Smith—or anyone else, for that
matter—which so powerfully demonstrates the
magnificence of his soul. There is a lesson here
for every one of us who claims to be a disciple
of Christ.
He wrote:
Dear Brother Phelps: . . . You may in some measure realize what my feelings . . . were when we read
your letter . . . .
We have suffered much in consequence of your
behavior—the cup of gall, already full enough for
mortals to drink, was indeed filled to overflowing
when you turned against us . . . .
However, the cup has been drunk, the will of
our Father has been done, and we are yet alive, for
which we thank the Lord. And having been delivered from the hands of wicked men by the mercy of
our God, we say it is your privilege to be delivered
from the powers of the adversary, be brought into
the liberty of God’s dear children, and again take
your stand among the Saints of the Most High,
and by diligence, humility, and love unfeigned,
commend yourself to our God, and your God, and
to the Church of Jesus Christ.
Believing your confession to be real, and your
repentance genuine, I shall be happy once again to
give you the right hand of fellowship, and rejoice
over the returning prodigal.
“Come on, dear brother, since the war is past,
For friends at first, are friends again at last.”
Yours as ever,
Joseph Smith, Jun. [HC 4:141–42, 162–64]
It only adds to the poignance of this particular prodigal’s return that exactly four years
later—almost to the day—it would be W. W.
Phelps selected to preach Joseph Smith’s
funeral sermon in that terribly tense and
emotional circumstance. Furthermore it would
be W. W. Phelps who would memorialize the
martyred prophet with his hymn of adoration,
“Praise to the Man.”
Having been the foolish swimmer pulled
back to safety by the very man he had sought
to destroy, Phelps must have had unique
appreciation for the stature of the Prophet
when he penned:
Great is his glory and endless his priesthood.
Ever and ever the keys he will hold.
Faithful and true, he will enter his kingdom,
Crowned in the midst of the prophets of old.
[“Praise to the Man,” Hymns, no. 147]
I requested that we sing a verse of that
hymn this morning. Next time you sing it,
remember what it meant to W. W. Phelps to
be given another chance.
The Prodigal Son
Perhaps the most encouraging and compassionate parable in all of Holy Writ is the story
of the prodigal son. I close with Mary Lyman
Henrie’s poetic expression of it entitled “To
Any Who Have Watched for a Son’s
Returning.”
He watched his son gather all the goods
that were his lot,
anxious to be gone from tending flocks,
the dullness of the fields.
He stood by the olive tree gate long
after the caravan disappeared
where the road climbs the hills
on the far side of the valley,
into infinity.
Through changing seasons he spent the light
in a great chair, facing the far country,
and that speck of road on the horizon.
Mocking friends: “He will not come.”
Whispering servants: “The old man
has lost his senses.”
A chiding son: “You should not have let him go.”
A grieving wife: “You need rest and sleep.”
She covered his drooping shoulders,
his callused knees, when east winds blew chill, until
that day . . .
A form familiar, even at infinity,
in shreds, alone, stumbling over pebbles.
“When he was a great way off,
His father saw him,
and had compassion, and ran,
and fell on his neck, and kissed him.” (Luke 15:20)
[Ensign, March 1983, p. 63]
God bless us to help each other come back
home, where we will, in the presence of our
Father, find waiting a robe, a ring, and a fatted
calf, I pray in the name of Him who made it
possible, even Jesus Christ. Amen.

THAT OUR CHILDREN MAY KNOW

I thought perhaps we’d have four or five
people here this morning and we could have
a friendly little fireside chat. I would still very
much like to do that in spirit, but obviously our
numbers will not allow us to get very chummy.
We are delighted to have you here, and I say
we meaning not only the whole university
family, but I specifically include my wife Pat,
who is here with me. I’d like her to stand and
be acknowledged if she would. You’ll feel a lot
better about me having met her.
I have to tell you a bit about how this
assignment came to me (as I hear the
Continuing Education people behind me begin
to squirm). Anyone in his right mind, who
knew that I had commencement exercises last
week, with all the presidential duties that that
requires, and our preschool faculty meetings
and university conference next week, with all
the presidential duties that that requires, and
then school starting the week following, with
a major address to the student body, might
wonder why I would volunteer for the devotional at Campus Education Week. Well that’s
what I wondered when I opened the booklet a
couple of days ago and read my name printed
here just inside the cover, where you’ve probably seen it. I think we saw it at the same
time. I contacted my beloved associates in
Continuing Education and said, “I am flattered
and thrilled to speak to this group”—(and in
fact I am. There’s not a group I would rather
address. But I said) “At about what point in
the week was I going to be notified about this
assignment?”
Then there was, “Well, didn’t you—. Surely
you—Well, uh . . . .” It turns out that they had
certainly agreed that I was going to speak, but
the pony express ran into an ambush just outside my office.
Henry Ford II
With that in mind, no story seems quite
so appropriate as one told about Henry Ford
II. While he was still head of Ford Motor
Company a number of years ago, he was
approached by a little band of sisters running
a convent who, after laboring for years to get
a school started, wanted to provide a hospital somewhere in upstate Michigan. It was
not to be a big hospital—in fact, it was not a
very big community. But that was the very
point—it had not had adequate medical facilities, and they wanted to do what they could. 
They needed several thousand dollars. They
summoned all the courage they had and made
a journey downstate to Mr. Ford. There in his
office they approached him for a gift toward
their little hospital.
Well, I’m sure Mr. Ford and others like him
are used to that kind of thing, and he said, “I’ll
be glad to help. I do a lot of this around the
country and can’t do a great deal for any one
group, but I’ll be glad to help. I’m touched by
your sincerity,” and he wrote out a check for
$10,000. This was many years ago, and $10,000
on a first contact was more than these sisters
could imagine. They ran home to their little
community absolutely delighted, shared it
with the local press, which was a little handrun operation, and the newspaper came out
that weekend saying, “Henry Ford II gives
$100,000 to hospital.”
Well, you see the problem. These nuns
were very embarrassed because they lost both
ways. First of all, people thought they had
$90,000 that they didn’t have and I can imagine them explaining that. On the other hand,
if Mr. Ford saw it and read about it, he would
be embarrassed.
They did not know what to do. They worried about it and prayed about it and talked
to each other about it and finally and fearfully
returned to Mr. Ford, showed him the headlines, and said, “We are deeply apologetic. We
will work it out. We’ll just go tell the people
that you didn’t give $100,000.” He sat in silence
and then smiled and said, “That probably isn’t
a good thing for my image.” Then he took his
checkbook out of his pocket and wrote another
check for $90,000 and handed it to them.
They were stunned. They were emotional
and very, very grateful and said, “What can
we do? What can we do to thank you?” And
he said, “Really nothing, but you’ll probably
have some dedicatory space in this hospital
somewhere. I don’t want any personal publicity; I would not like my name associated with
it. But somewhere in that hospital on a brick or
a small plaque, just record Matthew 25:35—no
message, just the numerals and the citation.”
They were a little embarrassed, religious
women that they were, that they couldn’t
quite, without scriptures in hand, identify
Matthew 25:35. As they got home, (as you are
now doing) they opened the covers of their
scriptures and read simply, “I was a stranger
and ye took me in.”
That’s a longer story than you needed,
but it will help explain the state I’m in this
morning as I speak to you from some notes,
knowing full well that the television camera is
absolutely unforgiving, not only today but forever and ever and ever. For all of that, I thank
you for coming, and I thank our Continuing
Education people for inviting me to give these
remarks about which I have strong feelings.
Conference Theme
 Your theme is taken from 2 Nephi 25:26,
and while I am not anxious that you tear
the pages out of the scriptures searching for
Matthew 25, you could do worse, if you have
them, than to note this passage in your Book
of Mormon. I want to say a word or two about
this verse, and I assume it will come up all
week long one way or another.
If we were to identify general sections of
scripture that are absolutely central to the
mission of the Book of Mormon, I’m not sure
that there are any more important pages in
the book than those that start with 2 Nephi 25
and conclude with Nephi’s testimony at the
end of chapter 33. That’s only about fifteen
pages, and yet it is a strong, central statement
giving significance to the purpose of the Book
of Mormon: to declare that Jesus is the Christ.
This is Nephi’s closing testimony. It is, for all
intents and purposes, the end of his life. In
verse 19, in declaring who the Messiah is and
for whom the Jews should look, Nephi said,
“His name shall be Jesus Christ, the Son of
God.” Begin in verses 17 and 18 to see how
complete the testimony is.
And the Lord will set his hand again the second
time to restore his people from their lost and fallen
state. Wherefore, he will proceed to do a marvelous work and a wonder among the children of men.
[These passages from this ancient book are
specifically for our time. They are latter-day,
dispensation-of-the-fullness-of-times messages.
The context is for a marvelous work and a
wonder, a gathering in a “second time.”]
Wherefore, he shall bring forth his words unto
them, . . . and they need not look forward any more
for a Messiah to come . . . and, . . . his name shall be
Jesus Christ, the Son of God.
Then 21 and 22:
Wherefore, for this cause hath the Lord God
promised unto me that these things which I write
shall be kept and preserved, and handed down . . .
from generation to generation. . . .
. . . These things shall go from generation to
generation as long as the earth shall stand; and they
will go according to the will and pleasure of God.
 And then, with that background, the
passage from which our theme is taken:
“We labor diligently to write, to persuade
our children,” in 23.
In 26,
We talk of Christ, we rejoice in Christ, we preach of
Christ, we prophesy of Christ, and we write according to our prophecies, that our children may know
to what source they may look for a remission of their
sins.
First line of 27:
Wherefore, we speak concerning the law, that our
children may know.
Our Obligation
In anticipation of your week’s activity, my
brief remarks this morning are devoted to the
obligation upon us to have our children know,
to fulfill the promise of the prophets and the
obligation put upon us by them to establish
these things and to declare them and hand
them down from generation to generation as
long as the earth shall stand.
 You’ve chosen to come today to a university which has as its motto a line from the 93rd
section of the Doctrine and Covenants which
reads, “The glory of God is intelligence.” It
could go on to say, “Or in other words light
and truth,” and, further, to say that “light and
truth forsake that evil one” (D&C 93:36–37).
You don’t have to read that very often before
you begin to understand why knowledge is
important, why intelligence is necessary, why
light and truth are tools in forsaking the evil
one.
Let me read you a passage first pointed out
to me by my colleague Joe Christensen, now
serving as president of the Missionary Training
Center. It is from the first issue of the first
volume of the first periodical published by the
Church—the lead editorial of the 1832 Evening
and Morning Star:
The disciples should loose [sic] no time in
preparing schools for their children, that they may
be taught as is pleasing unto the Lord, and brought
up in the way of holiness. Those appointed to select
and prepare books for the use of schools, will attend
to that subject, as soon as more weighty matters
are finished. But the parents and guardians in the
Church of Christ will not wait—it is all important
that children, to become good should be taught so. . . .
If it were necessary then to teach their children
diligently, how much more necessary is it now,
when the Church of Christ is to be an ensign, yea,
even a sample [sic] to the world, for good. A word
to the wise ought to be sufficient, for children soon
enough become men and women. Yes, they are
they that must follow us and perform the duties
which not only appertain to this world but to the
second coming of the Savior, even preparing for the
Sabbath of creation and for eternity.
“The disciples will attend to this subject”
(I suppose meaning the Brethren) “as soon as
more weighty matters are finished, but the parents and the guardians in the Church of Christ
must not wait—it is all important that children,
to become good should be taught so.”
I don’t know that these folks had been
reading from 2 Nephi 25, but they might have.
Great obligations are upon us to continue to
teach “that our children may know.”
Brother Christensen said another thing
which has impressed me for these many years
and which I share with you this morning. It is
the simple suggestion—in light of our schools
and Education Week and why you’re here and
what it means to be a parent or a child in this
Church—a simple reminder that this Church is
always only one generation away from extinction. That does not change however many
decades old we are now. It was true in 1840,
it was true in 1891, and is true in 1981. We are
always just one generation away from extinction. All we would have to do, I assume, to
destroy this work is stop teaching our children for one generation. Just everybody stop,
close the books, seal up your heart, keep your
mouth shut, and don’t bear a testimony. In
one generation it would be 1820 all over again.
We could hunt around and find somebody to
go out and pray in a grove of trees. With the
blessings of the Lord, we could get six people
together to organize a church. We could hand
Samuel Smith a Book of Mormon and say,
“Go knock on the door and see if we can start
somewhere.” That could happen. It won’t
happen. It mustn’t happen. It won’t happen in
1981 or 1991, but it could if we ceased to accept
the obligation upon us, always upon those who
have known and believed the truth, to teach it,
especially to their children. I am not minimizing other help. We think even BYU can help.
But while there are other weighty matters in
the kingdom for the disciples, parents and
guardians must not wait.
Doctrinal Importance of Generational
Testimony
 Let me just suggest doctrinally again how
important this has been from the beginning.
May I quote from the second Lecture on Faith.
These are the concluding lines of the second
lecture, and I’d just share them with you. They
deal with generational testimony.
We have now [for 55 paragraphs of this lecture] clearly set forth how it is, and how it was, that
God became an object of faith for rational beings.
[The question has been for this entire lecture,
“Why do people ever believe in God in the first
place? How did it start? And that’s not a bad
question if you’re addressing a young family
with young children] We have now clearly set
forth how it is, and how it was, that God became
an object of faith for rational beings; and also, upon
what foundation the testimony was based which
excited the inquiry and the diligent search of the
ancient saints to seek after and obtain a knowledge
of the glory of God; and we have seen [please note]
that it was human testimony, and human testimony
only, that excited this inquiry, in the first instance,
in their minds. It was the credence they gave to the
testimony of their fathers [and, I would add, their
mothers], this testimony having aroused their
minds to inquire after the knowledge of God; the
inquiry frequently terminated, indeed always terminated when rightly pursued, in the most glorious
discoveries and eternal certainty. [Doctrine and
Covenants, 1891]
How did it start in the first place? With
human testimony. How does it start in our first
place? With human testimony. How does it
start in the life of your child? Nowhere more
clearly, more emphatically, more importantly
than with your human testimony. The will,
indeed, along the way, have experiences of
their own. They must. But in the beginning
it was human testimony—yours and mine
and the ancients’—which excited the inquiryand brought the diligent search that ends “in
glorious discoveries and eternal certainty.”
Well, “we labor diligently to write, to
persuade our children . . . to believe in Christ.
. . . we talk of Christ, we rejoice in Christ, . . .
we prophesy” that our children may know.
We don’t need to belabor what a break in
that generational testimony can mean. It is
apostasy. It can be personal apostasy, it can
be familial apostasy, it can be dispensational
apostasy—it’s apostasy—some break in that
generational contact.
The dispensational bond against such a
break is, of course, very important in our theology. Joseph Smith said that we might well have
rendered this bond as welding, and maybe that’s
a more graphic image than sealing. I think sealing
has several applications, not the least of which is
the royal seal by the King of kings and Lord of
lords. Beyond that, there certainly is the image
of being sealed together, locked, linked, bound,
tied, in a way that does not let evil in, that does
not allow for personal or familial or dispensational apostasy, and that keeps those generations intact for time and all eternity.
May I just read to you from the Prophet
Joseph what I assume is the responsibility for
the living as well as for the dead. You all know
the language for the dead. You all understand
our obligation to seal our families back through
every generation. What I’m not sure we have
understood—in those revelations about work
for the dead and baptism for the dead and
sealings and why temples are built—is the
language from the lips of the Prophet Joseph
Smith himself about what we’re obligated to
do for the living, indeed the living in our own
households, indeed, the children at our knee
who eat at our table and pray at our beside.
Let me give you that language from section
128: Quoting Malachi, the Prophet Joseph
Smith said (I’m in verse 17 if anybody wants
to follow):
Behold I will send you Elijah the prophet before the
coming of the great and dreadful day of the Lord:
And he shall turn the heart of the fathers to the children, and the heart of the children to their fathers,
lest I come and smite the earth with a curse.
 Now, I think everyone understands,
especially in terms of the work for the dead,
the idea of turning the heart of the children to
their fathers, but what is the meaning for your
family in turning the heart of the fathers to the
children? I think he goes on to talk about that.
I might have rendered a plainer translation to this,
but it is sufficiently plain to suit my purpose as it
stands. It is sufficient to know, in this case, that
the earth will be smitten with a curse unless there
is a welding link of some kind…. It is necessary in
the ushering in of the dispensation of the fulness
of times, which dispensation is now beginning to
usher in, that a whole and complete and perfect
union, and welding together of dispensations, and
keys, and powers, and glories should take place,
and be revealed from the days of Adam even to the
present time. And not only this. . . [not only the
dispensational ties, but in our time in 1981 on
this campus, in your home] . . . not only this, but
those things which never have been revealed from
the foundation of the world, but have been kept hid
from the wise and prudent, shall be revealed unto
babes and sucklings in this, the dispensation of the
fulness of times.
As I understand it, that latter portion of the
scripture just read has nothing to do with work
for the dead or sealing back through generations to Adam. No, it has to do with things that
have been hidden from the wise and prudent
and they are to be revealed unto babes and
sucklings in this, the dispensation of the fullness of times, in this, your home and mine,
today.
Well, I don’t know whether that helps us
understand why this Church talks so much
about family, but it might. Why do we talk so much about Family Home Evening and
Home Teaching? Family Home Evening,
Home Teaching, even Four-generation Group
Sheets, certainly family and personal histories.
Why does this Church take the stand it takes
on things that relate to family—things like
abortion and premarital chastity? Why does
President Kimball want a picture of a temple
on the wall of the bedroom of each of the
children in our homes? Is it just a response to
1960s’ pressure or 1970s’ trouble? Is it really a
twentieth-century phenomenon to offset movies and magazines and trouble in the schools,
difficulty in the streets, problems in the community? I don’t think so. At least not anything
that I read suggests that it’s so recent. It is, in
fact, as old as the family of man.
I had a chance to suggest last spring to
some of the women who gathered on this campus that Adam and Eve left the garden primarily for two reasons, and as I read it, they had a
lot of other reasons to stay. They could backstroke in the lagoon every morning and pluck
wild berries for lunch and avoid all these problems of growing up with all the difficulties you
and I know about. I noticed the headlines on
the front page of the paper this morning and
just jotted them down. The front page of the
paper this morning, moving clockwise around
the page told of the U.S./Libyan shootout over
the Mediterranean, the sentencing of John
Lennon’s murderer, the official indictment of
President Reagan’s would-be assassin, and the
expulsion of Senator Harrison Williams for his
“repugnant conduct in the Abscam affair.” The
only good news was the weather. It said it was
going to be hot and muggy.
 As I understand it, Adam and Eve could
have avoided all of that if they stayed in the
garden, but in pursuit of eternal progress they
chose to leave for two reasons: family and
knowledge. They would not have had children and they could not have become like the
gods, knowing good from evil. And against
all of those other very attractive and very
accommodating and very pleasant reasons to
stay in the garden, they left to have a family
and gain knowledge and pass that knowledge
on to their family.
Is it just coincidence that the great biblical
and scriptural stories are family stories? Was
it happenstance that Satan began immediately
to try to rend the family, to break the generation, immediately turning Cain against Abel?
Why did Abraham’s own father try to take his
life? I’m sure Satan knew what Abraham was
going to be. We see David’s tragedy and then
see it compounded in his son, Absalom. Then
the difficult family experiences Solomon had
that finally led to the rending of the kingdom.
They are all part of the generational pattern.
The Book of Mormon is from beginning to end
a profound statement about a family which
was involved in a warring experience of good
against evil in an attempt to keep that generational experience intact. Ultimately in the end
it was not, but for our dispensation, we are
to learn from their failures and guard against
repeating them. And as near as I can tell, if we
learn from them, we will take advantage of
Family Home Evening, we will write personal
and family histories, we will accept the challenge of having a condensed schedule on
Sunday that can provide time for teaching the
gospel in our homes by parents who “must not
wait.”
Sally Bush’s Example
Well, I have 101 things I could say and
should say about families. I read something
once about what Abraham Lincoln’s stepmother did for him. She felt she “must not
wait.”
She was sometimes called Sally, a widow with three
children. Perhaps life had been a little harsh and she
would have welcomed a change for the better, the
easier, if it came. She thought she saw it come when
a man, a widower from her past, returned with a
proposal of marriage in his nice suit of clothes and 
talk of a prosperous farm. The prospects of a better life grew, and she understood him to mention
servants and to be a man of substance. She accepted
and crossed the river with him to view her new
possessions: A farm grown up to wild blackberry
vines and sumac, a floorless, windowless hut, the
only servants were two thinly clad barefoot children, the father of whom had borrowed the suit and
the boots that he had gone a-courting in. Her first
thought was the obvious one: go back home. But she
looked at the children, especially the younger, a boy
whose melancholy gaze met hers. For a moment she
looked while a great spirit subdued the passions of
the flesh and then, rolling up her sleeves, she quietly
spoke immortal words which ought to be engraven
on every parent or teacher’s heart: “I’ll stay for the
sake of this boy.”
“Oh, Sally Bush, what a treasure trembled in
the balance that day,” wrote one whose mother
was a neighbor of the boy. And Sally Bush didn’t
know, when she looked at that melancholy face of
ten years, that her stepson would someday save
this nation, heal a generational breech, and become
the immortal Abraham Lincoln. She uttered what
should be engraven on every parent or teacher’s
heart, “I’ll stay for the sake of this boy.”
Suzanne Shakespeare’s Example
What if it isn’t pleasant? What if it’s more
difficult than you or the children counted on?
I’m not sure that Stan and Barbara Shakespeare
are in the room, but I close with this from their
daughter, Suzanne, age 16:
Of all the ugly words conceived, chemotherapy
must be the very worst. How I hated to see the number four person coming, knowing that after he was
finished with his part, mine would begin: Nausea
so violent I couldn’t keep anything on my stomach,
lips so cracked and raw it was like I’d been beaten
every morning, my hair began falling [and to any
girl nine or ninety, that’s a blow to pride only
we can understand].
How I hated to be thin and pale and have people
look at me like I was going to disappear before their
very eyes. My parents prayed for a miracle. I prayed
that it was a bad dream and that it wasn’t really
happening to me. I knew prayers were answered,
and I wanted mine answered right now. Five long,
painful learning years (I can see now) later the
miracle had happened. I was alive. I was fourteen,
and life was beginning all over again. I still remember the day the doctors told me I wouldn’t have
any more medicine and I was free of the disease.
It’s true I had a limp and one leg was several times
smaller than the other, but I had a beautiful head of
my own hair and life. Could anything stand in my
way now?
Well, life was wonderful. She went back to
school and prepared to rejoin her friends. She
began to be interested in boys and to think of
driving a car, and in the midst of all of that, the
hurt came again, same leg, same place, new
examination, increased inflammation, pain that
wouldn’t go away, and now another type of
cancer.
Ridiculous. I was cured. September 13, 1978, I lost
my left leg about 4 inches above the knee and with
it many of the dreams only a sixteen-year-old has.
I couldn’t decide whether to pray for recovery or
for complete oblivion. My world had shattered and
I wanted to stop right now—stop because my leg
was gone. Stop because I was facing chemotherapy
again. Stop because I was once again going to
lose my crowning glory. What was left? The Lord
blessed me with two very special parents. How hard
they must have prayed for me and pleaded that I
would have the strength to forge ahead and learn to
accept this happening as an opportunity and challenge. I didn’t want to get out of bed, but my parents made me. I didn’t want to face my friends, but
my parents invited them in. I didn’t want to go to
school. You can imagine how I felt going that first
day with my pant leg flapping, but my parents left
me at the door and told me I could do it, and I did.
Me, Suzanne Shakespeare, who thought my friends
wouldn’t like me now and that I wouldn’t be able
to do anything. I learned something those first few days that is more precious than all my material possessions. I wasn’t really different at all. I was still
the same girl—the one who joined the clubs and had
friends and loved to study. The only thing that had
really changed was my capacity to understand and
appreciate. What wonderful things to have learned.
And guess what. I’ve had one date and I’m learning to drive and I’m going to try out for the school
musical. I’m getting my new leg soon and I know
there will be many hard adjustments ahead. I have
had chemotherapy and I’ve been sick, but I’m alive,
and the Lord must have something wonderful ahead
just for me. And you know what? I’m going to find
it. Signed Suzanne Shakespeare, age 16.
Epilogue: Suzanne continued having chemotherapy until January 1979. On a routine
visit to the Primary Children’s Medical Center
in Salt Lake City, a chest x-ray revealed widespread cancer cells in the lungs. There was
nothing more medical science could do. Her
mother is writing:
How do you tell a sixteen-year-old girl she is going
to die? Straightforwardly, with tears, with love and
determination to continue as normally as possible.
That’s how. Time? Maybe two months.
Soon after she returned home, Suzanne went on
a family trip to Disneyland, her favorite place. She
attended a four-day forensic meet in Salt Lake, she
auditioned and received a part in the high school
musical, she asked a young man to the sweetheart
ball and danced all evening without crutches on a
newly acquired artificial leg. She carried a full load
at school and, despite a record winter for snow and
ice, rarely missed a day. There began to be shoulder
pains, shortness of breath, then loss of appetite, but
Suzanne would take nothing but aspirin because
pain pills might interfere with her school activities. On 15 March she began a three-week tour of
the South with her grandmother. The pace of the
tour and her increasing loss of strength made her
extremely tired. Breathing became so difficult it was
impossible for her to lie down. But still it was only
aspirin and determination to see the trip through
to Disneyworld. On 27 March her father flew to
Miami Beach to bring her home. Her condition was
critical. They arrived home early in the morning on
the 28th. She had her first pain pill that afternoon
and passed away in her sleep that night. On 29
March the rest of the group reached Disneyworld.
These are my childhood friends, Stan and
Barbara. I grew up with them, and my daughter has not had cancer. But theirs has and she’s
gone. And how do you tell a child that life isn’t
entirely a Disneyworld? Will there be times in
your life or theirs that they will need the substance of the gospel in a way that only you can
teach it? I close with the counsel of a prophet:
I have spoken of reservoirs of faith, [said
President Kimball] and who is to build these
reservoirs? Is this not the reason that God gave to
every child two parents? It is those parents who
sired and bore them who are expected by the Lord to
lay foundations for their children and to build the
barns and the tanks and the bins and the reservoirs
of faith?
I testify of the truth of the gospel of Jesus
Christ and of the need for faithful teaching concerning it that indeed “our children may know
to what source they may look for a remission
of their sins.” It is in the name of that source,
even Jesus Christ, that I do testify. Amen

FOR TIMES OF TROUBLE 

I
would like to be quite personal this
morning—personal about you and personal about myself. I have thought about you
a great deal over the past few weeks and have
prayed to know what might be helpful to you.
In doing so I have been drawn back to my own
days as a student and some of the challenges I
faced then. While such experiences now border
on primitive history, fit only for a geology lecture, I’m nevertheless going ahead. I have wondered if some of your experiences and feelings
might even now be very much the same.
I come this morning knowing the semester
is nearly over and that what suggestions I offer
were perhaps needed months ago. Furthermore,
the year is nearly over and maybe for some an
entire college career. But part of what I want to
stress is that every day counts—including these
remaining few in the semester—and that you
have thousands of days thereafter. I will speak
of you as you are right now and will hope it
matters as much to the graduating senior as to
the first-semester freshman.
I wish to speak today of a problem that
is universal and that can, at any given hour,
strike anywhere on campus—faculty, staff,
administration, and especially students. I
believe it is a form of evil. At least I know it can
have damaging effects that block our growth,
dampen our spirit, diminish our hope, and
leave us vulnerable to other more conspicuous
evils. I address it here this morning because I
know of nothing Satan uses quite so cunningly
or cleverly in his work on a young man or
woman in your present circumstances. I speak
of doubt—especially self-doubt—of discouragement, and of despair.
In doing so I don’t wish to suggest that
there aren’t plenty of things in the world to
be troubled by. In our lives, individually and
collectively, there surely are serious threats to
our happiness. I watch an early morning news
broadcast while I shave and then read a daily
newspaper. That is enough to ruin anyone’s
day and by then it’s only 6:30 in the morning.
Iran, Afghanistan, inflation, energy, jogging,
mass murders, kidnapping, unemployment,
floods. With all of this waiting for us we are
tempted, as W. C. Fields once said, to “smile
first thing in the morning and get it over with.”
But my concerns for you today are not thenational and international ones. I wish to speak
a little more personally of those matters that
do not make headlines in the New York Times
but that may be important in your personal
journal. I’m anxious this morning about your
problems with school and love and finances
and the future, about your troubles concerning
a place in life and the value of your contribution, about your private fears regarding where
you are going and whether you think you will
ever get there. Against a backdrop of hostages
and high prices I wish to speak more personally of you and fortify you, if I am able, against
doubt—especially self-doubt—and discouragement and despair. This morning I want to
attack double-digit depression.
In doing so, however, I wish at the outset
to make a distinction F. Scott Fitzgerald once
made, that “trouble has no necessary connection with discouragement—discouragement
has a germ of its own, as different from trouble
as arthritis is different from a stiff joint” (The
Crack-Up, 1945). Troubles we all have, but the
“germ” of discouragement, to use Fitzgerald’s
word, is not in the trouble, it is in us. Or to be
more precise, I believe it is in Satan, the Prince
of Darkness, the Father of Lies. And he would
have it be in us. It’s frequently a small germ,
hardly worth going to the Health Center for,
but it will work and it will grow and it will
spread. In fact it can become almost a habit, a
way of living and thinking, and there the greatest damage is done. Then it takes an increasingly severe toll on our spirit, for it erodes the
deepest religious commitments we can make—
those of faith, and hope, and charity. We turn
inward and look downward, and these greatest
of Christlike virtues are damaged or at very
least impaired. We become unhappy and soon
make others unhappy, and before long Lucifer
laughs.
As with any other germ, a little preventive
medicine ought to be practiced in terms of
those things that get us down. There is a line
from Dante that says, “The arrow seen before
cometh less rudely” (Divine Comedy). President
John F. Kennedy put the same thought into one
of his state of the union messages this way:
“The time to repair the roof is when the sun is
shining.” The Boy Scouts say it best of all: “Be
prepared.” That isn’t just cracker-barrel wisdom with us; it is theology. “And angels shall
fly through the midst of heaven, crying with a
loud voice . . . Prepare ye, prepare ye” (D&C
88:92). “But if ye are prepared ye shall not fear”
(D&C 38:30). And fear is part of what I wish to
oppose this morning. The scriptures teach that
preparation—prevention if you will—is perhaps the major weapon in your arsenal against
discouragement and self-defeat.
For example, if as a student you are the way
I was, you may be discouraged over money
matters—and almost everyone is, at least
some of the time. A recent study indicated
that financially related problems outranked
all other factors in marital difficulty by a margin of three to one. And the pressure can be
about that great on single students as well. If
shared misery provides any consolation for
you, take heart—you have friends. From the
day I walked into my first college class until
I staggered out the exit of my last— a period
of time stretching over twelve years and four
degrees—I was responsible for every cent of
my education. I know that many in this audience are getting through school exactly the
same way—part-time jobs, loans, working
spouses, an almost desperate plea for scholarships, postponed personal comforts, and all the
rest. These things can be troublesome, but you
have an obligation—to yourself if no one else—
to see that they are not destructive. Prepare.
“The arrow seen before cometh less rudely.”
Take advantage at this tender age to learn to
use a budget, to sit down at a table spread
out with your debts and come to grips with
the economic facts of life. It’s none too soon if
you’ve made it to college and still have not had
to establish personal fiscal priorities to decide
what you will have at the expense of some things you will not have. Get it down on paper
and deal with it there. That is the counsel given
to husbands and wives, and the same solution
works for others. The alternative is to leave it
churning in your stomach and head and heart,
all of which are susceptible to their own forms
of ulcer.
I see the Brethren labor over the wise use
of the Church’s resources. I see President Oaks
labor over it for the university. I hope soon to
see someone labor over it for our nation. You
can consider it part of a very valuable education to labor over it in your own life. Plan.
Prepare. Budget. Work. Save. Sacrifice. Spend
cheerfully on things that matter. Smile at an
old pair of shoes. Pay your tithing. Cherish a
used book. Though some of you may be living
in almost desperate financial straits, I promise
you there is a way. Such times may be burdensome. Such sacrifice may be hard. But it does
not have to lead—for you it must not lead—
to despair and destruction and defeat. In the
words of Henry David Thoreau:
Most of the luxuries, and many of the so-called
comforts of life are not only dispensable, but positive
hindrances to the elevation of mankind. [Walden
(1854), 1, “Economy”]
Love your life, poor as it is. . . . The setting sun
is reflected from the windows of the almshouse as
brightly as from the rich man’s abode. [Walden
(1854), 18, “Conclusion”]
Now no one here need be so dramatic as
to peer out of an almshouse, but you may be
going without some things, you may even consider yourself poor. Well, “Love your life, poor
as it is.” “If God so clothe the grass of the field,
which today is, and tomorrow is cast into the
oven, shall he not much more clothe you, O ye
of little faith?” (Matthew 6:30).
Quite apart from the financial challenge,
schoolwork itself can be quite a drag. (Hold
your applause.) I suppose it’s fair to say that
math and English and economics and zoology
can be discouraging on certain days, especially
as finals approach. But a little preparation can
work wonders here as well. Otherwise, it’s the
night before the paper is due or the morning
before the afternoon exam. And despair distills
upon us as the dews from heaven. I plead with
you, in making your university experience a
pleasant and rewarding one, work conscientiously in the early weeks, and you’ll work
more cheerfully at the end.
I remember handing in a paper to Dean
Bruce B. Clark who was at the time the teacher
of an English literature class I was taking. I
loved the class and knew from the first day
of instruction that three short papers would
be due on clearly stated dates during the
term. Yet I left those papers—in every case,
I think—until the night before they were due.
I remember Dean Clark handing one of them
back to me, saying something like “You had
the makings of a good paper here. It’s too bad
you didn’t spend more time on it.” I was devastated. Here was the chairman of my major
department, teaching only one class a semester
that year, the very symbol of my academic
hopes and dreams for the B.A., saying “You
didn’t work very hard.” Oh, I had worked
hard all right—from 9:00 the night before until
3:00 that morning—without stopping, without
breathing.
Now, my young brothers and sisters, I
deserved to be devastated. I should have been
devastated. And it could have been a good
paper. Perhaps that discouraged me more than
anything. You see, I discouraged me. I discouraged myself. Remember, dear Brutus, “The
fault . . . is not in our stars, but in ourselves”
(William Shakespeare, Julius Caesar). And that’s
the worst kind of despair, the kind of selfdespising that eats at our image and crushes
our hopes. It isn’t the class or the teacher or
the paper. It never is. I simply should have
done better. I should have been at work much
sooner. I should have written a draft or two
and then left it alone for a time. I should have 
gone back to it in freshness and strength. I
might even have asked for some suggestions.
I should have reworked it and shaped it and
fine-tuned it over several rewritings. At the end
I should have been working with a scalpel; as
it was I delivered one butchered idea, the meat
axe still dripping as I walked into class. And
furthermore, you don’t type very well at 3:00 in
the morning. The point is the same with school
as with money or marriage or profession or
any hope and dream. Prepare. Plan. Work.
Sacrifice. Rework. Spend cheerfully on matters
of worth. Carry the calm, and wear the assurance of having done the best you could with
what you had. If you work hard and prepare
earnestly, it will be very difficult for you to give
in or give up or wear down. If you labor with
faith in God and in yourself and in your future,
you will have built upon a rock. Then, when
the winds blow and the rains come—as surely
they will—you shall not fall.
Of course, some things are not under your
control. Some disappointments come regardless of your effort and preparation, for God
wishes us to be strong as well as good. There,
too, I say, “Love your life, poor as it is.” Drive
even these experiences into the corner, painful
though they may be, and learn from them. In
this, too, you have friends through the ages in
whom you can take comfort and with whom
you can form timeless bonds.
Thomas Edison devoted ten years and all
of his money to developing the nickel-alkaline
storage battery at a time when he was almost
penniless. Through that period of time, his
record and film production was supporting
the storage battery effort. Then one night the
terrifying cry of fire echoed through the film
plant. Spontaneous combustion had ignited
some chemicals. Within moments all of the
packing compounds, celluloid for records, film,
and other flammable goods had gone up with a
roar. Fire companies from eight towns arrived,
but the fire and heat were so intense and the
water pressure so low that the fire hoses had
no effect. Edison was sixty-seven years old—no
age to begin anew. His son Charles was frantic,
wondering if he were safe, if his spirits were
broken, and how he would handle a crisis such
as this at his age. Charles saw his father running toward him. He spoke first.
He said, “Where’s your mother? Go get her.
Tell her to get her friends. They’ll never see
another fire like this as long as they live!”
At 5:30 the next morning, with the fire
barely under control, he called his employees
together and announced, “We’re rebuilding.”
One man was told to lease all the machine
shops in the area, another to obtain a wrecking
crane from the Erie Railroad Company. Then,
almost as an afterthought, he added, “Oh, by
the way. Anybody know where we can get
some money?” (Paraphrased from Charles
Edison, “My Most Unforgettable Character,”
Reader’s Digest, December 1961, pp. 175–77.)
Virtually everything you now recognize as a
Thomas Edison contribution to your life came
after that disaster. Remember, “Trouble has no
necessary connection with discouragement—
discouragement has a germ of its own.”
If you are trying hard and living right and
things still seem burdensome and difficult, take
heart. Others have walked that way before you.
Do you feel unpopular and different, or outside the inside of things? Read Noah again. Go
out there and take a few whacks on the side of
your ark and see what popularity was like in
2500 B.C.
Does the wilderness stretch before you in
a never-ending sequence of semesters? Read
Moses again. Calculate the burden of fighting
with the pharaohs and then a forty-year assignment in Sinai. Some tasks take time. Accept
that. But as the scripture says, “They come to
pass.” They do end. We will cross over Jordan
eventually. Others have proven it. I stand before
you as a living symbol that anyone can make it
through school, fill a mission, and find a job.
Are you afraid people don’t like you?
The Prophet Joseph Smith could share a few thoughts with you on that subject. Has health
been a problem? Surely you will find comfort in the fact that a veritable Job has led
this Church into one of the most exciting and
revelatory decades of this entire dispensation.
President Kimball has known few days in the
last thirty years that were not filled with pain
or discomfort or disease. Is it wrong to wonder
if President Kimball has in some sense become
what he is not only in spite of the physical burdens but also in part because of them? Can you
take courage from your shared sacrifice with
that giant of a man who has defied disease and
death, has shaken his fist at the forces of darkness and cried when there was hardly strength
to walk, “Oh, Lord, I am yet strong. Give me
one more mountain” (see Joshua 14:11–12).
Do you ever feel untalented or incapable
or inferior? Would it help you to know that
everyone else feels that way too, including the
prophets of God? Moses initially resisted his
destiny, pleading that he was not eloquent in
language. Jeremiah thought himself a child and
was afraid of the faces he would meet.
And Enoch? I ask all of you to remember Enoch as long as you live. This is the
young man who, when called to a seemingly
impossible task, said, “Why is it that I have
found favor in thy sight, [I] am but a lad,
and all the people hate me; for I am slow of
speech?” (Moses 6:31).
Enoch was a believer. He stiffened his spine
and squared his shoulders and went stutteringly on his way. Plain old, ungifted, inferior
Enoch. And this is what the angels would come
to write of him:
And so great was the faith of Enoch that he led
the people of God, and their enemies came to battle
against them; and he spake the word of the Lord,
and the earth trembled, and the mountains fled,
even according to his command; and the rivers of
water were turned out of their course; and the roar
of the lions was heard out of the wilderness; and all
nations feared greatly, so powerful was the word of
Enoch, and so great was the power of the language
which God had given him. [Moses 7:13]
Plain old, inadequate Enoch—whose name
is now synonymous with transcendent righteousness. The next time you are tempted to
paint your self-portrait dismal gray, highlighted with lackluster beige, just remember
that in like manner have this kingdom’s most
splendid men and women been tempted. I
say to you as Joshua said to the tribes of Israel
as they faced one of their most difficult tasks,
“Sanctify yourselves: for tomorrow the Lord
will do wonders among you” (Joshua 3:5).
There is, of course, one source of despair
more serious than all the rest. It is linked with
poor preparation of a far more serious order. It
is the opposite of sanctification. It is the most
destructive discouragement in time or eternity.
It is transgression against God. It is depression
embedded in sin.
Here your most crucial challenge, once you
have recognized the seriousness of your mistakes, will be to believe that you can change,
that there can be a different you. To disbelieve
that is clearly a satanic device designed to discourage and defeat you. When you get home
tonight, you fall on your knees and thank your
Father in Heaven that you belong to a Church
and have grasped a gospel that promises repentance to those who will pay the price. Repentance
is not a foreboding word. It is following faith,
the most encouraging word in the Christian
vocabulary. Repentance is simply the scriptural
invitation for growth and improvement and
progress and renewal. You can change! You can
be anything you want to be in righteousness.
If there is one lament I cannot abide—and
I hear it from adults as well as students—it
is the poor, pitiful, withered cry, “Well, that’s
just the way I am.” If you want to talk about
discouragement, that phrase is one that discourages me. Though not a swearing man, I am
always sorely tempted to try my hand when I
hear that. Please spare me your speeches about “That’s just the way I am.” I’ve heard that from
too many people who wanted to sin and call
it psychology. And I use the word sin again
to cover a vast range of habits, some seemingly innocent enough, that nevertheless bring
discouragement and doubt and despair.
You can change anything you want to
change, and you can do it very fast. That’s
another satanic suckerpunch—that it takes
years and years and eons of eternity to repent.
It takes exactly as long to repent as it takes you
to say, “I’ll change”—and mean it. Of course
there will be problems to work out and restitutions to make. You may well spend—indeed
you had better spend—the rest of your life
proving your repentance by its permanence.
But change, growth, renewal, and repentance
can come for you as instantaneously as for
Alma and the sons of Mosiah. Even if you have
serious amends to make, it is not likely that
you would qualify for the term, “the vilest of
sinners,” which is the phrase Mormon uses
in describing these young men. Yet as Alma
recounts his own experience in the thirty-sixth
chapter of the book that bears his name, his
repentance appears to have been as instantaneous as it was stunning.
Do not misunderstand. Repentance is not
easy or painless or convenient. It is a bitter cup
from Hell. But only Satan, who dwells there,
would have you think that a necessary and
required acknowledgment is more distasteful
than permanent residence. Only he would say,
“You can’t change. You won’t change. It’s too
long and too hard to change. Give up. Give in.
Don’t repent. You are just the way you are.”
That, my friends, is a lie born of desperation.
Don’t fall for it.
As you know, the Brethren used to
announce in general conference the names of
those who had been called on missions. Not
only was this the way friends and neighbors
learned of the call, more often than not it was
the way the missionary learned of it as well.
One such prospect was Eli H. Pierce. A railroad
man by trade, he had not been very faithful in
Church meetings—“even had my inclinations
led in that direction, which I frankly confess
they did not,” he admitted. His mind had been
given totally to what he demurely calls “temporalities.” He said he had never read more
than a few pages of scripture in his life and that
he had spoken to only one public gathering (an
effort which he says was no credit to himself or
those who heard him). He used the vernacular
of the railroad and the barroom with a finesse
born of long practice. He bought cigars wholesale—a thousand at a time—and he regularly
lost his paycheck playing pool. Then this classic understatement: “Nature never endowed
me with a superabundance of religious sentiment; my spirituality was not high and probably even a little below average.”
Well, the Lord knew what Eli Pierce was,
and he knew something else. He knew what
I’m pleading for today. He knew what Eli
Pierce could become. When the call came
that October 5 in 1875, Eli wasn’t even in the
Tabernacle. He was out working on one of
the railroad lines. A fellow employee, once
recovered from the shock of it all, ran out to
telegraph the startling news. Brother Pierce
writes, “At the very moment this intelligence
was being flashed over the wires, I was sitting
lazily thrown back in an office rocking chair,
my feet on the desk, reading a novel and simultaneously sucking on an old Dutch pipe just to
vary the monotony of cigar smoking.” (For my
friends in the English Department I would just
hasten to add that the novel reading was probably a more serious transgression than the pipe
smoking.)
He goes on. “As soon as I had been informed
of what had taken place, I threw the novel in
the waste basket, the pipe in a corner [and
have never touched either to this hour]. I sent
in my resignation . . . to take effect at once,
in order that I might have time for study and
preparation. I then started into town to buy
[scripture].”Then these stirring words:
Remarkable as it may seem, and has since appeared
to me, a thought of disregarding the call, or of refusing to comply with the requirement, never once
entered my mind. The only question I asked—and I
asked it a thousand times—was: “How can I accomplish this mission? How can I, who am so shamefully ignorant and untaught in doctrine, do honor
to God and justice to the souls of men, and merit the
trust reposed in me by the Priesthood?”
With such genuine humility fostering resolution rather than defeating it, Eli Pierce fulfilled a remarkable mission. His journal could
appropriately close on a completely renovated
life with this one line: “Throughout our entire
mission we were greatly blessed.” But I add
one experience to make the point.
During his missionary service, Brother
Pierce was called in to administer to the infant
child of a branch president whom he knew and
loved. Unfortunately, the wife of the branch
president had become embittered and now
seriously objected to any religious activity
within the home, including a blessing for this
dying child. With the mother refusing to leave
the bedside and the child too ill to move, this
humble branch president with his missionary friend retired to a small upper room in the
house to pray for the baby’s life. The mother,
suspecting just such an act, sent one of the
older children to observe and report back.
There in that secluded chamber the two
knelt and prayed fervently until, in Brother
Pierce’s own words, “we felt that the child
would live and knew that our prayers had
been heard.” Arising from their knees, they
turned slowly only to see the young girl standing in the partially open doorway gazing
intently into the room. She seemed, however,
quite oblivious to the movements of the two
men. She stood entranced for some seconds,
her eyes immovable. Then she said, “Papa,
who was that . . . man in there?”
Her father said, “That is Brother Pierce. You
know him.”
“No,” she said, matter-of-factly, “I mean the
other man.”
“There was no other, darling, except Brother
Pierce and myself. We were praying for baby.”
“Oh, there was another man,” the child
insisted, “for I saw him standing [above] you
and Brother Pierce and he was dressed [all] in
white.”
Now if God in his heavens will do that for a
repentant old cigar-smoking, inactive, swearing pool player, don’t you think he’ll do it for
you? He will if your resolve is as deep and
permanent as Eli Pierce’s. In this Church we
ask for faith, not infallibility. (See Biography and
Family Record of Lorenzo Snow, pp. 407–13.)
Immerse yourself in the scriptures. You will
find your own experiences described there. You
will find spirit and strength there. You will find
solutions and counsel. Nephi says, “The words
of Christ will tell you all things . . . ye should
do” (2 Nephi 32:3).
Pray earnestly and fast with purpose and devotion. Some difficulties, like devils, come not out
“but by prayer and fasting.”
Serve others. The heavenly paradox is that
only in so doing can you save yourself.
Be patient. As Robert Frost said, with many
things the only way out is through. Keep
moving. Keep trying.
Have faith.
Has the day of miracles ceased?
Or have angels ceased to appear unto the children of men? Or has he withheld the power of the
Holy Ghost from them? Or will he, so long as time
shall last, or the earth shall stand, or there shall be
one man upon the face thereof to be saved?
Behold I say unto you, Nay; for it is by faith . . .
that angels appear and minister unto men. [Moroni
7:35–37]
Several decades ago an acquaintance of
mine left a small southern Utah town to travel to the East. He had never traveled much
beyond his little hometown and certainly had
never ridden a train. But his older sister and
brother-in-law needed him under some special
circumstances, and his parents agreed to free
him from the farm work in order to go. They
drove him to Salt Lake City and put him onto
the train—new Levi’s, not so new boots, very
frightened, and eighteen years old.
There was one major problem, and it terrified him. He had to change trains in Chicago.
Furthermore, it involved a one-night layover,
and that was a fate worse than death. His sister had written, carefully outlining when the
incoming train would arrive and how and
where and when he was to catch the outgoing
line, but he was terrified.
And then his humble, plain, sun-scarred
father did something no one in this room
should ever forget. He said, “Son, wherever
you go in this Church there will always be
somebody to stand by you. That’s part of what
it means to be a Latter-day Saint.” And then
he stuffed into the pocket of his calico shirt
the name of a bishop he had taken the time to
identify from sources at Church headquarters.
If the boy had troubles, or became discouraged
and afraid, he was to call the bishop and ask
for help.
Well, the train ride progressed rather
uneventfully until the train pulled into
Chicago. And even then the young man did
pretty well at collecting his luggage and making it to the nearby hotel room that had been
prearranged by his brother-in-law. But then the
clock began to tick and night began to fall and
faith began to fail. Could he find his way back
to the station? Could he find the right track and
train? What if it was late? What if he was late?
What if he lost his ticket? What if his sister had
made a mistake and he ended up in New York?
What if? What if? What if?
Without those well-worn boots ever hitting
the floor, that big, raw-boned boy flew across
the room, nearly pulled the telephone out of
the wall, and, fighting back tears and troubles,
called the bishop. Alas, the bishop was not
home, but the bishop’s wife was. She spoke
long enough to reassure him that absolutely
nothing could go wrong that night. He was,
after all, safe in the room, and what he needed
more than anything else was a night’s rest.
Then she said, “If tomorrow morning you are
still concerned, follow these directions and you
can be with our family and other ward members until train time. We will make sure you get
safely on your way.” She then carefully spelled
out the directions, had him repeat them back,
and suggested a time for him to come.
With slightly more peace in his heart, he
knelt by his bed in prayer (as he had every
night of his eighteen years) and then waited for
morning to come. Somewhere in the night the
hustle and bustle of Chicago in the 1930s subsided into peaceful sleep.
At the appointed hour the next morning he
set out. A long walk, then catch a bus. Then
transfer to another. Watch for the stop. Walk a
block, change sides of the street, and then one
last bus. Count the streets carefully. Two more
to go. One more to go. I’m here. Let me out of
this bus. It worked, just like she said.
Then his world crumbled, crumbled before
his very eyes. He stepped out of the bus onto
the longest stretch of shrubbery and grass he
had ever seen in his life. She had said something about a park, but he thought a park was
a dusty acre in southern Utah with a netless
tennis court in one corner. Here he stood looking in vain at the vast expanse of Lincoln Park
with not a single friendly face in sight.
There was no sign of a bishop or a ward or a
meetinghouse. And the bus was gone. It struck
him that he had no idea where he was or what
combination of connections with who knows
what number of buses would be necessary to
get him back to the station. Suddenly he felt
more alone and overwhelmed than he had at
any moment in his life. As the tears welled up
in his eyes, he despised himself for feeling so 
afraid—but he was, and the tears would not
stop. He stepped off the sidewalk away from
the bus stop into the edge of the park. He
needed some privacy for his tears, as only an
eighteen-year-old from Southern Utah could
fully appreciate. But as he stepped away from
the noise, fighting to control his emotions, he
thought he heard something hauntingly familiar in the distance. He moved cautiously in the
direction of the sound. First he walked, and
then he walked quickly. The sound was stronger and firmer and certainly it was familiar.
Then he started to smile, a smile that erupted
into an audible laugh, and then he started to
run. He wasn’t sure that was the most dignified thing for a newcomer to Chicago to do, but
this was no time for discretion. He ran, and he
ran fast. He ran as fast as those cowboy boots
would carry him—over shrubs, through trees,
around the edge of a pool.
Though hard to you this journey may appear,
Grace shall be as your day.
The sounds were crystal clear, and he was
weeping newer, different tears. For there over
a little rise huddled around a few picnic tables
and bundles of food were the bishop and his
wife and their children and most of the families
of that little ward. The date: July 24, 1934. The
sound: a slightly off-key a cappella rendition of
lines that even a boy from Southern Utah could
recognize.
Gird up your loins; fresh courage take;
Our God will never us forsake;
And soon we’ll have this tale to tell—
All is well! All is well!
[“Come, Come, Ye Saints, Hymns, 1985, no. 30]
It was Pioneer Day. The gathering to which he
had been invited was a Twenty-Fourth of July
celebration. Knowing that it was about time
for the boy to arrive, the ward had thought
it a simple matter to sing a verse or two of
“Come, Come, Ye Saints” to let him know
their location.
Elisha, with a power known only to the
prophets, had counseled the king of Israel on
how and where and when to defend against
the warring Syrians. The king of Syria, of
course, wished to rid his armies of this prophetic problem. So—and I quote:
Therefore sent he thither horses, and chariots,
and a great host: and they came by night, and
compassed the city about.
. . . an host compassed the city both with horses
and chariots. [2 Kings 6:14–15]
If Elisha is looking for a good time to be
depressed, this is it. His only ally is the president of the local teachers quorum. It is one
prophet and one lad against the world. And
the boy is petrified. He sees the enemy everywhere—difficulty and despair and problems
and burdens everywhere. The bus is gone and
all he can see is Chicago. With faltering faith
the boy cries, “Alas, my master! How shall we
do?”
And Elisha’s reply? “Fear not: for they that
be with us are more than they that be with
them” (2 Kings 6:15–16).
“They that be with us?” Now just an
Israelite minute here. Faith is fine and courage
is wonderful, but this is ridiculous, the boy
thinks. There are no others with them. He can
recognize a Syrian army when he sees one,
and he knows that one child and an old man
are not strong odds against it. But then comes
Elisha’s promise:
Fear not: for they that be with us are more than
they that be with them.
And Elisha prayed, and said, Lord, I pray thee,
open his eyes, that he may see. And the Lord opened
the eyes of the young man; and he saw: and, behold,
the mountain was full of horses and chariots of fire
round about Elisha. [2 Kings 6:16–17]In the gospel of Jesus Christ you have help
from both sides of the veil, and you must never
forget that. When disappointment and discouragement strike—and they will—you remember and never forget that if our eyes could be
opened we would see horses and chariots of
fire as far as the eye can see riding at reckless
speed to come to our protection. They will
always be there, these armies of heaven, in
defense of Abraham’s seed.
I close with this promise from heaven.
Verily, verily, I say unto you, ye are little
children, and ye have not as yet understood how
great blessings the Father hath in his own hands
and prepared for you;
And ye cannot bear all things now; nevertheless,
be of good cheer, for I will lead you along. [D&C
78:17–18]
I will go before your face. I will be on your right
hand and on your left, . . . and mine angels [shall
be] round about you, to bear you up. [D&C 84:88]
The kingdom is yours and the blessings thereof are
yours, and the riches of eternity are yours. [D&C
78:18]
Oh yes, “We’ll find the place which God for
us prepared.” And on the way “We’ll make the
air with music ring, Shout praises to our God
and King; Above the rest these words we’ll
tell—All is well! All is well!” (“Come, Come, Ye
Saints,” Hymns, 1985, no. 30).
In the name of Jesus Christ. Amen.

MIRROR, MIRROR

Thank you, President Oaks, and all of you.
My thanks to Dean Clark for that beautiful
prayer; I pray that it will be efficacious in my
behalf. According to Brother Robert Webb and
a recently published Richter scale of Provo
popularity, my talks on this campus rate somewhere just between the Haun’s Mill massacre
and a terminal case of acne. My goal this morning is to keep trying—keep moving forward,
perhaps to take my rightful place with the rich
flora and fauna of colorful Ethiopia.
May I say, at the outset, that much of my
message is intended to be seen against the
backdrop of President’s Day, February’s
reprieve of the winter doldrums and the
annual commemoration of the births of, among
others—including my wife—the two greatest
presidents this republic has ever known. I am
asking this morning that we look at your
college decade (the seventies) and mine (the
sixties) in the reflected light of a Washington
and a Lincoln. As I speak, consider, if you will,
their times and their trials and their gifts to us,
and it will put your own world into clearer
perspective.
Everyone I know is mad at the 1970s. One
commentator recently said if he had the chance
he would promptly bid goodbye to the seventies—“a year too early,” he thought, “but not a
moment too soon.” I presume that, with one
year remaining in this decade’s contract, 1979
would be traded to the 1980s for a fixed sum
plus six months of another year to be named in a
later round of the draft.
Of course, culture and history do not actually
happen in decades; but we find it convenient
to talk about them that way. Your parents like
to speak of the twenties—you know, the
Charleston—and some of you like to talk of the
fifties—you know, the Fonz. And thus the seventies; full, some say, of forgettable faces, books no
one could read, movies no one wanted to sit
through. It has been suggested that the nicest
thing which might be said of these last ten years
is that they were sort of “factory seconds—the
temporal equivalent of the Edsel.” A country that
once thought it could rule the world now
despairs of governing New York City.
Has there indeed been some “souring of the
national soul”? Professor Kenneth Kolson
laments—and I quote— In this decade an epidemic of cynicism [has] spread
through the country, . . . contaminating [our national
institutions] and the reservoir of good will . . . built
up among Americans over the centuries; [now] Main
Street [U.S.A. has been rendered] the moral equivalent of Pompeii.
Americans no longer revere the presidency; they
believe that every interest is represented in Congress
but the public interest; they even have little faith in
the Justices of the Supreme Court. In 1964, 78% of
a national sample . . . said that the government in
Washington can be trusted to do what is right
‘always’ or ‘most of the time.’ By 1974 [the year of
Watergate] this figure had shriveled to 36% . . .
Similarly, the percentage of those answering that the
government ‘is run for the benefit of all the people’ (as
opposed to being controlled by a few big selfish interests) declined from 64% to 25% in the same ten-year
period. . . .furthermore the erosion of public trust and
confidence is not confined to the realm of government.
The family, schools, business, the professions . . . all
seem to be experiencing serious credibility crises.
[Tom Sawyer has grown up and there in the mirror
stands Charles Manson.] [Kenneth Kolson, “The
Great Sobriety: An Epitaph for the ’70s” The
Rockford Papers, vol. 3, no. 5 (1978), pp. 1–10.]
Well, come now—tell me what can be wrong
with a decade that has brought you Jaws, Roots,
clones, Shake’n Bake, “Mork ‘n Mindy,” King
Kong (you remember him? The big fella with the
raccoon coat?), swine flu, R2D2, and frozen
yogurt. That kind of decade can’t be all bad! (See
New West, Jan. 1979.)
Part of the dilemma over the seventies stems
from the sixties (my college decade), as every
dilemma in life always stems from some other.
It was reported recently that a group of governmental advisers meeting in the White House to
discuss inflation, Iran, Taiwan, the Middle East,
public transportation, and national health—in
that order—expressed some longing for “the
benign 1960s.” Benign 1960s! I was there, folks,
and it was not benign. If the 1970s fear “a souring of the national soul,” the 1960s saw a brutal
ransacking of it, in which presidents were assassinated, cities were gutted by flame, college campuses became battlegrounds, and American boys
fought in a war more confusing than any since
father faced son across the Mason-Dixon line.
Protestations of love and freedom by the flower
children of my college generation relapsed all
too quickly into bloody rage and the enslavement of drugs and degeneracy.
As Professor Kolson has noted, the sixties
asserted that every child is entitled to a free hot
lunch; the seventies concede the worthiness of
the goal but rediscover that there is no such
thing as a free lunch, hot or cold. The sixties
urged women to put down their brooms and
take up their banners; the seventies are once
again asking if before counting the profit we
have counted the cost. The sixties adjusted educational standards to ensure that no student
would ever fail to meet them; the seventies stand
stunned at the spectacle of high school graduates
who cannot read with any facility nor write a
coherent sentence.
The sixties saw California legislators award
a ten-thousand-dollar grant for a choral group
to serenade whales, and it funded community
college courses in voodoo; the seventies saw
California pass Proposition 13. The sixties nourished the Department of Health, Education, and
Welfare, those warm friends of BYU with the
kamikaze instinct who want to fly down the
tube of the Y smokestack in what one writer
called “the Swedenization of America”; the seventies, pondering the condition of HEW in this
year of its silver jubilee, wonder how it has come
to pass that this department, which employed
35,000 people in 1954, now pays the salaries of
1,444,000 people and spends 500 million dollars
every 24 hours. As Everett Dirksen used to say:
“A billion here, a billion there—before you know
it, it adds up to real money.” We do have some
challenges in the seventies.
But for all of this, I do not think that we are
seeing “a moral Pompeii” or even a Sahara of the
spirit in our day. Public opinion surveys seem to
show consistently that Americans, rather than
being alienated from their national institutions,
are simply disgusted with their standards of
performance and are going to demand more of
them. I think the national soul has not soured,
but that people are generally unwilling to buy
any more lemons. The ultimate result should be
an improvement in public trust and confidence,
not an erosion of it.
I wish to make a distinction here between
cynicism and concern. I have concerns about
our day—a major one of which I wish to discuss
with you in some detail. But I am not cynical
and I ask you not to be. I do not believe that all
human conduct is self-serving or that all noblesounding explanations are contrived and only
mask the depravity of human motives. Cynicism
is an intellectual cop-out, a crutch for a withered
soul, a thin excuse for inaction and retreating
commitment. Do not become cynical about government or education or civic affairs or religion
or the human race or the time in which you
live. Do on the other hand, be appropriately
concerned and actively involved. We will always
need responsible, reputable, reasonable social
critics who will help in mapping the terrain and
marking the pitfalls. But we do not need what
Elder Gordon B. Hinckley once described on this
campus as “pickle suckers,” those studied in the
“sour vinegar of invective and anger.” May I
quote from Elder Hinckley’s remarks at a BYU
devotional.
The tragedy [of the pickle sucker] is that this
spirit is epidemic. . . . To hear tell these days, there is
nowhere a man of integrity among those holding public office. In many instances this spirit has become the
very atmosphere of university campuses. The snide
remark, the sarcastic gibe, the cutting down of associates—these, too often, are of the essence of our conversation. In our homes wives weep and children finally
give up under the barrage of criticism leveled by husbands and fathers. Criticism is the forerunner of
divorce, the cultivator of rebellion, sometimes a
catalyst that leads to failure. Even in the Church it
sows the seeds of inactivity and finally apostasy.
I come . . . with a plea that we stop seeking out the
storms and enjoy more fully the sunlight. I am suggesting that we “accentuate the positive.” I am asking
that we look a little deeper for the good, that we still
our voices of insult and sarcasm, that we more generously compliment virtue and effort. I am not asking
that all criticism be silenced . . . . I am not suggesting
that our conversation be all honey and blossoms. . . .
What I am . . . asking is that we turn from the
negativism that so permeates our society and look for
the remarkable good in the land and times in which
we live, that we speak of one another’s virtues more
than we speak of one another’s faults, that optimism
replace pessimism, that our faith exceed our fears.
[Gordon B. Hinckley, “Let Not Your Heart Be
Troubled,” Speeches of the Year, 1974 (Provo:
Brigham Young University Press, 1975), p. 266]
I offer that again this morning as good counsel
in a month when we honor the memory of a
George Washington or an Abraham Lincoln.
As Elder Hinckley suggests, we must have
our concerns. Life demands something more
than a ubiquitous smile button saying, “Have a
nice day.” If we need a button at all I suppose it
should say something more like “Make it a nice
day.” Part of my message this morning is that
as we exert virtuous effort in this world we can
rejoice in many good things that are central to
our faith in the Lord Jesus Christ, our family
and friends and neighbors, our Church activity,
and our life together in a choice land and in an
age unequaled in the history of this world in its
privileges and possibilities. We are not without
our solutions. Especially is it true that a faithful
Latter-day Saint is not without his or her
solutions.
I believe that for the most part our Founding
Fathers (whose monumental revolution we
again commemorated in the seventies, by the
way) were endowed with such faith. Surely
they had problems. Taxation with representation was not a heck of a lot more fun than taxation without it. They had great concerns,
but avoided cynicism and rolled up their
sleeves. Surely the presidential greatness of
Washington and Lincoln must have been in no
small measure due to the fact that they were
good, thoughtful, dignified, responsible, spiritually sensitive men before they were presidents.
For all their courage and commitment, neither
could be called a lunatic or a zealot; and for all
their burdens, they could not be called “pickle
suckers” either.
Perhaps we could do not better in this
month when we honor their birth than to use
their example, as we examine the challenge of
the 1970s or the eighties or the nineties, and to
remember something of their service and their
sacrifice. As I look at your decade—and at
those that lie ahead—I am very hopeful and
very encouraged because of what I believe. I
believe in help from both sides of the veil and
in the worth and the possibility of a human
soul. I take great strength from that oftrepeated reminder in the Doctrine and
Covenants:
Fear not, little flock . . . .
. . . Ye are little children, and ye have not as yet
understood [what] great blessings the Father hath
in his own hands and prepared for you;
. . . Be of good cheer, for I will lead you along.
[D&C 6:34, 78:17–18]
With that much introduction and assurance,
I do wish to share one concern I have. It is not
restricted to—or unique in—the 1970s. Indeed,
it is quite literally as old as Cain and Abel, having something to do with why we came to this
planet from an earlier, heavenly existence. It is
not really a challenge for governments or
schools or cities or businesses—at least not
initially. It is, rather, a challenge for individual
people—even people right here at BYU, or any
other place we might find ourselves. Some
problems seem far away and beyond our
reach—problems in places like Washington or
Teheran or Peking. But this is, if you will, a
Provo problem and you can do something
about it—in your apartments and wards and
classes, at work or in your leisure. If you do
not, then it certainly becomes a problem for
governments and schools and businesses and
families. But the real solution is in the privacy
of the human soul—yours and mine.
This concern I have is dramatized by a new
magazine that appeared on newsstands for the
first time last month. It is called Self. I know
nothing about the merits or liabilities of this
magazine; I am merely intrigued by the title:
Self. After Life and Look, to People and Us, we
have now come to Self. My concern about the
seventies, and indeed about every decade
ahead of you, is somehow suggested by that
title—by the threat of moral vision which
seems to steadily decrease until it may finally
come down to “self” only—one life wide, one
life deep, and the devil take the hindmost. The
threat I fear, in a month when we remember
two who did not suffer from it, is the threat of
self-centeredness gone amuck, or psychic insistence upon everyone doing his own thing, of
everyone getting in touch with himself at the
expense of getting in touch with anyone else.
It is the threat of a culture which has in some
ways carried accentuated individualism to the
extreme and now has the pursuit of happiness
standing paralyzed in front of a mirror, pleading, “Mirror, mirror on the wall, who’s the
fairest of them all?” We live in a time in
which there has been almost transcendent
self-attention, in which the conquest of nature
and search for new frontiers, social and otherwise, has given way to neonarcissism. The
greatest of all tasks in the 1970s appears to be
“self-realization.”
In a world where it is all hanging out,
where we have immersed ourselves in ourselves, where intimacy has gone public and
four-letter words batter our ears, we run the
risk, in our quest for instant gratification
and purely personal views of our world, of profoundly violating the two great commandments on which all others depend. We may
come to find neither love of God nor love of
neighbor but only love of ourselves. Should
that ever be so, then, as Pogo Possum would
say: “We have met the enemy and he is us.”
I say “we”: that is an editorial “we.” I am
not speaking of you and me personally so
much as I am speaking of our times, our climate, our current condition. Unfortunately,
such preoccupation with self does face us in
many locations on this globe.
You will know from the Daily Universe and
a poster or two around campus and President
Oak’s introductory remarks that I have titled
this forum address “ ‘Mirror, Mirror on the
Wall’: A Look at the ‘Me Decade.’ ” That phrase
“the Me Decade” was coined for the 1970s by
Tom Wolfe, whose strongest recommendation
is that he holds a PhD in American Studies
from Yale. While I do not agree with Wolfe’s
entire thesis, I would nevertheless like to
appropriate his title and much of his stimulating suggestions for our purposes this morning—for LDS purposes if you will—and apply
them to our life here at BYU. I repeat that this
tendency about which I am concerned is no
more linked to the seventies than it was to the
thirties or will be to the nineties, though it may
be a little more visible at some times than at
others. It is first and foremost a matter of spirit
and only incidentally a matter of society. The
principles involved are as old as the gospel is
old, and the future is as bright as every new
and everlasting covenant is always bright. Let
me briefly suggest how we got where we are,
quoting generously from Mr. Wolfe. (See
Tom Wolfe, “The Me Decade and the Great
Awakening,” Mauve Gloves and Madmen, [New
York: 1976], pp. 126–67.)
It has been in our time, yours and mine—
inflation notwithstanding—that we have seen
some significant realization of at least four centuries of utopian dreams. In this country and
largely in the last quarter of this century—your
lifetime—we have realized for many (surely
not all) in this country (though not everywhere
in this country) the potential dreamed of by
those who foresaw the three great necessities of
industrialized man: (1) surplus or discretionary
income, (2) surplus or discretionary time, and
(3) political freedom. From the end of World
War II to the 1960s this “common man” had
just about arrived. It was obviously time to
get on with the business of “realizing his
potential.”
Observing, studying, doting on, remaking,
remodeling, elevating, and polishing oneself
had always been, heretofore, an aristocratic
luxury, confined throughout most of history to
royalty since they had the time and the money
and usually the vanity to do it. By the mid1960s, however, this luxury had become available to literally millions. The equivalent of
Louis XIV’s finishing school at Versailles was
now the Esalen Institute, perched on a cliff
overlooking the Pacific in Big Sur, California.
Esalen’s specialty, as one participant put it, was
“an oil change and a lube job for your personality.” Businessmen, housewives, students,
drifters—anyone who could afford it, and by
now many could—paid $220 a week to come to
Esalen to learn about themselves, loosen up a
little, and maybe wear a jumpsuit. The primal
screams of hysterical encounter sessions roared
through the pines, startling enough to stunt a
sequoia.
What on earth was the appeal? The appeal,
on earth, was simple enough. It was, as Mr.
Wolfe suggests, the chance for each to say,
“Now let’s talk about me.” Whether or not your
personality was renovated was beside the
point; you had finally focused your entire
energy and attention (and with any luck everybody’s else’s) on the most fascinating subject on
the earth: ME—and with a live audience. Just
imagine “my life” becoming a real drama with
universal significance, analyzed just like King
Lear’s or Rasputin’s.
By this time the much-publicized hippie
communes of the 1960s, no longer big items
in the press, were becoming more and more
slanted toward pop theology, and many of the
Me movements swung in behind them. Their
neo-Gnostic religious style saw its ultimate
and most tragic expression just weeks ago in
Jonestown. Synanon, Arica, EST, scientology
had now all become religions, or so they said.
In almost any city now a strange menagerie
(as George Steiner calls them) can be seen tangoing along some sidewalk, offering “dimestore mantras and fairground meditation”
leading to instant Nirvana, or for the recalcitrant perhaps a rattlesnake in the mailbox.
Such groups as the Hare Krishna, the Sufi, and
the Mahraji Ji communes—not to mention the
Unification Church of Sun Myung Moon—
soon discovered that they could enroll thousands of new members and still make a small
fortune in real estate.
In the meantime traditional Christian
churches often strained to keep up with the
action. Modernization for them (you know—
“let’s look at ourselves”) meant a new liturgy
or new apparel or perhaps a new coffeehouse
where one might—as ever—“get in touch with
himself.” This was obviously not a time to
worry about getting in touch with God. Some
even thought it might help if the preacher put
on a turtleneck sweater and sang “Michael
Row the Boat Ashore” at Sunday evening vespers. In that transition from the sixties to the
seventies one church saw its magnificent cathedral of St. John the Divine in New York City
become the scene of a pot-smoking, anti-war
ceremony in which Norman Mailer’s dirty
words were read before the High Altar. At
nearly the same time its Grace Cathedral in San
Francisco saw Allen Ginsberg, wearing animal
robes and a deer’s head, cast images of buffalo
herds and other endangered species on the
walls and ceiling of the building—accompanied, of course, by rock music. But as one contemporary Christian said, indicating so much
that offended him, “There are no heresies in a
dead religion.” (Paul Seabury, “Trendier Than
Thou,” Harper’s, October 1978, pp.39–52).
So cathedrals and churches were active
again, but in a new way: do-it-yourself religion
had taken over, religion in which a whale or
porpoise or snail darter or lousewort, along
with any bird or blade of grass in a national
park, was entitled to greater legal protection
than a five-month-old fetus. After all—“mirror,
mirror on the wall”—it is my body, is it not? In
the 1970s some of the actors on our worldwide
stage had come to that prayer offered thirty
years ago in one of W. H. Auden’s plays:
O God, put away justice and truth for we cannot understand them and do not want them. . . .
Leave Thy heavens and come down to our earth.
Become our uncle. Look after Baby, amuse
Grandfather, escort Madam to the Opera, help
Willy with his homework, introduce Muriel to a
handsome naval officer. Be interesting and weak like
us, and [then] we will love you as we love ourselves.
[W. H. Auden, For the Time Being, 1944]
Of course, what so affects the self inevitably
affects society. As a result we have also had
great political and social challenges. A recent
column in the New York Times lamented these
narrow commercial and social concerns that
are dividing people and diverting them from
the larger question of our common good. Such
conflict between general and personal interests
has always been at the roof of political action;
but it seems more of a threat now, in a free
world when the need for cooperation in complex societies is greater than ever before. Some
examples:
In his New Year’s message to the Canadian
people, Prime Minister Trudeau was almost
pleading with his fellow countrymen to disarm
their violent tempers and to think and act, not
as French Canadians or as English Canadians,
but just as Canadians. Scarcely days later Rene
Levesque was in Washington proclaiming the virtues of violent separation and getting a
good hand from the National Press Club.
At the same time President Carter, concluding that inflation was the main threat to the
commonwealth, brought in what he called a
“lean and austere” budget (of more than half a
trillion dollars!) and ever since has been under
attack from minorities and labor for abandoning the poor and from big business and special
interests for paying too much attention to the
poor. The success of purely voluntary wage
and price controls surely remains to be seen.
The mayor of New York City, in his state of
the city message, asked for an end to factionalism and the harmful rhetoric of confrontation.
The response was a recall petition to throw him
out of office.
Even in Britain—the land of my mission,
the scene of my spiritual birth, the home of
team play and democratic responsibility—
there is such a maze of strikes and disputes
now on that no computer can, as the British
would say, keep “a proper tally.” That only
reflects the terror and chaos of other locations,
particularly Italy, the Middle East, and now
especially Iran.
May I quote from the Times article?
What is it that has brought on this [self-centered] contempt for authority? It is partly the misuse of authority in the past—imperial presidencies
leading to imperial congresses and parliaments,
greatly influenced by powerful business, labor, and
racial factions.
Beyond this, however, it is also a general feeling
among the general public of being overwhelmed by
the complexity of modern problems.
In short, [there is now] a tendency to work
within factions for limited and often selfish ends.
One hears the same refrain over the wide range of
free countries—that everybody is out for himself, so
why not do the same? [James Reston]
Part of this chaos is due to what our colleague Bruce Hafen calls “the almost endless
talk about personal liberty and self-fulfillment;
it is in the air. There are right movements
[everywhere].” (Bruce C. Hafen, “Individual
Liberty, Commitment, and Marriage,” Ensign,
December 1978, p. 14.)
It is hard, in the apple-pie tradition, to be
against rights; but consider this comment from
Alexander Solzhenitsyn:
Destructive and irresponsible freedom has
been granted boundless space [in the free world].
[Remember—this is from one who knows a great
deal about loss and lack of freedom.] [Western] society appears to have little defense against . . . human
decadence, such as . . . the misuse of liberty for
moral violence against young people [where] motion
pictures [and television and magazines are] full of
pornography, crime, and horror. This is considered
to be part of freedom, and theoretically counterbalanced by the young people’s right not to look or
accept. [But they do look and are accepting, and] life
organized [so] legalistically has thus shown its
inability to defend itself against the corrosion of evil
. . . It is time, in the West, to defend not so much
human rights as human obligations. . . .
In early democracies, as in American democracy
at the time of its birth, [those] human rights were
granted because man [was] God’s creature. That is,
freedom was given to the individual conditionally,
on the assumption of his constant religious responsibility. Such was the heritage of the preceding [two]
thousand years. Two hundred years ago—even fifty
years ago—it would have seemed quite impossible, in
America, that an individual could be granted boundless freedom simply for the satisfaction of his [basest]
instincts or whims. Subsequently, however, all such
limitations were discarded . . .; a total liberation
occurred from the moral heritage of Christian centuries, with their great reserves of mercy and sacrifice. Meanwhile, state systems were becoming
increasingly materialistic. The West ended up by . .
. enforcing human rights, sometimes even excessively, [while] man’s sense of responsibility to God
and society grew dimmer and dimmer. In the past
few decades, the legalistic, selfish aspect of Western
thinking has reached its apogee, and the world is
now in a harsh spiritual crisis and a political
impasse. All the glorified technological achievements of Progress, include the conquest of outer
space, do not redeem the twentieth century’s moral
poverty, which no one could imagine even as late as
in the nineteenth century.
[Man’s task now is of] a spiritual nature . . . .
No one on earth has any way left but—upward.
[Alexander Solzhenitsyn, “A World Split Apart,”
National Review, 7 July 1978, pp. 836–55]
One of the first gifts we receive in this
world to help us “upward” is a family. It is
obvious that marriage and family are designed
to be two of the most basic opportunities in
this world where these barriers of selfishness
and self-centeredness and moral poverty may
be overcome. In that discussion about “rights”
to which I referred, President Hafen wrote:
Not understanding the depth of the commitment
made [in a] marriage and perhaps influenced by a
seductive talk about the ‘rights to self-fulfillment,’
many in today’s world who experience marital differences [simply] leave the scene of the conflict by
either literally or figuratively divorcing themselves
from the persons they view as the source of their
frustrations.
Many of these in time will marry another person, only to find another set of conflicts and frustrations. Once again, they may leave the scene of
conflict, somehow believing that they are entitled to
live without the inconvenience of dealing with
points of view different from their own. . . . Thus,
they may never experience what it is to understand
a situation from the perspective of another person or
to subordinate their own needs to those of others. As
a result, they deprive themselves of the experiences
necessary to permit the discovery of the meaning of
love. [Hafen, “Individual Liberty,” pp. 16, 17]
In the same vein, Lois and Paul Glasser—
after reciting a litany of statistics on divorce,
one-parent families, illegitimacy, adultery, and
parental violence—say wistfully:
Is it possible that more and more young people,
and some older ones also, enter a new marital
relationship expecting instant gratification . . . for
which no effort on their part is required? Can we
hypothesize that society’s emphasis on individualism is so great that marriage is not seen as a
partnership but another place to compete for gratification of personal needs? Can it be suggested that
family life is no longer seen as a cooperative venture
among parents and children who have social responsibilities toward the group as a whole, but as a place
where each grabs what he or she can get now without endangering future rewards? [Lois and Paul
Glasser, “Hedonism and the Family,” Journal of
Marriage and Family Counseling, October 1977,
pp. 13–14]
I think that what is destroying the family,
where it is being destroyed, is what destroys
any society: it is “mirror, mirror on the wall.”
We wish to follow our own star and not be hampered by the glare of any other. Move the old
folks to Florida and put the kids in a day-care
center. That works, says Dr. Urie Bronfenbrenner,
if you’re young and rich. But if you happen to be
a child, or sick, or lonely, or old—and all of us
are at some time—then you need someone else.
In fact, you will find that you need someone
else even if you are young and rich. If that
someone is off doing his own thing, then you
are probably in trouble.
In my decade of the sixties a vast best seller
was Harris’s book, I’m OK, You’re Ok. (You
know—“mirror, mirror on the wall.”) But in
yours—the seventies—Ringer has done him
one better—in fact done him two better—by
publishing Looking Our for #1 and Winning
through Intimidation. Against such outrageous
monuments to self-interest may I set one transcendent figure with its penetrating lesson for
all mankind: He who, in Isaiah’s language
(listen carefully), “hath borne our griefs, and
carried our sorrows, . . . was wounded for our
transgressions [and] bruised for our iniquities”
(Isaiah 53:24–25). Of the innumerable accounts
from his own life and teachings—and let your
mind consider how often Christ taught the love
of God and neighbor, those elements on which
all the law and the prophets, and indeed the
gospel of Jesus Christ, hang—let me recount in
many of His own words what one writer has
called the “Doctrine of the Cross” (see A. B.
Bruce, The Training of the Twelve, [1894; reprint
ed., Grand Rapids, Mich.: Kregel Publications,
1974], pp. 281–91). It is the scriptural answer to
“looking out for number one.”
Jesus had for the third time explicitly
announced his approaching crucifixion, indicating that his death would take place in
connection with the very visit to Jerusalem
which he and his disciples were now making.
Luke notes, however, that the disciples “
understood none of these things: and this saying was hid from them, neither knew they the
things which were spoken” (Luke 18:34). They
were obviously thinking of other matters. Their
minds were possessed by some dreams and
expectations of that time when “the kingdom
of God should immediately appear” (Luke
19:11).
In the light of Jesus’ discourses on the coming of the Son of Man, undoubtedly all the disciples were looking forward to their thrones,
but James and John were for a moment seeking
the most distinguished ones. Their mother,
kneeling before the Savior, said urgently,
“Grant that these my two sons may sit, the
one on thy right hand, and the other on the left,
in thy kingdom.” We cannot fault this mother
in wishing such a noble station for her sons,
except that she is asking the Lord himself to
aid in matters of ambition and vanity, however
worthy. What was asked could not be granted
without Jesus being untrue to his own character and his habitual teachings on selfishness
and humility.
Furthermore, hers seems to be a narrow
view of the kingdom of God. It is a particularly
unwholesome court, even in a secular world,
where places of highest distinction can be
obtained by solicitation and favor—by assertion and Ringer’s intimidation, if you will—
rather than by invitation and merit.
This request apparently caused some bitterness, for it is recorded that “when the ten heard
it, they were moved with indignation against
the two brethren.” We are, at first, a bit mystified by this scene. If James and John innocently
thought that such a request would cause difficulty, they seem to be less wise than we might
have assumed. If, on the other hand, they made
the request without caring for the disaffection
that might ensue, they would appear to be selfish as well as vain.
In fact, they were neither. The gentleness of
Jesus’ reply suggests that these faithful disciples were not calculating or cruel. They were,
along with the other ten, simply children in
terms of gospel growth and education. Christ
uttered not a word of direct rebuke, but dealt
with them as a father might deal with a child
who had made a request without thinking of
the consequences. He implies no malice—only
ignorance. “Ye know not,” he said to them quietly, “what ye ask. Are ye able to drink of the
cup that I [am about to drink] . . .?
There is more than compassion or correction in this question: there is instruction,
concerning the true way of progress in the
kingdom of God. Jesus taught His disciples
that advancement in His kingdom went not
by favor or political solicitation, but rather via
dolorosa, by the way of the cross. The “palmbearers in the celestial realms of glory” will be
they who have passed through tribulation, and
the princes of the kingdom will be those who
have drunk most deeply of His cup of service
and sacrifice. For those who refused to drink
thereof—the selfish, the self-indulgent, the
purely ambitious or vain—there will be lesser places in the kingdom, places without honor
on His right hand or His left.
The startling question put to those two
apostles by Jesus did not take them by surprise.
Promptly and firmly they replied, “We are able.”
His response then: “Ye shall drink indeed of
my cup, and be baptized with the baptism that
I am baptized with.” (See Matthew 20:20–24.)
This was a strange favor, it seems to me, for
the Lord to grant. He was not mockingly offering them the cup of His suffering rather than a
throne in His kingdom, but he was obviously
very serious. However perhaps even then
James and John knew that the cup and the
throne were inextricably linked and could not
be given separately.
The elect of God usually do not look
like the prosperous publisher of a magazine
called Self or a book titled Winning through
Intimidation. More often they will be toilers,
pioneers in a sometimes unwelcome world,
turning a wilderness of complex problems into
a fruitful field with faith. They are the world’s
salt, its leaven, and its light, but they may get
little thanks for that service. This does not,
however, really matter to them because it is
scripturally certain that those who ask only
the favor—the self-fulfillment, if you will—of
being companions with Christ in tribulation
and service will be rewarded with the highest
stations in the eternal kingdom. Perhaps there
is no better argument in support of the doctrine of exaltation than W. W. Phelp’s line from
the hymn you all know: “Sacrifice brings forth
the blessings of heaven” (Hymns, no. 147). If
crosses would let us alone, I suppose we would
let them alone. We usually do not seek out the
bitter cup and the bloody baptism, but sometimes they seek us. God does draft men into
the warfare of this world; and if any come to
genuine faith and conviction as a result of it, as
many an impressed soldier has done, it will be
a faith and conviction which at least in the first
flames of battle, he did not particularly covet.
The single greatest feature in the lesson
which Jesus gave His disciples here is the
contrast between His kingdom and the other
kingdoms of this earth. Both the way of acquiring position and the means of exerting authority
were dramatically different. His message to
them was that earthly kingdoms were then
being ruled by a class of people who possessed
hereditary rank, or by those who sought favors
from them. The governing class were those
whose birthright was to rule, and whose boast it
was never to have been in a servile position. In
His kingdom, on the other hand, a man could
only become great—a ruler, if you will—by first
being the servant to those over whom he is to
bear rule. In the divine commonwealth, only
they rule who account it a privilege to serve.
Having explained by contrast the great
principles of the spiritual kingdom over those
of mortal men, Jesus next enforced the doctrine
by a reference to His one example. “Whosoever
will be chief among you,” He said to the
Twelve, “let him be your servant:” and then He
added: “Even as the Son of man came not to be
ministered unto, but to minister, and to give his
life a ransom for many.” (Matthew 20:27–28.)
These words were spoken by Jesus as one
who claimed to be a king, and who was indeed
ordained in the very councils of heaven to be
the first in a great and mighty kingdom. So the
Lord is setting himself forth here not merely as
an example of humility, but as one who must
illustrate for us all that the way to power in
the spiritual world is through service, not
intimidation; it is loss of self, not obsession
with self, that brings those otherwise mystical
icons—meaning and fulfillment and happiness.
The truth of the matter is that He would one
day be ministered to by legions—yes, worlds—
of willing, devoted people, acknowledging
Him as their Lord and King. Every knee would
someday bow and every tongue confess. The
point on which He wishes to fix the attention
of his disciples here, however, is the peculiar way in which He must work to obtain that
crown. In effect he says:
“I am a King, and I expect one day to claim
my kingdom; James and John are not mistaken
in that respect. But I will obtain my kingdom
differently from the way secular princes get
theirs. They get their thrones by succession or
intimidation or selfishness; I will get mine by
personal merit alone. They secure their kingdom by right of birth or bombast; I hope to
secure mine by the right of service. They
inherit their subjects, but I will need to buy
mine, with the payment of my body and my
blood.”
. . . Whosoever will be chief among you, let him
be your servant:
Even as the Son of man came not to be ministered unto, but to minister, and to give his life a
ransom for many.
With that one thought I close. Please, please,
do not misunderstand my message this morning. Surely you know that I am not speaking
against self-improvement. I am certainly not
speaking against self-worth. Those are precisely
the things of which I am speaking. I simply
believe that real improvement and worth and
fulfillment are demonstrated to us in the life of
the Master and not at the Esalen Institute.
Above all, I have not wanted to sound like a
pickle-sucker. It was H. L. Mencken who defined
a Puritan as one who had the uneasy, insatiable,
gnawing fear that someone somewhere was
having a good time. I hope you know me better
than that. I love you very much and I wish for
you the profoundest kind of joy and fulfillment
in this world.
It is just that I believe the source—the
source—of meaning and fulfillment and joy in
our lives is not egocentric—it does not originate in us, but lies elsewhere. We then tap that
source and cause it to flow to us when we
reach out and reach up. To quote President
Kimball and to conclude:
I have learned that . . . when we are engaged in
the service of our fellowmen, not only do our deeds
assist them, but we put our own problems in a
fresher perspective . . . . In the midst of the miracle
of serving, there is the promise of Jesus, that by
losing ourselves we find ourselves.
Not only do we “find” ourselves in terms of
acknowledging guidance in our lives, but the more
we serve our fellowmen in appropriate ways, the
more substance there is to our souls . . . . Indeed, it
is easier to “find” ourselves because there is so
much more of us to find. [Spencer W. Kimball,
Ensign, December 1974, p. 2]
George Washington and Abraham Lincoln
and Pat and Jeff Holland—and all the prophets
of God—ask for you a rich life, sacred liberty,
and the successful pursuit of happiness—this
year, this decade, and all your life. And as you
seek those inalienable rights, may we ask you
also to pay heed to your enduring sense of
obligation. In the name of Jesus Christ. Amen.

SOUL-BUTTER AND HOGWASH

and children, and, finally, full circle, on a raft
floating down that first powerful river. In spite
of that genuinely bitter pessimism ahead, that
is somehow where Sam Clemens ultimately
remained—on the river, on the line, in
between, divided and dividing. He could not
live with traditional American Protestantism,
but he could not live without feelings of innate
religious hunger either. East or west, so much
was, in Huck’s phrase, simply “hogwash,”
but occasionally there was that genuine soulbutter, too, and an almost desperate need for it.
As Huck said about this lifelong anxiety that
seemed always to be marking Twain:
Sometimes the widow would take me to one side and
talk about providence in a way to make a body’s
mouth water; but maybe the next day Miss Watson
would take hold and knock it all down again. I
judged I could see that there was two providences,
and a chap would stand considerable show with the
widow’s providence, but if Miss Watson’s got him
there wasn’t no help for him anymore. I thought it
all out, and reckoned I would belong to the widow’s
if he wanted me, thought I couldn’t make out how
he was a going to be any better off than what he was
before, seeing I was ignorant, and so kind of low
down and awnry. [Writings 8:16]
Sitting one evening in the darkened Hartford
home of their friends, the Charles Dudley
Warners, Sam and Livy Clemens watched a
beautiful full moon rise outside the large bay
window. The faithful Clemens housekeeper
Katy Leary later reported:
Suddenly Mr. Clemens got right up without any
warnin’ and began singin’ one of them Negro spirituals. A lady that was there told me he just stood up
with both his eyes shut and began to sing kind of
soft like—a faint sound, just as if there was a wind
in the trees, she said: and he kept right on singin’
kind of low and sweet, and it was beautiful and
made your heart ache. And he kept on singin’ and
singin’ and became kind of lost in it, and he was all
lit up—his face was. ‘Twas somethin’ from another
world, she said, and when he got through, he put his
hands up to his head, just as though all the sorrow
of them Negroes was upon ‘im; and then he began to
sing, “Nobody Knows the Trouble I Got, Nobody
Knows but Jesus”. . . . When he came to the end, to
the glory hallelujah, he gave a great shout—just like
them Negroes do—he shouted out the “Glory,
Glory, Hallelujah.” They said it was wonderful and
none of them would forget it as long as they lived.
[Katy Leary (with Mary Lawton), A Lifetime
with Mark Twain, p. 213]
And the world and American literature will
never forget him

REMEMBERED AND NOURISHED

I
really don’t want to apologize for being
here, but I apologize in the sense that you
are used to a General Authority. You will
understand, however, that it is general conference week and a very busy time for them. So
you do not have a General Authority. In me,
you do not even have a specific authority. In
me, you do not even have any authority at all.
So I pray that you will be patient and that the
Lord will provide. I feel a little bit like the
politician who, after his fact-filled address,
asked if there were any questions. There was
only one: “Yes, who else is running?” Tonight,
no one else is running, and I pray that you
don’t.
I’m deeply grateful for your attendance;
I realize that you’ve been in meetings since six
o’clock this morning. Somebody said the definition of a Mormon is one planning for, going
to, sitting in, thinking about, or coming from
a meeting. That is really the idea about which
I want to speak tonight, but I have no illusions
about why you’re here (except perhaps in the
case of the missionaries—I exclude them). But
for the rest of you, don’t kid me! I know why
you’re here. I didn’t just fall off the turnip
truck, you know. I see you out there, and you
haven’t looked up here to the podium once.
Your vision is all horizontal, lateral. I can hear
on the great eternal sound system what you
fellows are thinking: “She is here. She said she
might not come, but she’s here. I think a strategically timed stroll to the water fountain
would do it.” She’s saying, “Oh, he’s here! He’s
here! but he’s with her.” I know your thoughts;
I went to this school.
Now I’ll tell the only boy-girl story that I
know and get right on with my message. It’s
really President Tanner’s story. It’s about the
very shy, reticent young man who dated a girl
for quite a while. She had waited through a
mission and most of an educational career.
He wasn’t given to a lot of talk anyway (which
was one of the things that bothered her), but
one night he finally summoned up the
supreme, ultimate courage and said this one
line: “Will you marry me?” Well, she exploded.
“Oh, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes, yes! Where
shall we have the reception? What colors do
you think will be best for the bridesmaids?
What about the open house? We ought to call
mother!” She went on and on and on for I suppose thirty minutes and didn’t take a breath.
He just sat there in his silent, eloquent way. Finally she realized that she had monopolized
the conversation. She said, “Oh, sweetheart,
I’m so sorry. Say something. Say something.
Don’t let me capture all of the splendor of this
moment.” To which, after some silence, he said,
“I think I’ve said too much already.”
It’s a great thing to belong to a church that
brings us together. I have worried about,
prayed about, and struggled over the message
that I might give to you tonight, and I’m giving
the message I feel I should. It is not a message
that I might usually give, but through the
blessing and timeliness of the calendar, it may
be the kind of message that I will not have
the opportunity to give you ever again so
appropriately.
Purposes of Church Meetings
You do not have a General Authority here
tonight because of general conference. And it
is about general conference that I wish to
speak. It is also about other conferences, not
unlike that in which you now gather, that I
also wish to speak. That is why I say it is great
to belong to a church that brings us together.
“And see that the church meet together often,”
the Lord directs the priesthood; “it is expedient
that the church meet together often” (D&C
20:55, 75). The same counsel was given to the
Nephites (see Mosiah 18:25). But let me specifically suggest why, as it seems to me, the Lord
asks us to come together—specifically at general conference, about which I wish to say
more, but in part at firesides and sacrament
meetings and family home evenings and family prayers and other kinds of conferences that
we hold before the Lord.
Section 43 of the Doctrine and Covenants
comes from a very, very rich period of Church
history. It was one of those forty-five- or sixtyday periods in which the blessings and the revelations of the Lord were pouring out. You will
note from the sequence of sections that within
this period we have received section 42 containing the law of the Church, section 46
enumerating the gifts of the spirit, and other
revelations. I quote from section 43:
And now, behold, I give unto you a commandment, that when ye are assembled together ye shall
instruct and edify each other, that ye may know
how to act and direct my church, how to act upon
the points of my law and commandments, which I
have given.
And thus ye shall become instructed in the law
of my church, and be sanctified by that which ye
have received, and ye shall bind yourselves to act in
all holiness before me. . . .
And ye are to be taught from on high. Sanctify
yourselves and ye shall be endowed with power.
[D&C 43:8–9, 16]
Administratively, ecclesiastically, in terms
of priesthood power, that seems to be a marvelous description of what is supposed to
happen when we come together: instruction,
edification, ultimately sanctification, that we
may “bind” ourselves “to act in all holiness”
before him.
Now, I assume that binding may have a
couple of meanings. It surely means to bind
ourselves to him, that we come together under
covenant. Remember it is the church which is
called to meet together—those who have made
promises to the Lord. But I suspect it also means
that we bind ourselves together, to each other,
to act before God as a church ought to act, to
administer in the affairs of his law, to see that
the Church is what the Church is supposed to
be, and to in fact see that the kingdom comes.
Now that’s part of what we do, I think, when
we get together and participate in that kind of
binding. Let me read one more verse. It is one
of the last lines Moroni gives before closing his
book:
And after they had been received unto baptism,
and were wrought upon and cleansed by the power
of the Holy Ghost, they were numbered among the
people of the church of Christ; and their names
were taken, that they might be remembered and
nourished by the good word of God, to keep them
in the right way, to keep them continually watchful
unto prayer, relying alone upon the merits of
Christ, who was the author and the finisher of
their faith.
And the church did meet together oft, to fast
and to pray, and to speak one with another concerning the welfare of their souls.
And they did meet together oft to partake of
bread and wine in remembrance of the Lord Jesus.
And they were strict to observe that there should
be no iniquity among them. [Moroni 6:4–7]
I suppose there may be a branch president
or a high councilor or an elders quorum president or a visiting teacher in the room who
wants to know what it is we are to accomplish
as Church members when we get together,
even if it’s only in a home evening group or an
opportunity to pray together. Well, this
passage indicates that it may have something
to do with remembering each other. We all
count. Everyone matters. We have a name and
it’s recorded and we need to remember that
here. No one must get lost. “And their names
were taken, that they might be remembered
and nourished by the good word of God. . .
to keep them continually watchful unto prayer,
relying alone upon the merits of Christ . . .
to fast and to speak with one another concerning the welfare of their souls . . . to observe
that there should be no iniquity among
them”—what a great thought about meetings
and what they are supposed to do, what a
Sunday School class can be, what a scriptural
discussion in an apartment can be.
History of General Conferences
Well, we’ve been having conferences and
meetings of that kind for a long, long time. I
don’t know when the first was held—in a very
private sense I suppose it was held in the
Garden of Eden. More publicly, in any sense
that we could talk about a general conference,
I suppose the first is the one described in
section 107 of the Doctrine and Covenants. You
will recall that passage describes the moment
when Adam calls together his posterity in the
valley of Adam-ondi-Ahman and there prophesies, to the very last generation of his family,
about what would befall his people. And it
says, “The Lord appeared unto them, and they
rose up and blessed Adam, and called him
Michael” (see D&C 107:41–57). That kind of
gathering, to receive the word of the Lord, has
continued ever since.
King Benjamin’s sermon—for which he had
to bring people together in such a crowd that
they could not all see him or hear him, for
which he had to build a tower and distribute
a multilithed text of his talk—gave us the first
example of the Conference Report, I suppose.
That’s part of the reason we have the Ensign.
Every May and November we have a new
religious text. Like King Benjamin, President
Kimball wants the text to be heard and to be
read. If we’re not all able to crowd into the
Tabernacle, as King Benjamin’s people were
not, then it is important that we see and hear
and read as much as we can. The Conference
Report becomes scripture to us in our own day.
Christ, on both continents, held those kinds of
conferences—on mountaintops, by the seashore,
in a boat, in an upper room. He held them
almost anywhere and everywhere because the
people hungered and thirsted for the kind of
message that comes by the voice of the Lord.
How hungry and thirsty are we? Let me
read you one general conference address given
by the Savior, or at least the conclusion of it:
I perceive that ye are weak, that ye cannot
understand all my words which I am commanded
of the Father to speak unto you at this time.
Therefore, go ye unto your homes, and ponder
upon the things which I have said. . . .
But now I go unto the Father, and also to show
myself unto the lost tribes of Israel, for they are not lost unto the Father, for he knoweth whither he hath
taken them.
And it came to pass that when Jesus had thus
spoken, he cast his eyes round about again on the
multitude, and beheld they were in tears, and did
look steadfastly upon him as if they would ask him to
tarry a little longer with them. [3 Nephi 17:2–5]
They were so sensitive and appreciative.
Apparently no one was saying anything. No
one said aloud, “Won’t you stay? We’re not
tired. We haven’t even noticed that we haven’t
eaten all day. Won’t you stay?” They said it
with their eyes and with their spirits, however.
And he said unto them: Behold, my bowels are
filled with compassion towards you.
Have ye any that are sick among you? . . .
. . . and he did heal them everyone as they were
brought forth unto him.
And they did all, both they who had been healed
and they who were whole, bow down at his feet, and
did worship him; and as many as could come for
the multitude did kiss his feet, insomuch that they
did bathe his feet with their tears.
And it came to pass that he commanded that
their little children should be brought. . . .
. . . he wept, . . . and he took their little children,
one by one, and blessed them, and prayed unto the
Father for them.
And when he had done this he wept again;
. . . and [he] said unto them: Behold your little
ones.
And as they looked to behold they cast their eyes
towards heaven, and they saw the heavens open, and
they saw angels descending out of heaven as it were
in the midst of fire; and they came down and encircled those little ones about and they were encircled
about with fire; and the angels did minister unto
them. [3 Nephi 17:6–7, 9–11, 21–24]
If there is a more touching scene in all scripture anywhere, I don’t know where it is. I hope
everyone cared enough to attend that kind of
conference. I hope no one stayed home that day.
Perhaps there was a ball game on, or the
gardening needed to be done, or some very
legitimate work in the basement. But if anybody stayed home from the general conference
that is just concluding in 3 Nephi 17, I can
promise you that he must have surely missed
what has to be, for me, one of the greatest
moments ever recorded in scripture anywhere.
What would it have been like to hear the
Savior pray?
He himself also knelt upon the earth; and behold
he prayed unto the Father, and the things which
he prayed cannot be written, and the multitude did
bear record. . . .
. . . The eye hath never seen, neither hath the ear
heard, before, so great and marvelous things as we
saw and heard Jesus speak unto the Father. [3
Nephi 17:15, 16]
How do you “see” a prayer? What did they
see? I don’t know. It cannot be written. No one
has ever been able to record what this group
both saw and heard Jesus speak unto the Father.
Surely no basement, no garden, no ball game
was worth missing that. I don’t know any
more about it than what I read here, but I am
confident it was glorious to those in attendance.
Of course the early Church continued its
general conferences. You’ll remember in the
first book of Acts that Peter called the Church
together. The attendance figure given is 120.
That’s interesting. I wonder whether that meant
some sort of conference by invitation or
whether it meant that the antagonism and the
antipathy and the emotion of what had just
been experienced, both in terms of Roman persecution and Jewish persecution and the death
of the Savior, meant that we now had a church
of only 120. Remember the five thousand that
met out on the hill? It was four thousand on
another occasion and probably in the thousands
frequently. Now we’ve got 120. I don’t know
whether that’s the entire Church or not, but it is
at least a general conference of some sort (or a general priesthood meeting) in which Peter, the
presiding officer of the Church, calls the
brethren together and says that they have to fill
the quorum and go on with the work of the
Lord. Of course, they do so in a dramatic and
impressive way.
All of this is only to suggest that we come
down in our own day to the work of the Lord,
to continue the work of Adam and of King
Benjamin and of Christ and of Peter after him.
Now we meet at the feet of President Spencer
W. Kimball, whom I testify with all my heart
to be a prophet. Whatever else I may choose
to say at the conclusion of this talk, I need you
to know that I know this with all my heart.
General Conferences Early in this
Dispensation
The practice of holding a Church conference
in our dispensation was officially initiated on
April 6, 1830, the same day that the Church was
organized. At that time this very small congregation was called upon to ratify something (a
brief document) called the Articles an Covenants
of the Church.
It stipulated:
The several elders composing this Church of
Christ are to meet in conference once in three
months, or from time to time as said conferences
shall direct or appoint;
And said conferences are to do whatever church
business is necessary to be done at that time. . . .
It shall be the duty of the several churches, composing the church of Christ, to send one or more of
their teachers to attend the several conferences held
by the elders of the church. [D&C 20:61–62, 81]
Pursuant to that instruction given by the
Lord the day the Church was organized, the
first conference thereafter was held, as directed,
three months later—on June 9, 1830, in the
Peter Whitmer, Sr., home of Fayette, Seneca
County, New York. Approximately thirty members assembled in this very small home, which I
hope you have had a chance to visit. According
to the minutes which were taken by Oliver
Cowdery, Joseph Smith, Jr., read the fourteenth
chapter of Ezekiel and then offered prayer. If I
were to call for a response, how many of you
could tell me what is contained in the fourteenth chapter of Ezekiel? That’s an interesting
text for the first conference of the Church. I
would not have known, quite frankly, what was
in the fourteenth chapter until I reviewed this
history and read it again. May I invite you to do
so, and then may I invite you to compare it
with the first section of the Doctrine and
Covenants, which as you know is called the
“preface” to this dispensation. Would you see if
there is any theme in Ezekiel’s chapter fourteen
which would link it with section one of the
Doctrine and Covenants, which of course had
not yet been revealed? I leave with you the invitation to read Ezekiel 14 and D&C section one.
Joseph Smith in his own diary supplemented the minutes of Oliver Cowdery and documented that they sang a song and partook of
the sacrament and then received by unanimous
voice the Articles and Covenants of the Church.
Oliver Cowdery ordained Samuel Smith an
elder, and Joseph Smith, Sr., and Hyrum Smith
were ordained priests. At this conference:
Much exhortation and instruction was given and
the Holy Ghost was poured out upon us in a miraculous manner. Many of our number prophesied whilst
others had the heavens opened to their view. . . . The
goodness and the condescension of a merciful God
unto such as obeying the everlasting gospel of our
Lord Jesus Christ combined to create within us a
sensation of rapturous gratitude and inspire us
with fresh zeal and energy in the cause of truth.
[Times and Seasons, 4:23]
If there has ever been given a line about the
purpose of a general conference of the Church
or a stake conference of the Church or a sacrament meeting of the Church, it surely could be
that: “[It] combined to create within us a sensation of rapturous gratitude and inspire us
with fresh zeal and energy in the cause of
truth.”
Fourteen years later John Taylor, soon to
be the President of the Church, said of this
experience:
A few men assembled in a log cabin; they saw
visions of heaven, and gazed upon the eternal world;
they looked through the rent vista of futurity, and
beheld the glories of eternity; they were laying the
foundation for the salvation of this world.
[Documentary History of the Church, 6:295]
Sidney Rigdon, who was to have difficulties
of his own, said fourteen years later:
We knew. . . that the Church would become as large
as it is today. We were as big then as we ever shall
be. We began to talk like men in authority and
power. . . . If we did not see these very people [who
fourteen years later were before them], we saw by
vision the Church of God, a thousand times larger
. . . . , although we were then not enough to well
man a farm. . . . all the Elders, all the members met
in conference in a room twenty feet square. . . . We
talked about people coming as doves to the windows;
and nations should flock into it. . . . We talked such
big things that most men could not bear them.
[Documentary History of the Church, 6:289. The
first conference that Sidney Rigdon could have
attended personally was held in January 1831.
This may have been the one to which he was
referring.]
Take the opportunity, if you can, to be in
Salt Lake City sometime this next weekend.
Ask yourself if the doves are flocking to the
windows and if from every nation there are
not those representatives of the church and
kingdom of God coming. Whatever talk
Oliver and Sidney and the Prophet Joseph and
the Whitmers had, however big it must have
seemed to all twenty or thirty in attendance, I
suppose—could they have seen it—they
would not have imagined what salvation of
men they were in fact initiating.
Modern General Conferences
From that day to this, general conferences
have been held under the commandment of
God and have provided us with opportunities
to note our growth and to reassess our faith and
to recommit our efforts. I noticed something
last night in the Church News. (I hope you read
the Church News.) These are the opening lines
on page one. The purpose of general conference, according to President Spencer W.
Kimball, is to
“refresh our faith, strengthen our testimonies, and
learn the ways of the Lord from his duly appointed
and authorized servants.” With the opening of the
146th Semiannual General Conference of the Church
on October first in the Tabernacle on Temple Square,
members of the Church in many parts of the world
will have a chance to be refreshed, strengthened, and
taught. “For me conference is really a happy time . . . .
I have always enjoyed conference. I always come
away from conference with a new resolve that I will
do better.” [Church News, 25 September 1976]
President Kimball leaving conference, committed to do better! How does that make the rest of
us feel? I suppose that you and I can profit from
that kind of commitment to an event that is
about to take place. Institutionally, and in a
very dramatic way, we are allowed to see that
which is the lifeblood of this Church.
Revelation
Joseph Smith once said that the Book of
Mormon is the keystone of our religion. Why
is the Book of Mormon the keystone of our religion? What is the Book of Mormon? Whatever
else it is, it is revelation. In fact, it is a revelation
about revelation. It is the basic document by
which we would begin to testify to the world,
with a copy in our hands, that the heavens are
opened and that God lives and that he speaks and that Jesus is the Christ. That is a basic
message of salvation. And the process by which
that message comes is revelation. And Joseph
Smith taught that that is the characteristic of
this Church, a characteristic by which it will
always be known and recognized. This weekend will be a most majestic example of revelation. Surely in terms of numbers and impact
and scope and concentration and power and
priesthood we will learn anew, as a church, that
God does live, that Jesus is the Christ, that the
heavens are opened, that there are living
prophets alive and well in the Salt Lake
Tabernacle. They will be on television, and people can see and hear them and respond to their
testimony if they will.
I do not minimize the revelations that come
privately. I do not minimize in any sense, as
you would know, the revelation that comes to
a stake president or to a bishop or to a Relief
Society president or to a father and mother.
But I am saying simply as a declaration to this
world that the heavens are open in a much
broader way. I quote Joseph Smith: “Salvation
cannot come without revelation. It is vain for
anyone to minister without it. . . . The plea of
many in this day is that we have no right to
receive revelations; but if we do not get revelations, then we do not have oracles of God; and
if they do not have oracles of God, they are not
the people of God” (Teachings of the Prophet
Joseph Smith, pp. 160, 272). Well, we are the people of God, because we have oracles who
receive revelation. We cannot with impunity act
as if this were any other weekend. It is not. It
never has been. It never will be. It is the most
dramatic moment in any six-month period of
the year, wherein the power and the ability and
the voice of the Lord are made manifest to the
inhabitants of this earth, and that includes the
students at Brigham Young University.
I have here a sheaf of quotes of which I will
not read all, but I would like to read you two.
One is from John Taylor about the role of a
prophet in this Church, that thing by which this
Church is known. John Taylor said:
We require a living tree—a living fountain—living
intelligence, proceeding from the living priesthood in
heaven, through the living priesthood on earth. And
from the time that Adam first received a communication from God, to the time that John, on the isle of
Patmos, received his communication, or Joseph
Smith had the heavens opened to him, it always
required new revelations, adapted to the peculiar circumstances in which the churches or individuals
were placed. Adam’s revelation did not instruct
Noah to build his ark; nor did Noah’s revelation tell
Lot to forsake Sodom; nor did either of these speak of
the departure of the children of Israel from Egypt.
These all had revelations for themselves, and so did
Isaiah, Jeremiah, Ezekiel, Jesus, Peter, Paul, John,
and Joseph. And so must we, or we shall make
a shipwreck. [Gospel Kingdom, p. 34]
I remember President Harold B. Lee’s last
conference as vividly as if it were yesterday. I
remember him leaning across the pulpit and
sort of sliding his text aside and looking at the
people in the audience. This is what he said at
his last conference:
Now, you Latter-day Saints, I think you’ve never
attended a conference where in these three days you
have heard more inspired declarations on most every
subject and problem about which the world is worrying. If you want to know what the Lord would have
the Saints know and to have his guidance and direction for the next six months, get a copy of the proceedings of this conference, and you will have the
latest word of the Lord as far as the Saints are concerned. And [also] all others who are not of us, but
who believe what has been said has been “the mind
of the Lord, the will of the Lord, and the voice of the
Lord, and the power of God unto salvation.”
(D&C 68:4) [Ensign, January 1974, p. 128] Within three months of that conference
President Lee was gone, leaving that powerful
testimony with us.
Elijah’s General Conference
Conference can do a great deal to caution
us if we need cautioning. I’m reminded of one
general conference that was not as pleasant as
some we’ve described. This is what the Lord
said about Ahab. It is not the kind of thing that
I personally would want to record in my
Treasures of Truth, but this is what was said:
“Ahab the son of Omri did evil in the sight of
the Lord above all that were before him. . . .
And Ahab made a grove; and Ahab did more to
provoke the Lord God of Israel to anger than all
the kings, of Israel that were before him” (1
Kings 16:30, 33). That’s not a great thing to have
said about you, but I suppose, if you need it,
someone should say it.
You’ll recall the story that Elijah comes
under the direction of the Lord and calls
down a famine, a drought, in which there is no
rain and no product from the fields. Then after
three years the Lord calls Elijah out of the
mountains, where he has been fed by ravens
and has drunk water at the brook Cherith. He
comes down out of the mountain and faces
Ahab, who walks up and says with alarm or
disbelief—or both—“Art thou he who troubleth
Israel?” (1 Kings 18:17). It hasn’t been a great
three years for Elijah. (I don’t know what ravens
bring this season, but it’s not a heavy menu.)
Elijah confesses that, in the name of the Lord,
he has been the cause of Israel’s grief. He then
says that he would like to call a general conference:
Now therefore send, and gather to me all Israel
unto mount Carmel, and the prophets of Baal, four
hundred and fifty. [“I’ve got a general conference
address I want to give.”] . . .
Let them [the priests of Baal] give us two
bullocks; and let them choose one bullock for themselves, and cut it in pieces, and lay it on wood, and
put no fire under: and I will dress the other bullock,
and lay it on wood, and put no fire under;
And call ye on the name of your gods, and I
will call on the name of the Lord: and the God that
answereth by fire, let him be God. And all the people
answered and said, It is well spoken. [1 Kings 18:19,
23–24]
You can just hear that murmur, their response,
right out of the tabernacle, can’t you?
And they [the priests of Baal] took the bullock
which was given them, and they dressed it, and
called on the name of Baal from morning even until
noon, saying, O Baal, hear us. But there was no
voice, nor any that answered. And they leaped upon
the altar which was made. [1 Kings 18:26]
They were getting a little nervous by about
noon and they were sort of leaping around,
crashing into the altar a little bit. It was a lot
less formal than what had happened about
eight o’clock in the morning. The pressure was
on them.
Now at this point Elijah removed himself
slightly from the traditional prophetic role. By
and large, prophets do not mock their opposition. But, as I said, this had not been a particularly pleasant three years for him either. And
so at noon, when everyone was getting nervous
and crashing into the altar as they did their
chanting, Elijah was over resting on a chaise
lounge nearby. He’d just been watching. It wasn’t his turn yet. The scripture says, “It came to
pass at noon, that Elijah mocked them” (1 Kings
18:27). (That’s why I say it’s not the traditional
prophetic role, but the tenth-century B.C. equivalent of “ha, ha, ha, ha, ha!” Elijah mocked
them and said something like this: “Cry louder.
The problem obviously is volume. You’ve got to
get up there with this message. Cry louder.
Surely he’s there; there’s no question about that.
Perhaps he’s talking—you know, been in a long
conversation. His wife’s worried about the
petunias, and perhaps she’s talking to him
about them. Or perhaps he’s ‘pursuing.’ Maybe
he’s in the basement woodworking and they
don’t have a phone down there. Or perhaps he’s
on a journey. Or perhaps he’s sleeping and must
be awakened. Surely there is some good reason
why he doesn’t answer you, and I think volume
is the answer. Cry louder.” The fun thing is that
the next line reads, “They cried louder.” They
were taking advice from any source by noon.
“And [they] cut themselves after their manner
with knives and lancets, till the blood gushed
out upon them” (1 Kings 18:28). You can tell they
were really concerned. They weren’t just running
into the altar now; this was serious business.
“And it came to pass, when midday was past,
and they prophesied until the time of the offering of the evening sacrifice” (1 Kings 18:29)—
probably six o’clock at night. They may have
gone as long as twelve hours, and Elijah hadn’t
even had his chance yet. The priests had gotten
nowhere. There sat that bullock and no fire.
“There was neither voice, nor any to answer, nor
any that regarded. And Elijah said unto all the
people, Come near unto me” (1 Kings 18:29–30).
The time was nearly gone. If there was to be a
sacrifice it would have to be very soon. Elijah
would have no time to do any of their chants, to
march around the altar, or to cut himself.
And all the people came near unto him [Elijah]. And
he repaired the altar of the Lord that was broken
down.
And Elijah took twelve stones, according to the
number of the tribes of the sons of Jacob, unto whom
the word of the Lord came, saying, Israel shall be thy
name:
And with the stones he built an altar in the name
of the Lord: and he made a trench about the altar, as
great as would contain two measures of seed.
And he put the wood in order, and cut the bullock
in pieces, and laid him on the wood, and said, Fill four
barrels with water, and pour it on the burnt sacrifice,
and on the wood.
And he said, Do it the second time. And they did
it the second time. And he said, Do it the third time.
And they did it the third time.
And the water ran round about the altar; and he
filled the trench also with water. [1 Kings 18:30–35]
And now with this sacrifice soaked, saturated,
drenched—wood, bullock, stone, and sand—”it
came to pass at the time of the offering of the
evening sacrifice, that Elijah the prophet came
near” (1 Kings 18:36). I declare to you that that
line is explicitly used. This crowd had just seen
450 cheap imitations. They had heard all kinds of
prayers and all kinds of strange incantations.
And now here came this thin little man who had
been away for three years. The record describes
him in the word of God as “Elijah the prophet”
(emphasis added). That’s exactly what he was.
And he knelt down and said:
Lord God of Abraham, Isaac, and of Israel, let it be
known this day that thou art God in Israel, and that I
am thy servant, and that I have done all these things
at thy word.
Hear me, o Lord, hear me, that this people may
know that thou art the Lord God, and that thou hast
turned their heart back again.
Then the fire of the Lord fell, and consumed the
burnt sacrifice, and the wood, and the stones, and the
dust, and licked up the water that was in the trench.
And when all the people saw it, they fell on
their faces: and they said, The Lord, he is the God; the
Lord, he is the God. [1 Kings 18:36–39]
“And Elijah came unto all the people, and
said, How long halt ye between two opinions?
if the Lord be God, follow him: but if Baal, then
follow him. . . . I, even I only, remain a prophet
of the Lord” (1 Kings 18:21–22). I think we all
need a little fire of the Lord to fall into our lives.
I think we do, in fact, fall prey to the very kind
of idol worship which Joseph describes in
Ezekiel 14 and D&C section one—the very kind
of idol worship which has beset the priests of
Baal and their groves. Elijah asked, “How long
will it go on? Will it go on forever and ever and
ever? Will not Israel ever, ever cease to follow
those false gods which have attracted and lured and offered their enticements since time began?
How long? O Lord God of Abraham, Isaac, and
Jacob, how long?”
Benefits from Modern Conferences
This weekend the Lord goes on record one
more time with the truth. Are you wondering
whether you should go on a mission or not?
I’ll bet you dollars to doughnuts you hear an
answer this weekend. Do you think you ought to
get a year’s supply or prepare your families? I’d
be willing to bet that you hear something about
that this weekend. Are you worried about
prayer? Are you worried about charity? Are you
uncertain about the Book of Mormon? I’ll bet
you will hear about all of those this weekend.
Somewhere, sometime, those testimonies are
going to be borne, because they always have and
they always will, because, like Elijah, President
Spencer W. Kimball and his associates will go
before us and declare that they are indeed
prophets, seers, and revelators in the only true
and living church on the face of the earth. That
says something about the power of the prophet.
That is what these young missionary men and
women on this side of the hall are going to say to
the world. And if we can say it well enough, if
we can believe it and honor it enough, I believe
we’ll get a chance to tell the world why we know
that Jesus is the Christ and what that means in
our day, in a living church in 1976.
I suggested earlier that there are other
kinds of conferences besides general conferences.
I wish I had time to talk about them. I believe
with all my heart that sacrament meeting is a
conference, made more available than once in six
months.
I suggest that family home evening is a conference, both now as students and when you
have your own families. I wish I could tell you
about the experience that Pat and I had while we
were in graduate school, which (short of this last
130 days) was the busiest time I’ve ever had in
my life. We made a couple of promises to ourselves then: first, that we would continue to
“date” each other, even without any money or
without any time; second, that even with two little children, both small enough not to know if
we didn’t, we would never miss a family home
evening. Someday maybe I can tell you what
those promises have meant in our lives.
I wish we could take time to talk about what
kinds of conferences you can have with each
other, one on one. A marvelous, touching, beautiful story was told to me just the other day
about a girl that I had tried to reach and could
not, that her mother had tried to reach and could
not, that her bishop had tried to reach and could
not, that her stake president had tried to reach
and could not. Nobody could reach her—except
her girlfriend, who took her by the collar, shook
her, started to cry, and said, “Don’t you see?
Don’t you see what you’re doing to me? You
break my heart!” She sobbed. She just shook,
and she shook her friend. That girl, when
nobody (it appeared) on the face of this earth
could touch her, is in the Church. With the help
of her bishop, she is on the way to repentance in
as dramatic and as beautiful and as glowing a
way as I have ever seen in my life. I could not
reach her; her mother could not reach her; her
bishop could not reach her; but a friend reached
her and literally grabbed her and shook her and
said, “You’re breaking my heart!” That’s one
kind of a conference worth having. I invite you
to hold it—maybe less dramatically, but to talk
about “the welfare of your souls” and to “see
that there is no iniquity among you.” It might
not hurt to read again Moroni 6, sometime when
you’re alone in your apartment.
Prayer is perhaps the greatest conference of
all. But that’s a subject for another complete talk.
I was recently in Vavau, Tonga. It is a
little island which is one and a half hours away
from Nuku’alofa by plane and twenty-four
hours away by boat. By boat it is the worst trip
that can be made. (If you don’t believe that,
ask Elder Gordon B. Hinckley, who went there
recently to organize a stake and could not
get a plane.) When the area conference was announced for Tonga, it was determined that
only one boat would be available for the Saints
from Vavau. The boat held 150 people. If you
stuffed bodies into every possible corner of the
ship, you could get close to three hundred people. Eight hundred Tongans jammed onto that boat
and stood up for twenty-four hours without
sleep, without food, without drink, without anything—because they knew that a prophet of God
was going to be in their islands and they were
not going to miss him for anything in the world.
Do you want to go to conference that badly?
Do you care that the prophet of the Lord is
speaking in the neighborhood? Do you care
enough to flip on a television set, a radio, or to
come to this building to watch a priesthood
meeting? Eight hundred people stood up for
twenty-four hours to get to conference, and they
didn’t think anything about it. “The President of
the Church is here,” they said. “That’s our
prophet, and we may not see him again soon.”
And they came.
The other story I want to tell you comes
out of southern Utah. A man who’d been
away from the Church for half a century came
back to Utah and took a job as custodian of the
local chapel, promising the bishop that he’d
come to church and stop smoking. But he did
neither. The bishop did not rebuke him, but he
kept asking, “Do you remember the promise
you made?”
The man said, “Yes, I remember, Bishop.” The
bishop would smile and shake hands and walk
away, but the man did not come to church and
he did not stop smoking. One night, inside the
chapel when he was working late, he was overcome with the most terrifying, paralyzing fear he
had ever experienced in his life. (I heard him say
this with his own lips, though I do not know the
man’s name.) He said, “I have never been so
fearful, so frightened, so petrified in my life. I’ve
been afraid. I have been in dangerous, frightening circumstances, but there is nothing in this
world with which I can compare or any way in
this world I can describe the experience I had
that night. Every creak and crack and dark
corner of the chapel terrified me, and I began to
run.” This was a grown man speaking, a grandfather. “I began to run from the building and fled
to my home. But I was also just as terrified in my
own home, and I could not control my emotions.
I ran from my home and went to a shed behind
my house. And for the first time in half a century
I fell to my knees and I prayed. I said, ‘O Lord,
save me from whatever this is that terrifies me
so.’ ” Quaking, trembling, perspiring on his
knees in this shed out behind his home, he continued his prayer. He said, “I was lisping like a
child the only prayers I knew, when there came
into my heart the words of a song that I had not
heard nor sung for that half century. I think I did
not ever know the words, and I surely do not
know them now. But I heard them with symphonic accompaniment and angelic choirs. I
heard them, music and word, in that shed
behind my home in the middle of that night.” It’s
a hymn that you know, my young friends, and
the opening line is “We thank thee, O God, for a
prophet.” The man said, “I stopped trembling,
and I stopped crying, and I know I heard the
angels sing. I’ve never missed a church meeting
since that day. I’ve never smoked a cigarette, and
I’ve tried to do everything I should have done
for all those years. But I want you to know that I
did not then, and I probably do not now know,
the words to the hymn that I heard sung that
night in a shed behind my home with a celestial
symphony and an angelic choir.” It was indeed a
message to a world that’s fearful and frightened
and desperately in need.
“We thank thee, O God, for a prophet”—of
whom I testify, Spencer W. Kimball, and who
will give his testimony this weekend. To that I
bear witness and of him I bear witness, and of
the Church he leads I bear witness, and of the
Son of God who leads him I bear witness, in the
name of Jesus Christ. Amen.
